VESSEL  OIL  POLLUTION: 

REDUCING  THE  RISK  OF  FUTURE  SPILLS 

S.  HRG.  109–1097 

FIELD  HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON FISHERIES 

AND THE COAST GUARD 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

AUGUST  1,  2005 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

62–793 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2010 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office,

http://bookstore.gpo.gov. For more information, contact the GPO Customer Contact Center,

U.S. Government Printing Office. Phone 202–512–1800, or 866–512–1800 (toll-free). E-mail, gpo@custhelp.com.

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  FISHERIES  AND  THE  COAST  GUARD 

OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine,  Chairwoman 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington,  Ranking 
DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on August 1, 2005  .............................................................................
Statement of Senator Cantwell 
..............................................................................
Prepared statement of Hon. Christine O. Gregoire, Governor of the State 
of Washington submitted by Hon. Maria Cantwell  ....................................

WITNESSES 

Boothe, Captain Myles, Commandant, U.S. Coast Guard  ....................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Felleman, Fred, Northwest Director, Ocean Advocates  ........................................
Article  by  Mike  Merritt,  dated  June  17,  1989,  from  the  Seattle  Post— 
Intelligencer, entitled, ‘‘Big oil spill here? We’re unprepared’’  ..................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Helton,  Douglas,  Incident  Operations  Coordinator,  Office  of  Response  and 
Restoration,  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA), 
DOC  .......................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Holmes,  Frank  E.,  Northwest  Regional  Manager,  Western  States  Petroleum 
Association (WSPA)  ..............................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Jensen,  Dale,  Program  Manager,  Spill  Prevention,  Preparedness,  and  Re-
sponse Program, Washington State Department of Ecology  ............................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Leschine, Professor Thomas M., Director, School of Marine Affairs, University 
of Washington  .......................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Sones,  Hon.  David,  Vice  Chairman,  Makah  Tribal  Council;  on  behalf  of  the 
..........................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Wright,  Richard,  Pacific/Northwest  Region  Vice  President,  Marine  Spill  Re-
sponse Corporation (MSRC)  ................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Northwest Indian Fisheries Commission (NWIFC) 

APPENDIX 

Jensen,  Dale,  letter  with  attachment,  dated  August  15,  2005,  to  Hon.  Maria 
Cantwell  ................................................................................................................
Prince  William  Regional  Citizens’  Advisory  Council  (PWSRCAC),  prepared 
statement  ..............................................................................................................

Response to written questions submitted by Hon. Maria Cantwell to: 

Captain Myles Boothe  ......................................................................................
Douglas Helton  .................................................................................................
Richard Wright  .................................................................................................
Stevens,  Naki,  Director  of  Programs,  People  for  Puget  Sound,  letter,  dated 
.........................................................

August 12, 2005, to Hon. Maria Cantwell 

Page 
1 
1 

3 

3 
5 
57 

58 
62 

12 
14 

45 
46 

19 
22 

51 
54 

39 
42 

48 
50 

75 

78 

83 
80 
90 

77 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VESSEL  OIL  POLLUTION: 

REDUCING  THE  RISK  OF  FUTURE  SPILLS 

MONDAY,  AUGUST  1,  2005 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON FISHERIES AND THE COAST GUARD, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The Subcommittee met, pursuant to notice, at 10 a.m. in the Port 
of  Seattle  Commission  Chambers,  Hon.  Maria  Cantwell  presiding. 

Seattle, WA. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. MARIA CANTWELL, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM WASHINGTON 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Good  morning.  Today’s  field  hearing  is  a 
hearing of the U.S. Senate Commerce Committee to make sure that 
we  are  doing  all  we  can  to  prevent  future  oil  spills  in  Washington 
State  waterways,  and  to  make  sure  that  the  area  of  oil  spill  pre-
vention and response is something that not only Washington State 
is  good  at,  but  to  learn  from  the  Washington  State  experience  as 
we  look  at  Federal  policies  and  legislation  to  address  the  nation-
wide risk from continued oil spills. 

Today’s  hearing  is  important  for  several  reasons.  First  and  fore-
most, Congress recently received a report from the Coast Guard as-
sessing  the  progress  our  Nation  has  made  in  implementing  the 
ground-breaking Oil Pollution Act of 1990, a major piece of legisla-
tion  Congress  passed  in  the  wake  of  the  devastating  Exxon  Valdez 
incident. 

What the Coast Guard told us is that while the Oil Pollution Act 
of  1990  has  done  a  lot  to  reduce  the  risk  of  maritime  oil  pollution, 
spills  are  still  occurring  far  too  often.  In  fact,  according  to  the 
Coast  Guard,  the  total  volume  of  oil  spills  in  the  United  States 
from vessels in 2004 was larger than in 1992. 

One  of  the  primary  findings  of  the  report  was  that  the  Oil  Spill 
Liability  Trust  Fund,  which  makes  sure  that  resources  are  avail-
able to respond to oil spills immediately, would be running out be-
fore  2009.  In  fact,  new  predictions  based  on  the  rising  costs  of  the 
ongoing  cleanup  in  the  Delaware  River  from  the  Athos  I  spill  esti-
mate that the Fund could actually run out even sooner. This could 
have  a  big  impact  on  Washington  State,  which  received  over  $5 
million from the Trust Fund between 1997 and 2004 for emergency 
response and cleanup. 

I  was  surprised  to  learn  that  spills  can  cost  anywhere  from 
$1,000  per  gallon  of  oil  released.  With  50  spills  in  Washington 
State  over  10,000  gallons  over  the  past  30  years,  the  Trust  Fund 
has  provided  a  critical  source  of  funding,  ensuring  fast  and  effec-

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

tive  response,  and  that  states  are  not  crippled  by  the  burden  of 
paying for oil spill cleanup. 

Fortunately  I  am  pleased  to  report  that  Congress,  in  the  energy 
bill  passed  last  week,  included  language  from  Senate  Bill  1222, 
which  would  reinstate  the  fee  that  ensures  the  health  of  the  Oil 
Spill Cleanup Fund. 

However,  the  Coast  Guard  report  indicated  that  there  are  other 
remaining  issues.  These  issues  include:  one,  whether  the  cost  of 
spills  is  outpacing  the  amount  that  responsible  parties  are  to  pay; 
two, whether enough is being done to guard against the risks from 
aging  single-hulled  vessels;  three,  whether  all  of  the  navigational 
tools  that  we  have  at-hand  are  up  to  date  and  being  used  fully; 
four,  whether  adequate  manning  and  inspection  regulations  are  in 
place; and lastly, whether response capabilities are sufficient. 

Now, 15 years after the Oil Spill Pollution Act, I hope we can re-
examine  these  vital  issues,  especially  as  they  relate  today  to  the 
State  of  Washington,  so  that  I  can  take  this  information  back  to 
my colleagues in Washington, D.C. That’s why I’m pleased to have 
the group of panelists that we have before us today. 

We  have  expert  witnesses  from  two  key  Federal  agencies  in-
volved with oil spill prevention, response, and cleanup, and I thank 
them  for  coming  today.  We  are  also  lucky  to  have  a  key  player  in 
our  state’s  oil  prevention  effort,  Mr.  Dale  Jensen  from  the  Wash-
ington  State  Department  of  Ecology.  Washington  State  has  been 
extremely  active  in  addressing  and  reducing  oil  spill  threats  and 
has worked collaboratively with our Federal partners. 

I’d like to publicly thank Governor Gregoire for her leadership on 
this critical issue. She has submitted a statement and I will include 
that  in  the  record  of  our  hearing  today.  We,  I  believe,  do  have  a 
proud history with previous Governors who have looked at the val-
uable  resource  we  have  in  Puget  Sound,  and  taken  aggressive  ac-
tion to protect it from oil pollution. 

Rounding  out  our  government  panel  will  be  Dave  Sones,  who  I 
believe  is  on  his  way,  the  Vice  Chairman  of  the  Makah  Tribal 
Council who will speak on behalf of the Northwest Indian Fisheries 
Commission in representing our diverse coastal tribes. 

Our second panel is equally important because it has a set of wit-
nesses  that  represent  key  stakeholders  including  the  oil  industry, 
the  oil  spill  response  industry,  a  key  academic  analyst,  and  mem-
bers of our vigilant citizens’ groups who have been at the forefront 
of fighting to protect Puget Sound and our incredible quality of life 
here. 

So  again,  thank  you  all  for  coming.  I  know  we  share  the  goals 
of  having  good,  sound  oil  spill  prevention,  and  if  necessary,  clean-
up, and we’re all here to protect our magnificent Puget Sound and 
coastal regions, not just in the State of Washington but around the 
Nation. So I look forward to hearing from each of you and your in-
sights on the issues this morning. 

The  Port  here  has  a  fabulous  technology  conference  center,  but 
it doesn’t allow us the same technology signals that we have in the 
U.S.  Senate.  I’m  going  to  ask,  if  you  can,  to  keep  your  comments 
to  5  minutes,  and  longer  statements  can  be  submitted  for  the 
record. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

And  all  I  have  here  is  this  little  digital  clock—not  only  am  I 
chairing the hearing, I’m the official time-keeper here. I will be le-
nient, but if you can, keep to your 5 minutes and that will be help-
ful. 

[The prepared statement of Governor Gregoire follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. CHRISTINE O. GREGOIRE, 

GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON 

Senator and Madame Chair Cantwell and Members of the Committee: 
Greetings and welcome to Washington State! 
There  could  be  no  better  backdrop  than  Puget  Sound  to  highlight  the  critical  im-
portance of Federal and state oil spill prevention and response programs. And there 
is  no  better  program  in  the  country  than  the  partnership  between  the  U.S.  Coast 
Guard and the state of Washington. 

Our state is a national leader in oil spill prevention, preparedness, and response. 
We  have  a  proud  history  of  taking  action  to  protect  our  valuable  natural  resources 
from oil spills. The courts have been clear about the respective roles of the Federal 
and  state  government,  including  the  obligations  of  each  level  of  government  to  en-
sure sufficient funding for spill response. 

The  state  has  established  the  Oil  Spill  Response  Account  to  provide  funding  for 
incident  response  activities.  This  account  is  funded  through  a  tax  on  crude  oil  and 
petroleum products. On the Federal side, the Oil Spill Liability Trust Fund is a key 
tool  in  our  ability  to  respond  to  spills.  Access  to  this  fund  was  crucial  in  securing 
quick  and  effective  response  to  significant  spill  events  in  Puget  Sound  such  as  the 
Olympic Pipeline explosion and the recent Dalco Passage mystery spill. 

I thank Senator Cantwell for securing continued funding for this account through 

her efforts with the Federal energy bill. 

The Federal and state oil spill partnership benefits from the strong support of our 
oil and shipping industries. Our inspections and surprise drills show strong compli-
ance,  a  high  state  of  readiness,  and  a  solid  commitment  to  the  programs.  Just  last 
week,  we  called  for  an  increase  in  the  number  of  spill  response  vessels  to  improve 
our  ability  to  respond  to  a  larger  spill.  As  they  have  in  the  past,  our  industry  rep-
resentatives  have  signaled  that  they  will  do  what  is  necessary  to  make  sure  Puget 
Sound is safe and protected. 

Equally  important,  our  oil  spill  programs  have  benefited  from  the  active  engage-
ment  of  our  citizens.  We  are  giving  our  citizens  a  stronger  voice  in  these  matters. 
Pursuant  to  new  state  law,  I  am  pleased  to  announce  that  I  have  appointed  Mike 
Cooper  as  the  chair  of  the  Washington  Oil  Spill  Advisory  Council.  The  details  of 
Mike’s  role,  and  the  remaining  council  members,  will  be  announced  in  the  coming 
days. 

I  extend  my  gratitude  to  Senator  Cantwell  for  holding  this  hearing  and  bringing 
our region to the Committee’s attention. I pledge the state’s continued vigilance, and 
ask  for  your  support  to  ensure  the  Federal  Government’s  vigorous  engagement  in 
oil spill prevention and cleanup. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Again,  thank  you  all  very  much  for  being 

here, and I think we’re going to start with you, Captain Boothe. 

STATEMENT OF CAPTAIN MYLES BOOTHE, COMMANDANT, 

U.S. COAST GUARD 

Captain BOOTHE. Thank you, good morning, Senator Cantwell. It 
is  a  pleasure  to  appear  before  you  today  to  discuss  the  Coast 
Guard’s  role  in  protecting  our  marine  resources  within  the  Pacific 
Northwest against the threat of pollution, while also preserving the 
safe  and  efficient  flow  of  commerce  within  our  diverse  waterway 
systems here. The Coast Guard Captains of the Port as the pre-des-
ignated  Federal  On-Scene  coordinators  for  the  coastal  zones,  have 
primary  responsibility  for  preparedness  and  response  to  oil  and 
hazardous material spills within this area. 

Despite  the  increased  emphasis  on  maritime  homeland  security 
since  September  11,  2001,  these  Captains  of  the  Port  have  stead-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

fastly  led  their  respective  area  committees’  planning  and  response 
actions prescribed under the Oil Pollution Act of 1990, or OPA. The 
Pacific  Northwest  environment  and  economy  are  of  exceptional,  if 
not  strategic,  importance  to  the  Nation.  We  all  know  that.  The 
Coast  Guard’s  overarching  environmental  protection  goal  is  to 
eliminate  damage  to  our  environment  and  degradation  of  our  nat-
ural resources associated with maritime activities. 

We  strive  to  achieve  this  goal  by  eliminating  or  reducing  the 
probability and/or consequence of pollution resulting from a marine 
accident  with  the  same  vigor  as  we  did  prior  to  the  attacks  on 
America.  Spills  in  Washington  coastal  waters  under  Coast  Guard 
jurisdiction have averaged just three—or 10,300 gallons in the last 
5  years.  Considering  that  some  15  billion  gallons  of  oil  are  trans-
ferred  or  moved  annually  by  marine  sources  in  Washington,  that 
equals approximately 7⁄10 of a gallon per million gallons shipped. 

Based on a 2002 National Research Council report which alluded 
that over 29 million gallons of oil is spilled annually in the United 
States  marine  environment,  Washington  State’s  spills  within  the 
coastal  zone  equal  only  3⁄100 of  a  percent  of  this  annual  pollution. 
Yet  even  acknowledging  this  remarkably  low  spill  rate,  we  cannot 
become  complacent  in  our  relative  success.  We  must  remain  ever 
vigilant to address the risk of future pollution. 

OPA  90  has  dramatically  reduced  pollution  in  America.  Within 
the Pacific Northwest, OPA measures have greatly enhanced Coast 
Guard,  Washington  Department  of  Ecology,  industry,  and  Cana-
dian  efforts  to  prevent  and  mitigate  the  effects  of  an  acute  oil  or 
hazardous  material  spill  in  our  environment.  As  detailed  in  my 
written  statement  submitted  for  the  record,  within  the  Pacific 
Northwest  and  Puget  Sound  in  particular  we  have  established  ar-
guably  the  strongest  marine  safety  prevention  net  in  the  Nation, 
including  16  major  intervention  strategies  that  vastly  reduce  the 
probability  of  a  catastrophic  release  of  oil  from  a  vessel  in  transit 
or during cargo transfer operations. 

Some  of  the  measures  like  tug  escorts,  vessel  monitoring  sys-
tems,  vessel  traffic  services,  and  single-hull  tank  vessel  phaseouts 
were  either  imposed  or  strengthened  further  by  OPA,  and  are  ad-
dressed  generally  within  the  Coast  Guard’s  recent  report  to  Con-
gress  on  OPA’s  implementation.  However,  the  combination  of  OPA 
measures  with  several  other  strategies  established  through  sepa-
rate  efforts  unique  to  this  region,  creates  an  extraordinary  level  of 
risk reduction. 

Likewise,  this  region  has  a  unique  and  active  unified  regional 
and  area  response  system  operating  under  a  single  contingency 
plan  to  assure  consistent,  effective,  and  coordinated  responses  to 
mitigate the severity and impact of oil spills. 

While  we  have  one  of  the  strongest  pollution  mitigation  systems 
in  the  country,  or  at  least  I  say  so,  we  nonetheless  must,  and  do, 
continually  assess  areas  for  improvement.  Last  winter,  the  Gov-
ernor  and  the  District  Commander  here  established  an  Oil  Spill 
Early  Action  Task  Force,  convened  under  the  auspices  of  the  Re-
gional Response Team and the area committee to assess the poten-
tial  areas  for  improved  response  to  oil  spills  and  adverse  weather 
conditions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

The  task  force  developed  11  broad  recommendations  for  system 
improvement. Many of these have already been integrated into the 
Northwest  Area  Community  Strategy  Work  Plan  for  implementa-
tion,  while  Washington  State  is  addressing  others  separately.  A 
key  task  force  concern  was  the  Federal  and  state  response  to  a 
mystery  spill.  In  the  absence  of  an  effective  responsible  party-led 
and  financed  response  effort,  the  Coast  Guard  and  states  must 
have the means to respond promptly and appropriately to meet the 
mandates  of  OPA  90  and  the  Federal  Order  Pollution  Control  Act. 
Thank you, Senator Cantwell, for your leadership and interest in 
preserving the Oil Spill Liability Trust Fund as a viable and stable 
funding source for this purpose. 

Nationally  there  are  a  number  of  important  gap  closing  over 
rulemakings that also remain outstanding that I would like to talk 
about.  But  in  conclusion,  the  Pacific  Northwest  has  a  robust  col-
laborative  maritime  safety  prevention  and  response  net  which  has 
greatly  mitigated  the  potential  for  a  catastrophic  spill  within  the 
region.  Their  tremendous  success  is  achieved  or  due  in  large  part 
to  the  strong  partnerships  and  an  engaged  environmental  commu-
nity  here.  Much  work  remains  to  be  done  to  complete  the  OPA 
agenda  and  reduce  America’s  vulnerability  to  pollution  and  other 
maritime safety threats. With continued Congressional and Admin-
istration  support  I’m  confident  that  we  will  succeed  in  delivering 
the  robust  maritime  safety  and  environmental  security  this  state 
and America expects and deserves. 

Thank you for the opportunity to testify this morning, ma’am. I’ll 

be happy to answer any questions. 

[The prepared statement of Captain Boothe follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CAPTAIN MYLES BOOTHE, COMMANDANT, 

U.S. COAST GUARD 

Introduction 

Good morning Senator Cantwell and distinguished members of the Committee. It 
is  a  pleasure  to  be  here  today  to  discuss  the  Coast  Guard’s  role  in  protecting  our 
marine resources within the Pacific Northwest against the threat of pollution while 
preserving the safe and efficient flow of commerce within our diverse waterway sys-
tems. 

The  Coast  Guard  has  continued  to  meet  our  statutory  responsibilities,  even  with 
the  increased  emphasis  on  maritime  homeland  security  since  September  11,  2001. 
This is particularly true regarding protection of the marine environment, from both 
a prevention and response perspective. The Coast Guard has primary responsibility 
for preparedness and response to oil and hazardous material spills within the coast-
al zone. Our Captains of the Port, as the pre-designated Federal On-Scene Coordina-
tors  for  the  coastal  zones  under  the  National  Contingency  Plan,  have  continued  to 
lead  their  respective  Area  Committees’  planning  and  response  actions  prescribed 
under  the  Oil  Pollution  Act  of  1990  (OPA  90).  In  particular,  the  Coast  Guard  con-
tinues to oversee and manage numerous intervention strategies to prevent maritime 
accidents  that  may  cause  harm  to  our  environment,  and  oversee  or  direct  most 
clean-up  efforts  within  the  coastal  zone  with  the  same  vigor  as  prior  to  the  attacks 
on America. 
The Pacific Northwest Environment and Economy 
Environmental Sensitivity 

Washington State waters within the coastal zone represent some of the most pris-
tine  coastal  areas  within  the  Nation.  Encompassing  over  4,000  square  miles  and 
over 2,700 miles of rugged coastline, including over 300 hundred miles of the Colum-
bia  River,  this  diverse  ecosystem  includes  many  ‘‘environmentally  sensitive’’  areas, 
some  of  which  include  the  Olympic  Coast  National  Marine  Sanctuary,  Padilla  Bay 
National  Estuarine  Research  Reserve,  the  South  Slough  National  Estuarine  Re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

search  Reserve,  the  Washington  Maritime  National  Wildlife  Refuge  Complex,  the 
Willapa National Wildlife Refuge Complex, the Grays Harbor National Wildlife Ref-
uge, and numerous tribal aquaculture sites. Both resident and migrating orca (killer 
whale)  pods  feed  extensively  throughout  the  waters  of  the  Strait  of  Juan  de  Fuca, 
Puget  Sound,  and  Haro  Strait.  Many  species  of  nesting,  wintering,  and  migrating 
seabirds,  shorebirds,  waterfowl,  and  raptors  utilize  the  outer  coast  as  well  as  the 
Strait of Juan de Fuca and Puget Sound for foraging, nesting, and resting. Environ-
mental  responses  can  be  particularly  challenging  along  Washington  State’s  Pacific 
coast,  due  to  the  steep  slopes  on  shore,  exposed  location,  shoals  and  offshore  rocks, 
and lack of roads. Within the Puget Sound region, the challenges include significant 
tidal ranges and sensitive wetland mud flat areas. 

Puget Sound is a complex environmental system made up of diverse shoreline fea-
tures.  There  are  heavily  industrialized  areas  immediately  adjacent  to  sensitive  ref-
uge  areas.  There  are  several  historical  and  tribal  archaeological  sites  along  much 
of the coastal zone. Vegetated banks and marshes line most of the waters that flow 
into the Sound, and Columbia River and its tributaries. 

The  biological  resources  in  the  region  cross  the  spectrum  of  marine  life  including 
birds, fish, shellfish, and marine mammals. There are high concentrations of water-
fowl  present  over  most  seasons,  as  well  as  several  birds  of  prey  which  nest  in  the 
region.  Coastal  estuaries  are  sensitive  habitats  for  many  types  of  birds  and  forage 
fish. Coastal islands are used as nesting and rearing sites for many seabird species, 
some  of  which  are  nationally  rare.  The  Grays  Harbor  estuary  provides  an  inter-
nationally  significant  resting  and  feeding  area  for  tens  of  thousands  of  migrating 
shorebirds  that  concentrate  there  in  the  spring.  The  Puget  Sound  region  is  home 
or  feeding  grounds  for  several  orca  families,  and  the  region  has  several  seal  rook-
eries.  Dungeness  crab,  oysters,  clams,  and  mussels  are  the  predominant  significant 
shellfish  in  Puget  Sound  and  coastal  zone  region.  Numerous  salmon  species  also 
thrive  in  these  waters,  as  well  as  the  Columbia  River  and  its  tributaries,  which 
serve as both fish highways and critical spawning grounds. 
Economics 

The Puget Sound region, Gray’s Harbor, Columbia River, and other waters of the 
Pacific  Northwest  provide  several  fine  harbors  for  commercial  and  public  vessels. 
The  area  has  historically  supported  valuable  fisheries  (both  recreational  and  com-
mercial)  and  a  large,  ever-increasing,  recreational  boating  community.  We  share  a 
125-mile  international  maritime  border  with  Canada  along  the  Strait  of  Juan  de 
Fuca,  Haro  Strait,  Boundary  Pass,  and  the  Strait  of  Georgia,  which  provide  access 
to  the  ports  of  Victoria  and  Vancouver,  British  Columbia,  and  several  U.S.  ports. 
The  Marine  Transportation  System  (MTS)  in  Puget  Sound  and  the  Columbia  River 
port  complexes  provide  an  important  economic  link  to  Asian  markets  and  to  the 
West Coast of the United States, including Alaska. 

The  Puget  Sound  region  receives  approximately  5,000  deep-draft  vessel  arrivals 
through  the  Strait  of  Juan  de  Fuca  each  year.  Approximately  three-fifths  of  those 
vessels  transiting  the  125-mile  international  maritime  border  are  bound  for  U.S. 
ports,  while  the  remainder  proceed  to  Canadian  ports.  The  Seattle-Tacoma  port 
complex  is  the  third  largest  containerized  cargo  complex  in  the  Nation,  and  Puget 
Sound is homeport to a large Seattle-based fishing fleet, the largest passenger ferry 
fleet  in  the  Nation,  and  a  major  cruise  ship  industry  which  has  seen  dramatic 
growth  over  the  last  several  years.  Over  700  tank  ships  arrive  each  year,  trans-
porting  approximately  15  billion  gallons  of  crude  oil  and  refined  products  to  and 
from  the  five  refineries  in  Puget  Sound  waters.  Puget  Sound  possesses  one  of  only 
15  strategic  ports  in  the  Nation,  transporting  military  supplies  and  equipment  by 
vessel  to  support  our  troops  overseas.  The  Puget  Sound  region  is  critical  not  only 
locally, but also to the Nation. 

Gray’s  Harbor,  approximately  10  miles  south  of  the  Olympic  Coast  National  Ma-
rine  Sanctuary  on  the  Washington  coast  serves  as  a  major  local  coastal  fisheries 
homeport, as well as one of the principal oyster aquaculture beds for the region. 

Finally,  the  Columbia  River  system,  along  the  Washington-Oregon  border,  serves 
the  principal  port  complexes  of  Longview,  Washington  at  mile  50;  and  Vancouver, 
Washington,  and  Portland,  Oregon;  located  100  miles  from  the  entrance.  This  sys-
tem serves as the Pacific gateway and the second largest port complex for U.S. grain 
export.  It  also  serves  as  a  major  automobile  distribution  port.  Approximately  1,800 
foreign, deep-draft vessels transit this 100 mile serpentine stretch of the river each 
year. 

The port complexes in Puget Sound and the Columbia River are key contributors 
to  the  economic  vitality  of  the  United  States,  ranking  on  the  Coast  Guard’s  list  of 
the most economically significant ports in the Nation. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Reducing Risk in the Pacific Northwest Maritime Environment 

7 

The Coast Guard’s overarching environmental protection goal is to eliminate dam-
age  to  our  environment  and  degradation  of  our  natural  resources  associated  with 
maritime  activities,  including  transportation,  commercial  fishing,  and  recreational 
boating.  Having  set  the  stage  for  the  level  of  activity  in  this  marine  transportation 
system and the resources at risk throughout the region, I will describe the key risks 
of  pollution  within  the  region,  the  substantial  and  unique  safety  net  which  this  re-
gion boasts, and then some areas for improvement. 

Causes  of  Spills:  Spills  can  originate  from  every  type  of  vessel  and  facility  on  or 
near the water. However many spills, including some high-volume spills, come from 
sources completely outside the Coast Guard’s jurisdiction, such as rail, small plane, 
truck  and  industrial  accidents,  highway  runoff,  or  underground  storage  tanks  leak-
ing  into  storm  drains.  In  the  National  Research  Council  report,  Oil  in  the  Sea  III: 
Inputs . . . and  Effects  (2002),  it  is  noted  that  16.2  million  gallons  of  a  total  of  29 
million  gallons  spilled  annually  in  the  United  States  are  attributable  to  street  run-
off,  industrial  waste,  municipal  wastewater,  refinery  wastewater,  and  recreational 
vessels. Of that amount, approximately 1.5 million gallons are attributable to spills 
from tank vessels. 

Regionally,  our  record  is  much  brighter.  While  we  have  averaged  about  10,300 
gallons  per  year  of  oil  spilled  for  the  past  5  years,  in  2004  less  than  5,000  gallons 
of  oil  were  spilled  in  Washington  waters,  and  that  included  the  1,000  gallon  spill 
attributable  to  the  Dalco  Passage  incident.  That  is  a  remarkably  low  amount  of  oil 
spilled,  given  the  excess  of  15  billion  gallons  of  oil  that  is  transferred  annually  by 
Washington marine sources. 

Recreational  vessels  and  fishing  vessels  typically  account  for  the  highest  number 
of identified marine related spills each year. The pollution threat potential from rec-
reational  vessels  is  relatively  small  in  the  total  volume  spilled  per  incident;  how-
ever,  for  2004,  the  recreational  vessel  spills  accounted  for  the  most  gallons  spilled 
within the Puget Sound region. Tank vessels and bulk liquid oil facilities are highly 
regulated  and  are  operated  by  highly  trained  and  certified  professionals.  The  prob-
ability  of  spills  from  tank  vessels  and  facilities  is  understandably  lower.  However, 
should such spills occur, the potential spill volumes are much greater in magnitude. 
The  volume  from  one  spill  from  those  sources  could  easily  be  over  1,000  gallons 
given  quantities  and  typical  handling  rates.  Likewise,  spills  from  uninspected  com-
mercial vessels (fishing and towing vessels) and derelict vessels can also involve rel-
atively high potential oil volumes. Together, known recreational vessels and fishing 
vessels accounted for over 50 percent of the oil spilled within the Washington coast-
al zone in 2004. A significant amount attributable to ‘‘mystery spills’’ is also consid-
ered likely to come from these mostly uninspected and unregulated marine sources. 
Hundreds  of  oil  transfers  take  place  every  week  in  the  Pacific  Northwest  region. 
These may range from a recreational boater getting a fill-up at a marina, to a 900- 
foot tank ship unloading a cargo of crude oil at a local refinery. During each trans-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
1
b
1
0
8

fer, there is a risk of an oil spill. In 2004, 58 of the 560 spills reported were linked 
to oil transfer operations, accounting for 6 percent of the total volume spilled. 

8 

The  cause  of  oil  spills  is,  of  course,  related  to  the  source.  While  most  spills  from 
vessels  occur  at  the  dock,  rather  than  while  the  vessel  is  underway,  there  can  be 
many contributing factors causing these spills. The most common causes include: 

• Mechanical failure of hydraulic lines. 
• Structural failure of hulls of derelict vessels (vessel sinkings). 
• Structural failure of cargo tanks, cargo piping, or cargo relief valves. 
• Operator error during fueling—generally related to overfilling a tank. 
• Human factors such as poorly-documented procedures. 
• Truck rollovers, collisions, mechanical failures, and human errors from non-ma-

rine sources such as trucks, trains, factories, etc. 

Of the 8 billion gallons of crude oil typically transported and transferred by tank 
vessels  within  Puget  Sound  each  year,  less  than  1,500  gallons  of  crude  oil  were 
spilled within the last 5 years. Another 7 billion gallons of refined products are an-
nually transported by tank vessels; again, only 500 gallons of refined oil was spilled 
over the last 5 years by tankers. These spills were the result of human error during 
cargo  handling  or  ballasting  operations.  None  of  these  spills  from  tank  ships  were 
attributable to collisions, allisions, or groundings. 

Despite  this  extraordinary  tank  vessel  safety  history,  and  an  acknowledgement 
that the likelihood of in-transit accidents within the Puget Sound region are greatly 
mitigated  by  the  existing  safety  net  within  Puget  Sound  region,  the  inherent  haz-
ards  associated  with  the  transport  and  transfer  of  such  significant  volumes  of  oil 
through  an  extremely  difficult  navigation  area  represent  a  very  high  consequence 
should  a  major  grounding  and  large-volume  oil  spill  occur.  Therefore,  the  Coast 
Guard and industry must remain prepared, regardless of source, to monitor and di-
rect  a  proper  response  for  all  spills  impacting  coastal  zone  waters,  and  specifically 
be  prepared  to  address  the  acute  damaging  impact  to  the  environment  of  a  large 
oil spill from a vessel. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
2
b
1
0
8

9 

Unique Pacific Northwest Marine Safety Net 

Within  the  Pacific  Northwest  we  have  one  of  the  strongest  maritime  safety  nets 
in the Nation to help prevent and mitigate the effects of oil and hazardous material 
spills  on  our  environment.  The  Coast  Guard  employs  a  threat-based,  risk  managed 
approach  to  mitigate  the  potential  for  a  serious  marine  incident  that  might  result 
in a substantial threat to the marine environment. 
Prevention Systems 

• Pre-Arrival  Checks  and  Offshore  Routing:  Before  any  vessel  greater  than  1,600 
gross  tons  enters  U.S.  waters  its  crew  is  obligated  to  perform  safety  checks  of 
propulsion and steering equipment, and report any deficiencies prior to entering 
port,  to  help  guard  against  a  mechanical  malfunction  occurring  close  to  U.S. 
shorelines  or  within  maneuvering  waters.  In  addition,  tank  vessels  enroute  or 
departing  the  region  are  required  to  follow  offshore  routing  schemes  that  hold 
them  further  off  the  pristine  coastlines  of  Washington  and  Vancouver  Island, 
British  Columbia.  On  the  U.S.  side,  the  International  Maritime  Organization 
has recognized an ‘‘Area To Be Avoided’’ (ATBA) buffer zone extending 25 miles 
out from the Washington coast along the Olympic Coast National Marine Sanc-
tuary, for all laden tank vessels and other vessels of 1,600 gross tons and above. 
Similarly, a 50-mile wide Tanker Exclusion Zone has been established off of the 
Canadian  coast  to  route  the  Trans-Alaskan  Pipeline  tanker  traffic  further  off-
shore to protect against groundings as a result of any potential disabling vessel 
conditions.  Most  deep  draft  freight  vessels  operating  off  the  Washington  coast 
comply with the voluntary Olympic Coast National Marine Sanctuary ATBA. 
• The United States and Canada jointly operated Cooperative Vessel Traffic Serv-
ice  (CVTS)  and  the  International  Maritime  Organization  adopted  Traffic  Sepa-
ration  Scheme  (TSS)  within  the  Puget  Sound  Waters  have  existed  for  decades 
and  serve  to  ensure  an  ordered  and  predictable  traffic  pattern  for  shipping  in 
the region. All deep draft vessels (all above 300 gross tons) are obligated to par-
ticipate in the CVTS and follow the TSS according to the International Naviga-
tion Rules of the Road. The TSS establishes one-way traffic lanes, similar to an 
interstate  highway,  with  a  separation  zone  between  the  opposing  lanes  of  ma-
rine  traffic.  The  Cooperative  Vessel  Traffic  Service  actually  tracks  and  directs 
all  participating  vessels  transiting  the  region  as  necessary  to  ensure  collisions 
and  powered  groundings  will  not  occur.  Significant  improvements  to  the  TSS 
were implemented with international approval in 2004, after an extensive anal-
ysis  and  collaboration  with  Canada  and  tribal  interests  and  as  complemented 
by the discussions and recommendations from the Long-term Risk Management 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
3
b
1
0
8

10 

Panel.  The  most  significant  adjustments  ensure  greater  separation  for  tankers 
while  in  transit  throughout  the  system,  particularly  in  more  confined  waters. 
The  CVTS  system  is  a  model  of  bilateral  cooperation  and  waterways  safety 
management,  ensuring  the  environmental  protection  and  safety  of  our  shared 
waters. 
• Automated Identification System (AIS): In addition to the required participation 
in  the  CVTS,  as  of  December  2004,  nearly  all  commercial  vessels,  including 
tugs,  are  required  to  have  AIS  transponders  installed  which  automatically 
broadcast  vessel  name,  position  course,  speed,  and  other  marine  information  to 
other  shipping  and  to  U.S.  and  Canadian  safety  officials.  These  broadcasts  are 
being received as far away as several hundred miles from shore, greatly enhanc-
ing our awareness of vessels in our environ and their activities. Indeed, the AIS 
has  enhanced  the  CVTS  coverage  by  providing  vessel  tracking  within  waters 
which were previously not covered by the existing Vessel Traffic Service radars. 
• Port  State  Control  Examination  Program.  In  1994,  the  Coast  Guard  enhanced 
our  pre-existing  foreign  tank  vessel  examination  program  to  include  foreign 
freight  vessels,  such  as  container  ships  and  bulk  carriers,  in  an  effort  to  elimi-
nate substandard shipping in U.S. waters. Every foreign vessel bound for a U.S. 
port  is  screened  upon  receipt  of  their  96-hour  Advance  Notice  of  Arrival  to  the 
United  States  utilizing  a  targeting  matrix  which  considers  numerous  risk  fac-
tors,  including  vessel  type,  ownership,  flag  state,  classification  society  and  ves-
sel’s  operating  history  as  indicated  in  the  USCG’s  marine  information  data-
bases. All vessels above a certain score are then targeted for a USCG safety and 
environmental  protection  compliance  examination  either  at  sea  prior  to  port 
entry or after docking, depending on the relative risk determined. Vessels found 
in non-compliance may be denied entry. If already in port, they will be detained 
until  major  discrepancies  are  corrected.  While  the  national  average  percentage 
of foreign vessels examined is approximately 19 percent, the two Captains of the 
Port  in  the  Thirteenth  District  examined  over  38  percent  of  all  foreign  vessel 
arrivals,  and  over  80  percent  of  distinct  vessel  arrivals  accounting  for  the  fact 
that many foreign vessel may make repeat port calls. 
• Pilotage Requirements: Upon arrival at Port Angeles, all deep draft vessels and 
most  foreign  vessels  other  than  small  yachts  are  obligated  to  embark  a  Puget 
Sound  pilot,  a  local  knowledge  expert  and  professional  mariner,  for  continued 
transit  of  the  vessel  to  its  final  destination.  Vessels  bound  for  Canadian  ports 
are similarly obligated to embark a British Columbia pilot. 
• Tug  Escorts:  Almost  all  oil  laden  tank  vessels  must  also  be  under  the  escort  of 
two  tugs  which  are  capable  of  stopping  the  vessel’s  movement  within  strict  pa-
rameters.  No  vessel  above  100  gross  tons  is  permitted  to  meet  a  laden  tanker 
transiting Rosario Strait, the typical route for tankers destined for Washington 
refineries. Typically, as tankers enter Rosario Strait, escort tugs actually tether 
themselves  to  the  tanker  for  enhanced  ability  to  positively  control  the  tanker’s 
movement if needed. 
• Weather  Sensors  and  Decision  Aids:  As  a  result  of  a  special  appropriation  for 
Puget  Sound  pollution  prevention  enhancement,  two  sophisticated  weather 
buoys  and  numerous  other  weather  sensors  and  cameras  have  been  installed 
throughout Puget Sound waters to enhance the mariners’ and the Coast Guard’s 
situational awareness in the region. In addition, a Rescue Tug Deployment De-
cision  Making  tool  has  been  created  to  assist  the  Captain  of  the  Port  in  objec-
tively determining the need for the dispatch and pre-staging of stand-by tug ca-
pabilities to protect against adverse weather and potential disabled vessels com-
bining  to  create  an  unacceptable  risk  for  particular  areas  within  the  region. 
These  measures  all  combine  to  facilitate  both  normal  voyage  planning  and 
emergency response decisionmaking. 
• Double  Hull  Requirements:  Most  tankers  servicing  these  ports  have  a  double 
hull,  in  compliance  with  OPA  90  standards;  and  many  are  also  equipped  with 
redundant  propulsion  systems  to  mitigate  even  further  any  loss  of  vessel  con-
trol. 
• Oil  Pollution  Prevention  and  Response  Agreements:  In  2003,  the  Thirteenth 
Coast  Guard  District  and  Washington  Department  of  Ecology  established  a  se-
ries  of  protocols  to  implement  and  guide  our  respective  operations  in  the  area 
of  spill  prevention,  preparedness  and  response  to  reduce  duplication  of  effort, 
and instill better coordination and communication. 
• Harbor  Safety  Committees:  In  addition  to  government  safety  and  pollution  pre-
vention  efforts,  the  Puget  Sound  and  Columbia  River  region’s  maritime  indus-
tries  have  established  strong  Harbor  Safety  Committees,  with  members  from  a 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

broad  spectrum  of  industry.  These  Committees  have  established  Standards  of 
Care,  voluntary  measures  for  operating  practices  and  equipment  testing  that 
supplement  the  Federal  and  state  standards.  These  additional  measures  have 
proven  a  valuable  tool  in  quickly  improving  the  maritime  industry’s  perform-
ance, without the need to embark in regulatory changes. 
• MARPOL  Enforcement:  The  Thirteenth  Coast  Guard  District  Captains  of  the 
Port,  in  close  cooperation  with  the  U.S.  Attorney,  Environmental  Protection 
Agency and Washington Department of Ecology Investigators have gained inter-
national  acclaim  for  trailblazing  efforts  to  uncover  criminal  acts  of  intentional 
marine  pollution  at  sea.  This  collaborative  tenacious  effort  has  produced  Fed-
eral prosecutions of 21 ship owners, numerous convictions of the vessels’ senior 
crew,  and  the  collection  of  over  $38  million  in  criminal  fines  and  settlements, 
including  over  $7  million  for  environmental  restoration  projects  within  the  Pa-
cific Northwest. 

Response System 

• Regional  Response  Team,  Region  10/Northwest  Area  Committee  and  Contin-
gency  Plan:  The  Oil  Pollution  Act  of  1990  and  the  National  Contingency  Plan 
mandates  each  Federal  On-Scene  Coordinator  establish  Area  Committees  to 
protect public health, safety and environment by ensuring coordinated, efficient, 
and  effective  response  to  oil  and  hazardous  material  spills.  Within  the  Pacific 
Northwest, the two Coast Guard FOSCs, the EPA FOSCs, and Washington, Or-
egon,  and  Idaho  State  environmental  response  organizations  established  a  sin-
gle Area Committee to address all regional environmental response activities in 
a more collective manner. Further, the Regional Response Team and Area Com-
mittee  established  a  single  Contingency  Plan  to  address  responses  executed  by 
each authority. 
• Orphan  Spills:  In  the  absence  of  an  identified  responsible  party  (spiller),  or  in 
case  of  a  party’s  failure  to  adequately  respond  to  a  spill,  the  Federal  On-Scene 
Coordinator  is  responsible  to  mount  such  response.  As  noted  earlier,  many  of 
the  oil  spills  within  this  region  are  ‘‘mystery’’  spills,  and  as  such,  fall  to  the 
Coast  Guard  and  state  environmental  response  agencies  to  mount  an  effective 
and coordinated response action. 
• National  Preparedness  for  Response  Program  (NPREP)  was  established  under 
OPA  90  to  ensure  Area  Committees  and  facility  and  vessel  operators  maintain 
an active exercise program to continually test their regional response capability 
to address both worst case and most probable spill scenarios on a regular basis. 
The results of these exercises feed into a lessons learned database accessible to 
all within the national response system. The lessons learned are then taken for 
action by the Area Committee and individual operators, as appropriate. 
• Non-Tank Vessel Response Plans: Next week vessel spill response plans for non- 
tankers  must  be  implemented,  as  mandated  by  Congress.  This  initiative  will 
compel  virtually  all  deep  draft  vessels  to  have  detailed  plans  and  capabilities 
in  place  to  ensure  an  aggressive  and  effective  response  to  spills  occurring  from 
those  vessels,  similar  to  the  system  already  required  of  tank  vessels.  Wash-
ington  State  has  had  a  state-driven  requirement  since  the  early  1990s,  when 
the  state  legislature  established  a  vessel  fee  and  a  maritime  commission  to 
serve as an umbrella response management structure to effect a ‘‘first 24-hours’’ 
response to spills. 
• Standby  Rescue  Tugs:  Since  1999,  Washington  State  has  maintained  a  dedi-
cated  rescue  tug  at  the  mouth  of  the  Strait  of  Juan  de  Fuca  to  respond  to  dis-
abled  vessels  and  to  participate  in  response  drills  and  exercises.  That  same 
year,  a  Coast  Guard  cost-benefit  analysis  suggested  that  the  International  Tug 
of Opportunity System (ITOS), paid for by industry fees collected through Puget 
Sound  Marine  Exchange,  was  a  fiscally  responsible  alternative.  In  contrast,  a 
standby rescue tug system, which incorporates tug deployment in areas deemed 
to present a higher risk due to severe weather or other causes, is also an effec-
tive countermeasure to groundings in the region, but at greater cost. The Auto-
mated  Identification  System  has  greatly  expanded  the  Coast  Guard’s  maritime 
domain  awareness,  providing  the  ability  to  identify  a  tug’s  presence,  capabili-
ties, and availability to assist vessels in distress and has successfully been em-
ployed by the Captain of the Port in the past. 

Areas for Improvement 

As a result of the recent Dalco Passage Spill, an Oil Spill Early Action Task Force 
was  convened  under  the  auspices  of  the  Regional  Response  Team,  Region  10  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

the Northwest Area Committee. The Task Force was charged to evaluate actions to 
be taken during the early stages of oil spills when meteorological conditions are ad-
verse, and make recommendations to improve notification procedures, response poli-
cies and response technology, including any recommended changes to the Northwest 
Area Contingency Plan. The task force developed 11 broad recommendations, many 
of which the Area Committee has already integrated into the NWAC strategic work 
plan  for  implementation.  It  was  clear  that  the  assessment  and  response  to  the  rel-
atively  minor  (1,000  gallon)  oil  spill  was  exacerbated  by  weather  conditions,  and 
that the Area Committee needs to further explore means to more effectively and ag-
gressively  assess  spills  during  reduced  visibility  to  permit  more  rapid  implementa-
tion  and  coordination  of  appropriate  response  strategies,  particularly  in  situations 
where no responsible party has acknowledged the spill and taken action to respond. 
Conclusion 

While  we  must  always  remain  vigilant  in  assuring  our  ability  to  respond  aggres-
sively  and  appropriately  to  oil  and  hazardous  material  spills,  it  is  evident  that  the 
Pacific  Northwest’s  broad  prevention  efforts  and  its  collaborative  maritime  safety 
net  have  greatly  mitigated  the  potential  for  a  catastrophic  spill  within  this  region. 
We  endeavor  to  improve  the  system  through  continual  self-examination.  The  tre-
mendous successes we have achieved in this endeavor are due, in large part, to the 
cooperation and prompt measures taken by the government, the spill response com-
munity, the environmental community, scientists, and industry working together as 
partners. Much work remains to be done to reduce America’s vulnerability to pollu-
tion  and  other  maritime  safety  threats,  but  with  the  continued  support  of  the  Con-
gress  and  the  Administration  I  know  that  we  will  succeed  in  delivering  the  robust 
maritime safety and environmental security America expects and deserves well into 
the 21st century. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  today.  I  will  be  happy  to  answer  any 

questions. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Thank  you,  Captain  Boothe.  We’re  going  to 
let  all  the  panelists  speak  and  then  we’ll  come  back  to  questions. 
So,  Mr.  Helton,  thank  you  for  being  here,  thank  you  for  rep-
resenting NOAA at today’s hearing. 

STATEMENT  OF  DOUGLAS  HELTON,  INCIDENT  OPERATIONS 
COORDINATOR,  OFFICE  OF  RESPONSE  AND  RESTORATION, 
NATIONAL  OCEANIC  AND  ATMOSPHERIC  ADMINISTRATION 
(NOAA), DOC 
Mr.  HELTON.  Thank  you.  Thank  you  for  inviting  me  to  speak 
today  about  oil  pollution  issues  in  Washington  State.  My  name  is 
Doug  Helton,  I’m  the  Incident  Operations  Coordinator  for  the  Na-
tional  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration.  NOAA’s  Spill  Re-
sponse  program  is  headquartered  here  in  Seattle,  we  have  over  45 
scientists and responders available on a 24/7 basis to provide tech-
nical support for oil spills throughout the nation. 

When a spill occurs that team provides and coordinates advice on 
scientific  issues,  cleanup,  natural  resource  assessment  issues,  and 
spills.  NOAA  essentially,  as  support  coordinator,  leads  this  effort 
with  a  team  of  scientists  on-scene,  provides  support  in  such  areas 
as pollutant fate and transport, resources identification and protec-
tion  strategies,  cleanup,  shoreline  cleanup  assessment  and  natural 
resource  trustee  coordination.  NOAA  also  provides  currents,  tides, 
and weather forecasts during spills. 

Effective  spill  responses  also  depend  on  planning  and  prepara-
tion.  Between  incidents  NOAA  promotes  preparedness  by  working 
closely  with  local  responders  and  Federal  partners.  We  work  with 
a  regional  response  team  on  a  variety  of  issues  including  dispers-
ant use, best cleanup practices, communications and response capa-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

bilities.  NOAA  also  enhances  the  state-of-readiness  by  developing 
better response tools. 

NOAA  works  with  our  Federal,  State,  and  tribal  partners  to  de-
termine  how  best  to  restore  injured  resources  to  the  State  they 
were  in  before  the  incident  and  to  compensate  the  public  for  the 
loss  of  natural  resources  resulting  from  those  injuries.  NOAA  sci-
entists and economists provide technical foundation for natural re-
source damage assessments. Our experts collect data, conduct stud-
ies,  and  perform  analysis  needed  to  identify  whether  coastal  re-
gions  have  been  injured  by  spills  and  how  to  restore  those  spills. 
In the Puget Sound region, approximately 500 spills are reported 
each year. Fortunately large spills are infrequent, most of those are 
quite small, with the average spill being less than 20 gallons; how-
ever, with the increased daily travel of fishing vessels, cruise ships, 
freighters, there is an increasing number of spills in this region. 

I’d  like  to  talk  to  you  about  a  couple  of  examples  of  prevention. 
Catastrophic discharge of oil in the Olympic Coast National Marine 
Sanctuary is one of the greatest threats facing that sanctuary, and 
reducing this threat has been one of NOAA’s highest priorities. The 
sanctuary is located at the entrance of the Strait of Juan de Fuca, 
it’s  a  major  fairway  for  ships  going  to  the  Pacific  Rim.  NOAA 
worked  with  the  Coast  Guard  to  develop  an  Area  To  Be  Avoided, 
and that was implemented in 1995. 

This  Area  advises  operators  carrying  petroleum  and  hazardous 
materials  to  stay  at  least  25  miles  off  the  coast  while  they’re  ap-
proaching  the  entrance  to  the  Strait  of  Juan  de  Fuca.  Since  that 
Area  has  been  adopted,  NOAA  has  also  worked  on  its  charts  and 
other publications to make sure that mariners are aware of that on 
the appropriate charts. 

We  have  two  other  programs  that  are  critical  here  in  Seattle  to 
our work in prevention of spills. One of them is the Navigation Re-
sponse Team and the other one is our PORTS program. The Navi-
gation  Response  Team  conducts  surveys  of  obstructions  in  harbor 
areas and to locate potential navigation problems before they cause 
spills.  The  team  also  is  available  to  respond  after  spills  to  help 
identify  whether  that  obstruction  was  the  cause  of  that  incident. 
This  team  is  on  hand  throughout  the  year  and  a  regional  team  is 
based here in the Seattle area. 
The other program is the PORTS program. This is the Physical 
Oceanographic  Real  Time  System.  This  is  a  system  that  we  have 
in  the  Port  of  Tacoma  that  provides  realtime  weather,  tides,  and 
current information to the marine operators in the harbor. This in-
formation  is  critical  to  daily  harbor  operations,  but  it’s  also  very 
important during spill responses. 

In the last few years NOAA has assisted the Coast Guard in sev-
eral  spills  in  this  region,  and  I’d  like  to  give  you  a  few  examples. 
The  2004  mystery  spill—you’ve  all  heard  about  it—in  Dalco  Pas-
sage, NOAA and the State worked on perfecting overflights for that 
incident,  due  to  calm  weather  conditions  that  oil  was  spread  over 
a  very  large  area,  giving  the  impression  that  it  was  a  very  signifi-
cant spill. 

Response teams worked to treat the affected beaches and the fol-
low-up  investigations  that  we’ve  done  along  with  the  State  of 
Washington have shown relatively minor environmental impacts. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

At  Point  Wells,  just  north  of  here  in  Seattle,  there  was  a  4,600- 
gallon spill in December 2003. That oil spread across central Puget 
Sound  and  affected  an  area  of  the  Suquamish  Tribe  over  in  Port 
Madison.  Unfortunately,  oiled  the  pristine  marsh  and  shoreline 
area.  In  that  incident  NOAA  provided  response  services,  including 
tracking the floating oil, predictions of how the oil would evaporate, 
and  where  it  would  go.  We  helped  with  the  shoreline  surveys;  we 
also  helped  with  the  seafood  sampling  afterwards  because  there 
was concerns about the wholesomeness of seafood. We’re continuing 
to  work  with  the  State  and  U.S.  Fish  &  Wildlife  Service  on  com-
pleting a cooperative damage assessment on that incident. 

The  final  incident  I  want  to  share  with  you  is  the  1999  Olympic 
Pipeline  spill.  It’s  a  reminder  that  not  all  spills  come  from  marine 
sources.  This  incident  affected  Bellingham,  Washington,  including 
aquatic  and  terrestrial  resources  in  the  Whatcom  Creek  and 
Whatcom  Falls  area.  NOAA’s  regulations  under  the  Oil  Pollution 
Act encouraged cooperative and restoration assessments, and those 
efforts were illustrated in this effort. 

Working with the other trustees and the responsible party NOAA 
was  the  lead  administrative  trustee  and  worked  to  develop  both 
emergency  and  long-term  restoration  plans  for  that  creek.  A  num-
ber  of  restoration  actions  were  implemented  during  the  summer 
following  the  spill,  and  salmon  successfully  spawned  in  the  creek 
that fall. Several long-term projects were also developed, and those 
are being implemented now. 

Thank you for this opportunity to let me talk about NOAA’s spill 
response program. I’d be happy to talk more about prevention, pre-
paredness,  and  recovery  actions  associated  with  oil  spills.  I  look 
forward to answering any questions you may have. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Helton follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DOUGLAS HELTON,  INCIDENT OPERATIONS COORDINATOR, 
OFFICE OF RESPONSE AND RESTORATION,  NATIONAL OCEANIC AND ATMOSPHERIC 
ADMINISTRATION (NOAA), DOC 
Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  on  the  role  of  the  National  Oceanic  and 
Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA)  in  response,  restoration,  and  research  under 
the Oil Pollution Act of 1990 (OPA; 33 U.S.C. 2701–2761). I am Douglas Helton, In-
cident  Operations  Coordinator  for  the  Office  of  Response  and  Restoration,  National 
Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  within  the  Department  of  Commerce. 
NOAA’s  spill  response  program  is  headquartered  in  Seattle,  WA,  and  has  over  45 
scientists  and  responders  available  24  hours  a  day,  7  days  a  week,  to  provide  tech-
nical  support  for  oil  spills  nationwide.  As  the  Incident  Operations  Coordinator,  my 
role  is  to  plan  and  staff  incident  responses,  and  to  ensure  that  NOAA  products  are 
timely and useful. I also help to coordinate preliminary natural resource damage as-
sessment  studies,  working  closely  with  biologists,  economists,  and  legal  counsel  in 
the  NOAA  Damage  Assessment  and  Restoration  Program.  Over  the  past  12  years, 
I have been involved with most major spills in the United States, including several 
here in the Puget Sound region. 
Brief Overview 

The  Exxon  Valdez  oil  spill  taught  us  a  valuable  lesson.  Our  Nation  must  be  pre-
pared  to  respond  to  major  oil  spills.  Some  time  has  passed  since  a  domestic  spill 
rivaled  the  Exxon  Valdez  in  size.  However,  the  recent  Prestige  spill  in  Europe  and 
the near simultaneous spills in Delaware and Alaska last winter serve as reminders 
that,  although  rare,  significant  oil  spills  still  happen.  We  must  therefore  continue 
to  be  prepared  to  respond  to  these  spills  when  they  do  occur.  OPA  created  a  com-
prehensive  prevention,  response,  liability,  and  compensation  regime  that  is  needed 
to  respond  to  these  types  of  oil  pollution  incidents  from  both  vessels  and  on-shore 
facilities. OPA authorized NOAA to represent the public as a natural resource trust-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

ee  for  ocean  and  coastal  resources  regarding  the  discharge  or  threatened  discharge 
of  oil  into  the  environment.  NOAA  is  mandated  to  seek  damages  on  behalf  of  the 
public  to  restore  natural  resources  injured  by  oil  spills.  When  oil  spills  threaten  or 
injure  these  resources,  NOAA  and  other  natural  resource  trustees  are  responsible 
for: 

of services that the natural resources provided; and 

• Working  through  the  Regional  Response  Teams  and  National  Response  Team 
to  ensure  that  the  most  appropriate  response  and  cleanup  actions  are  taken  to 
protect resources from further injury; 
• Assessing  and  recovering  natural  resource  damages  to  compensate  for  the  loss 
• Implementing restoration projects for injured natural resources. 
OPA  required  NOAA  to  draft  regulations  under  which  all  natural  resource  trust-
ees  perform  natural  resource  damage  assessments.  In  addition,  OPA  mandates  oil 
spill research and development under Title VII, and created the Interagency Coordi-
nating Committee on Oil Pollution Research to coordinate research and development 
efforts among industry, universities, and others. 
NOAA’s Response Role 

When a spill occurs a multi-agency interdisciplinary scientific response team pro-
vides and coordinates advice on response, cleanup, and natural resource issues. For 
spills  in  the  marine  environment,  or  spills  in  areas  where  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard 
(USCG)  has  jurisdiction,  NOAA  assumes  the  role  of  Scientific  Support  Coordinator 
(SSC).  NOAA  has  SSCs  in  USCG  offices  to  assist  the  USCG  in  its  role  as  Federal 
On-Scene Coordinators. The SSC also supports the Unified Command, an organiza-
tional  structure  that  allows  the  Incident  Commander  position  to  be  shared  among 
several  agencies  and  organizations  that  have  jurisdiction,  in  order  to  enhance  co-
ordination  among  these  agencies.  SSCs  lead  a  team  of  scientists  who  provide  sup-
port  in  such  areas  as  pollutant  fate  and  transport,  resource  identification  and  pro-
tection  strategies,  shoreline  cleanup  assessment,  and  natural  resource  trustee  co-
ordination. 

NOAA’s  response  to  each  incident  is  dependent  upon  the  spill’s  characteristics. 
Scientific coordination is critical. Through experience, expertise, and state-of-the-art 
technology NOAA forecasts the movement and behavior of spilled oil, evaluates the 
risk to resources, and recommends protection priorities and appropriate cleanup ac-
tions. 

Effective spill response depends on effective planning and preparation. NOAA pro-
motes preparedness by working closely with Regional Response Teams on a variety 
of  issues  including  dispersant  use,  best  cleanup  practices,  communications,  and  re-
sponse  organization.  In  addition,  NOAA  enhances  the  state-of-readiness  by  devel-
oping better response tools including trajectory models, fate models, and integration 
of  improved  weather  data  and  data  from  ocean  observing  systems  into  spill  trajec-
tory forecasts. 
NOAA’s Restoration and Damage Assessment Role 

Oil  spills  can  harm  natural  resources  in  a  number  of  ways.  The  most  immediate 
and  visible  impacts  may  be  oiled  beaches  and  injured  or  dead  organisms,  such  as 
fish, lobsters, birds, and wetland plants. Other impacts may not be readily apparent 
and may not show up for weeks, months, or even years. Nurseries for fish or nesting 
sites  for  birds  and  turtles  may  be  destroyed,  and  birds  and  other  wildlife  may  be-
come ill from eating contaminated food. 

Wetlands  may  slowly  be  destroyed  several  months  after  an  incident,  coral  reefs 
may  continue  to  erode  and  be  more  susceptible  to  disease,  and  fish  may  be  unable 
to  reproduce.  A  spill  may  also  diminish  the  services  that  natural  resources  provide 
us, such as fishing, boating, beach going, and wildlife viewing, as well as ecological 
services,  such  as  providing  habitat,  nutrient  cycling,  and  energy  transfer  through 
food webs. 

Many  factors  affect  how  quickly  restoration  actions  can  be  implemented  and  how 
fast recovery can occur. These factors include the type of resource that was injured, 
the time of year it was injured, and the type, amount, and duration of the oil spilled. 
In  some  circumstances,  natural  recovery  may  be  sufficient  to  restore  resources.  In 
other instances, active restoration efforts may be necessary. 

NOAA and other natural resource trustees ensure that restoration projects satisfy 
the  OPA’s  goal  of  restoring  natural  resources  and  services  to  baseline  (the  pre-inci-
dent  condition)  and  compensating  the  public  for  interim  losses  resulting  from  the 
injury.  Trustees  are  responsible  for  two  types  of  restoration:  primary  and  compen-
satory.  The  purpose  of  primary  restoration  action  is  to  return  the  injured  natural 
resources  and  services  to  baseline  conditions,  while  the  purpose  of  compensatory 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

restoration is to compensate the public for losses occurring from the time of the inci-
dent  to  the  return  of  injured  resources  and  services  to  baseline.  In  developing  pri-
mary restoration plans, trustees focus on actions that accelerate the recovery of the 
injured resources, such as reconstructing physical habitat that was destroyed. In de-
veloping  compensatory  restoration  plans,  trustees  ensure  that  restoration  projects 
address the period from injury until recovery. This is vital because while a resource 
is  impaired,  it  is  unable  to  provide  services  on  which  other  parts  of  the  ecosystem 
and the public rely. 

NOAA  scientists  and  economists  provide  the  technical  foundation  for  natural  re-
source  damage  assessments  and  work  with  other  trustees  and  responsible  parties 
to restore resources injured by oil spills. To accomplish this effort NOAA experts col-
lect data, conduct studies, and perform analyses needed to determine whether coast-
al resources have sustained injury from oil spills. NOAA experts determine how best 
to  restore  injured  resources  and  to  ascertain  the  most  appropriate  restoration 
projects to compensate the public for associated lost services. 

Regulations  promulgated  by  NOAA  under  OPA  provide  a  framework  for  con-
ducting natural resource damage assessments when oil spills injure the public’s nat-
ural  resources.  The  regulations  require  the  following  steps  in  the  natural  resource 
damage assessment process: 

1. Preassessment—Trustees evaluate data on impacts to natural resources to de-
termine  whether  natural  resources  and  their  associated  services  have  been  in-
jured; 
2.  Restoration  Planning—Trustees  quantify  injuries  to  natural  resources  and 
their  services  and  use  that  information  to  determine  the  type  and  scale  of  res-
toration activities that fully compensate the public for the injures; and 
3.  Restoration  Implementation—Trustees,  often  working  with  those  responsible 
for the release, implement restoration actions. 

NOAA has long been interested in looking at alternative ways to expedite and cut 
costs for natural resource damage assessment. One alternative is the cooperative as-
sessment  in  which  the  Responsible  Party  plays  a  major  role  with  the  natural  re-
source  trustees.  Based  on  NOAA’s  successful  experiences  in  cooperative  assess-
ments,  NOAA  is  promoting  this  approach  through  national  and  regional  dialogues. 
The  intent  is  to  expedite  restoration,  encourage  innovative  approaches,  strengthen 
partnerships,  and  provide  meaningful  public  involvement.  Cooperative  assessments 
offer  industry  the  opportunity  for  a  greater  role  and  more  control  over  the  timing 
of restoration actions without undermining the natural resource trustee responsibil-
ities. This approach also reduces damage assessment costs and the risk of litigation. 
Environmental and Navigation Safety at Work 

A catastrophic discharge of oil or hazardous materials remains one of the greatest 
threats  facing  the  Olympic  Coast  National  Marine  Sanctuary.  Reducing  this  threat 
has  been  one  of  NOAA’s  highest  priorities.  The  Sanctuary,  the  third  largest  in  the 
United  States,  sits  at  the  entrance  to  the  Strait  of  Juan  de  Fuca,  a  major  commer-
cial thoroughfare linking the ports of Seattle, Tacoma, and Vancouver, with trading 
partners  around  the  Pacific  Rim.  The  juxtaposition  of  such  an  important  inter-
national  trade  route  and  a  national  marine  sanctuary  requires  the  balancing  of  po-
litical, social, economic, and natural resource issues. 

NOAA worked with the USCG to propose that the International Maritime Organi-
zation  approve  and  adopt  an  ‘‘Area  To  Be  Avoided’’  (ATBA)  off  the  Olympic  Coast. 
This  ATBA,  which  went  into  effect  in  June  1995,  advises  operators  of  vessels  car-
rying  petroleum  and  hazardous  materials  to  maintain  a  25-mile  buffer  from  the 
coast.  This  distance  narrows  as  the  vessel  traffic  lanes  converge  at  the  entrance  to 
the  Strait  of  Juan  de  Fuca.  Since  the  ATBA  was  adopted,  Olympic  Coast  National 
Marine Sanctuary has ensured that information on the ATBA is included on the ap-
propriate nautical charts and in relevant publications. 

It is important to note that the boundaries of the ATBA and of the Sanctuary are 
not  contiguous.  National  marine  sanctuaries  are  not  exclusionary  areas  (e.g.,  com-
mercial  fishing  and  shipping  occur  within  Olympic  Coast  National  Marine  Sanc-
tuary).  While  the  designation  of  the  ATBA  has  improved  maritime  and  environ-
mental  safety  within  the  Sanctuary,  it  is  only  one  means  of  reducing  risk.  NOAA 
has been participating in other initiatives reviewing additional measures to improve 
maritime and environmental safety in the region. 

NOAA  has  Navigation  Response  Teams  (NRTs)  that  conduct  hazardous  obstruc-
tions surveys using diving operations, electronic navigation capture, data collection, 
and mapping support capabilities to locate potential navigation impediments and to 
prevent  a  spill.  NRTs  also  perform  emergency  response  surveys  at  the  request  of 
the  USCG  to  locate  obstructions  that  may  have  caused  a  spill.  An  NRT  is  on  hand 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

365 days a year in the State of Washington to support NOAA’s mission of promoting 
safe marine navigation. 

NOAA  has  identified  the  navigable  approaches  to  the  Puget  Sound  as  one  of  the 
critical  areas  in  the  national  hydrographic  survey  backlog.  In  Fiscal  Year  2006, 
NOAA  expects  to  conduct  surveys  around  Puget  Sound,  as  well  as  in  Alaska,  the 
Gulf  of  Mexico,  and  along  the  East  Coast.  This  project  will  provide  essential  chart 
data  and  reduce  the  ‘‘critical  areas’’  backlog  for  hydrographic  surveys.  Additionally, 
this project will provide a response to requests from the Puget Sound Pilots Associa-
tion  for  such  a  survey.  The  Association  is  concerned  with  this  area  because  four 
major traffic lanes cross here, there are shoals in the vicinity of those traffic lanes, 
and the area experiences a high density of traffic. 

NOAA’s  Physical  Oceanographic  Real  Time  System  (PORTS)  provides  quality 
controlled real-time oceanographic (water levels, currents, water temperature, salin-
ity,  etc.)  and  meteorological  (wind  speed,  direction,  air  temperature,  barometric 
pressure, etc.) data in support of safe and efficient marine navigation. PORTS data 
also  helps  support  response  efforts  when  spills  occur  by  providing  responders  with 
a  better  understanding  of  their  operational  environment  and  improving  trajectory 
model  forecasts.  There  are  currently  12  PORTS around  the  nation,  including  one 
in  Tacoma,  WA,  in  partnership  with  the  Port  of  Tacoma.  PORTS is  recognized  as 
a backbone system within the Integrated Ocean Observing System (IOOS). 

A fully implemented IOOS would make observations and model data from various 
local,  state,  and  Federal  agencies  available  for  spill  response.  This  would  include 
real-time  and  historical  observations  and  products  for  meteorological,  physical 
oceanographic,  and  biological  parameters.  The  resulting  enhancement  of  data  man-
agement  and  communications  would  improve  the  quality  and  quantity  of  model 
input  and  output  for  spill  trajectory  modeling.  IOOS  would  provide  emergency  re-
sponders  with  access  to  unprecedented  amounts  of  real-time  and  historical  data  for 
decisionmaking  regarding  spill  response  and  mitigation.  The  envisioned  Northwest 
Association of Networked Ocean Observing Systems component of IOOS would meet 
local  needs  and  requirements  of  the  region  and  enhance  response  and  decision-
making support in the event of a spill. 
Examples of Response and Restoration at Work 

The  USCG  is  notified  of  approximately  20,000  incidents  annually  in  the  United 
States,  including  approximately  500  annually  in  the  Puget  Sound  region.  Fortu-
nately, large spills are infrequent, and most incidents are small fuel spills and mys-
tery sheens reported in marinas and harbors, or spills from terrestrial sources such 
as truck accidents. The average spill report in Puget Sound is 20 gallons. However, 
anywhere vessels transit, there is a risk of spills, and the risk is not only from tank 
vessels.  Daily  transits  of  fishing  vessels,  ferries,  cruise  ships,  naval  vessels,  and 
even large yachts can pose a threat of spills. A typical Alaska-bound cruise ship may 
carry  in  excess  of  500,000  gallons  of  fuel  while  an  ocean-going  tug  may  carry  over 
100,000 gallons of fuel and lube oils. 

Over  the  past  2  years,  NOAA  has  assisted  the  USCG  in  several  spills  in  the  re-

gion including the following: 

• Mystery Spill, Port Townsend, April 2005—Unknown (small) amount 
• Dalco Passage Incident, October 2004 (1,500–2,000 gallons) 
• Foss Barge, Pt. Wells, December 2003 (4,600 gallons) 
Now I would like to illustrate NOAA’s recent efforts in regards to Northwest and 

Alaska oil spills. 
M/V Selendang Ayu 

During  a  major  winter  storm  event  on  December  8,  2004,  the  cargo  vessel  M/V 
Selendang Ayu lost power, ran aground and broke in half on the shore of Unalaska 
Island,  within  Alaskan  waters  of  the  Bering  Sea  and  part  of  the  Alaska  Maritime 
National  Wildlife  Refuge.  The  Selendang  Ayu  loaded  here  in  Seattle,  with  approxi-
mately  60,000  tons  of  soybeans,  and  was  destined  for  China  via  the  Great  Circle 
Route.  That  navigation  route  took  the  vessel  through  Unimak  Pass  in  the  Aleutian 
Islands. During rescue operations, six Selendang Ayu crew members were lost at sea 
when  a  USCG  helicopter  crashed.  Approximately  335,000  gallons  of  fuel  oil  and 
other  miscellaneous  machine  oils  were  subsequently  released  to  the  environment. 
Most of the cargo was also released to the environment. 

During  the  initial  response,  NOAA  participated  in  aerial  observations  and  map-
ping of floating and shoreline oiling, as well as provided on-scene weather informa-
tion,  including  the  establishment  of  an  emergency  remote  weather  station  and  the 
provision of a dedicated on-scene meteorologist. This expertise enabled focused oper-
ations during a severe weather time of the year. Without accurate, up-to-date, spot- 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

specific  forecasts,  it  would  not  have  been  possible  to  safely  conduct  complicated  op-
erations in such an extreme environment. To give an example of the difficult nature 
of  work  involved,  a  special  Chinook  helicopter  was  used  to  remove  the  remaining 
140,000  gallons  of  fuel  on  the  Selendang  Ayu  in  2,000  gallon  fuel  canisters,  one  at 
a time, through the mountains 25 miles to Dutch Harbor. 

The NOAA SSC also coordinated environmental issues for the Unified Command, 
including  technical  issues  related  to  potential  dispersant  use;  prepared  short  and 
long-term  trajectory  forecasts  for  the  residual  oil  onboard;  reviewed  satellite  data 
and  remote  sensing  information  for  potential  utilization;  and  responded  to  a  USCG 
request for assistance in locating the flight recorder of their downed helicopter. 

NOAA  also  worked  with  the  local  community  to  address  subsistence  and  seafood 
safety concerns. The Port of Dutch Harbor on Unalaska Island processes the largest 
volume of fish of any port in the United States. Many of these vessels and fishermen 
come from the Puget Sound region, and concerns were widespread regarding the po-
tential closure of fisheries, or potential market impacts if any seafood products were 
contaminated. There was particular concern for the Bering Sea crab and trawl fish-
eries.  The  crab  fleet  delivers  its  catch  alive  with  constantly  circulating  sea  water 
through  the  vessel  holds,  while  the  trawl  vessels  use  large  nets  that  could  become 
contaminated during deployment and retrieval. Any real or perceived contamination 
of  these  fisheries  products  could  cause  world-wide  marketing  problems  for  Alaska 
seafood  products.  With  a  combination  of  trajectory  analysis  and  advice  on  moni-
toring techniques, NOAA was able to provide assistance to the Seafood Safety Task 
Force.  Similar  concerns  were  expressed  for  the  safety  of  the  subsistence  foods  har-
vested  from  the  sea  and  inter-tidal  zones.  As  the  result  of  information  gained  fol-
lowing  the  Exxon  Valdez  spill  and  other  spills  that  NOAA  has  worked  on,  we  were 
able  to  provide  meaningful  input,  based  on  actual  experiences,  as  a  member  of  the 
Subsistence Foods Task Force. 

NOAA  continues  to  work  with  the  other  natural  resource  trustees  (U.S.  Fish  & 
Wildlife Service and the State of Alaska) and the responsible party to conduct a nat-
ural resource damage assessment. The parties are conducting a preliminary assess-
ment of potential injuries to natural resources and beginning to evaluate restoration 
alternatives. Categories of potential injuries include: shorelines (including inter-tidal 
habitat, wetlands, beaches, shoreline vegetation); aquatic resources (including crabs, 
salmon,  and  other  anadromous  fish  species);  birds  (including  seabirds,  gulls,  and 
shorebirds);  wildlife  (including  sea  otters  and  sea  lions)  and  human  uses  (including 
impacts to subsistence, cultural, and recreational uses). 

We  have  learned  that  the  public  has  confidence  in  NOAA’s  ability  to  deal  with 
the diverse issues that surround an oil spill. The public relies on our experience and 
knowledge  to  assist  their  local  agencies  that  do  not  have  the  same  level  of  spill  re-
sponse  experience.  NOAA  and  other  trustees  are  committed  to  providing  the  public 
with  up-to-date  information  and  meaningful  opportunities  for  review  and  comment 
during  the  preliminary  assessment  and  restoration  planning  process.  Public  meet-
ings will be held later this year on Unalaska Island to convey to the public the sta-
tus of the damage assessment activities and to solicit input on potential restoration 
alternatives.  Public  review  and  comment  of  the  draft  restoration  plan  and  environ-
mental  assessment  report  will  also  be  sought  later  in  the  damage  assessment  and 
restoration planning process. 
Foss Barge, Point Wells 

On  December  30,  2003,  a  transfer  accident  at  the  Point  Wells  Asphalt  terminal 
in Shoreline, WA, resulted in a spill of approximately 4,600 gallons of heavy bunker 
fuel.  The  oil  spread  across  central  Puget  Sound  and  much  of  the  oil  stranded  be-
tween  Point  Jefferson  and  Indianola  in  Kitsap  County.  Unfortunately,  a  pristine 
marsh  and  shoreline  area  managed  by  the  Suquamish  Tribe  was  hard-hit.  The  Do- 
Kag-Wats marsh was heavily oiled and significant cleanup issues were raised in this 
culturally and biologically sensitive area. 

NOAA provided several services to the response and on-going assessment, includ-
ing  tracking  the  floating  oil,  evaporation  and  dispersion  predictions,  systematic 
shoreline surveys, seafood sampling, and natural resource damage assessment stud-
ies.  NOAA  is  currently  working  with  the  State,  the  U.S.  Fish  &  Wildlife  Service, 
and the Suquamish Tribe in the completion of a cooperative damage assessment. 
Dalco Pass 

On October 14, 2004, the USCG received a report of a mystery oil spill in the vi-
cinity of Dalco Passage in southern Puget Sound. NOAA and Washington State con-
ducted  flights  over  the  area  the  next  day  and  estimated  that  1,500–2,000  gallons 
of  product  had  been  released  and  was  spreading,  mostly  around  Vashon  Island. 
Weather conditions were nearly calm during this time. As a result, the oil was able 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

to  slowly  spread  over  a  large  area  giving  the  appearance  that  a  large  volume  of  oil 
had been released. Response teams treated the impacted beaches promptly and thor-
oughly, and the cleanup of all oiled beaches was signed-off as complete by the Uni-
fied Command only 2 weeks after the spill was first reported. Follow-up inspections 
indicated  little  to  no  apparent  environmental  impact.  In  total,  one  bird  was  killed 
and  one  was  cleaned  and  released.  Several  dead  harbor  seal  pups  were  collected 
during the spill but necropsy results found no link to the spill. 
Whatcom Creek 

Perhaps  the  most  significant  recent  spill  incident  in  the  Puget  Sound  region  was 
the 1999 Olympic Pipe Line Company spill into Whatcom Creek in Bellingham, WA. 
This  spill  highlights  the  fact  that  vessels  are  not  responsible  for  all  oil  pollution 
events;  land-based  sources  of  oil  can  also  invade  the  marine  environment  and  have 
significant impacts. The restoration efforts for the June 10, 1999, gasoline spill illus-
trate  NOAA’s  damage  assessment  functions  at  a  spill,  and  highlight  the  benefits  of 
NOAA regulations that encourage cooperative and restoration-based damage assess-
ment. 

The  incident  resulted  in  the  release  of  approximately  236,000  gallons  of  gasoline 
into  Whatcom  Creek,  Bellingham,  WA.  The  spilled  gasoline  ignited,  burning  much 
of  the  riparian  vegetation  including  a  large  section  of  mature  forest  in  an  urban 
park. Whatcom Creek and adjacent forests, parks, and open-space areas are impor-
tant  ecological  and  recreational  resources  for  the  City  of  Bellingham.  During  the 
past decade, a concerted effort by local governments, tribes, nonprofit organizations, 
and private citizens has lead to habitat improvements in and along Whatcom Creek. 
The creek also has important cultural and subsistence values. The creek falls within 
the 1855 Point Elliott Treaty Area for the Lummi Nation and Nooksack Tribe. 

The  fire  that  resulted  from  the  Olympic  Pipeline  Oil  Company  spill  killed  three 
people,  and  the  combination  of  the  fire  and  toxic  levels  of  hydrocarbons  eliminated 
nearly  all  aquatic  biota  from  the  spill  site  to  the  mouth  of  the  creek.  Over  100,000 
fish  were  killed.  Affected  biota  included  several  species  of  juvenile  salmonids,  in-
cluding  chinook  salmon.  Most  of  the  dead  salmonids  were  fry  and  smolts.  Over  26 
acres  of  forest,  including  approximately  16  acres  of  mature  riparian  forest  within 
the adjacent park, was lost as a result of the fire. 

Shortly  after  the  incident,  NOAA  and  the  State  and  tribal  trustees  entered  into 
a cooperative assessment process with Olympic Pipe Line Company. NOAA was the 
lead  administrative  trustee  and  worked  to  develop  both  emergency  and  long-term 
restoration plans for the creek. This cooperative process reduced duplication of stud-
ies,  increased  the  cost-effectiveness  of  the  assessment  process,  increased  sharing  of 
information,  and,  most  importantly,  sped  the  restoration  process.  Because  salmon 
would  be  returning  to  spawn  in  the  creek  in  the  months  following  the  spill,  a  con-
certed effort was made to conduct early restoration in the stream. At the same time, 
data were collected for long-term restoration needs. A number of emergency projects 
were  implemented  and  salmon  successfully  spawned  in  the  fall  after  the  incident. 
A  long-term  plan  was  prepared  and  finalized  following  a  period  of  public  comment. 
NOAA  worked  closely  with  Washington  State,  the  City  of  Bellingham,  the  Lummi 
Nation,  and  the  Nooksack  Tribe,  and  successfully  protected  funding  for  the  long- 
term  restoration  plan.  This  plan  includes  projects  that  are  currently  being  imple-
mented  in  the  following  areas:  Land  Acquisition  and  Park  Enhancements,  Fish 
Habitat Projects, and a Long-term Monitoring and Maintenance. 
Conclusion 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  talk  about  NOAA’s  important  role  under  OPA. 
NOAA’s expertise is critical to prevent further harm, restore adverse effects on nat-
ural  resources,  aid  planning  and  response  decisionmaking,  and  document  damages 
associated with oil spills. I look forward to any questions that you may have. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you, Mr. Helton. Mr. Jensen. 

STATEMENT OF DALE JENSEN, PROGRAM MANAGER, 
SPILL PREVENTION, PREPAREDNESS, AND RESPONSE, 

WASHINGTON STATE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY 

Mr.  JENSEN.  Senator  Cantwell,  welcome  to  our  beautiful  state, 

and thank you—— 

There’s a button there. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  You  might  have  to  turn  on  your  mike  there. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

Mr.  JENSEN.  Oh,  sorry.  Senator  Cantwell,  welcome  to  our  beau-
tiful  state,  and  thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to  testify  today  on 
the  state  of  oil  spill  prevention,  preparedness,  and  response  in 
Washington.  First,  on  behalf  of  the  staff  of  the  Ecology  Spills  Pro-
gram I would like to thank you, Senator Cantwell, and other Mem-
bers  of  the  Senate  for  your  leadership  for  including  in  the  Energy 
Policy  Act  the  fix  for  the  Oil  Spill  Liability  Trust  Fund.  I  would 
also  like  to  express  the  gratitude  of  the  members  of  the  Pacific 
States/BC  Task  Force.  Your  passage  of  the  funding  provision  will 
ensure  that  oil  spill  cleanup  actions  will  continue  to  be  done  in  a 
timely  manner,  safeguarding  our  valuable  natural  resources. 
Again, thank you for your efforts on this issue. 

Washingtonians  demand  that  we  are  not  only  vigilant  in  our  ef-
forts to prevent oil spills, but that we are also prepared for a rapid 
and  aggressive  response  in  the  event  of  a  spill.  Our  citizens  have 
a  very  high  expectation  for  an  active  state  oil  spills  program,  and 
we are meeting those expectations. 

As  a  leader  in  state  oil  spill  prevention  preparedness  and  re-
sponse,  we  work  closely  with  our  Coast  Guard  partners,  industry, 
and  stakeholders  to  develop  a  comprehensive  and  innovative  oil 
spill program. And I’m proud to report that these efforts have been 
successful. Over the past 2 years, Department of Ecology vessel in-
spectors  have  conducted  over  2,500  inspections.  In  one  case,  an 
Ecology inspector identified a problem onboard an Evergreen Inter-
national vessel and worked closely with the Coast Guard and Fed-
eral  investigators,  leading  to  a  $25  million  settlement  with  the 
company that led to greater worldwide focus on illegal waste while 
dumping. 

We  have  also  seen  a  decline  in  the  number  of  spills  in  the  25- 
to 10,000-gallon range. We are now responding to 99 percent of all 
reported spills within a 48-hour period. These successes have come 
from the dedication of a highly skilled and trained staff at the Ecol-
ogy  Spills  Program  and  from  the  commitment  of  many  companies 
and stakeholders who all share a pride in ensuring the highest de-
gree of prevention and preparedness possible. 

But with these successes we still are faced with many challenges. 
Our  experience  in  the  Dalco  Passage  spill  demonstrates  the  need 
to  have  the  appropriate  response  equipment  on  the  scene  quickly. 
There’s  much  that  still  needs  to  be  done  to  ensure  that  we  can  re-
spond  quickly  with  the  most  effective  spill  containment  and  clean-
up resources available. 

Since  the  Dalco  Passage  spill  we’ve  partnered  with  the  Coast 
Guard  to  create  and  work  with  the  Oil  Spill  Early  Action  Task 
Force as Captain Boothe mentioned. We capitalized on the incident 
to approve our ability to assess and track spills in the dark. We are 
streamlining  our  access  to  aerial  and  on-water  reconnaissance  ca-
pabilities. We are updating local knowledge specific Geographic Re-
sponse Plans, making sure all private-sector response resources can 
immediately be called upon to respond to an orphan spill. Growing 
from our lessons learned, we will continue to strengthen the critical 
functions  provided  by  my  Program’s  Incident  Management  Action 
Team. 

We will continue to evaluate and test our spill response capabili-
ties  to  ensure  that  we  have  the  most  effective  program  possible. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

Congress  can  help  in  this  effort  by  providing  funding,  particularly 
for capital needs as well as cleanup response. 

Since  2001,  the  Coast  Guard  has  been  faced  with  increased  de-
mand  for  and  participation  in  homeland  security  activities.  In  our 
region,  the  Coast  Guard  has  stepped  up  to  these  new  challenges 
with  exceptional  professionalism.  However,  the  Agency  is  also  fac-
ing  budget  constraints  due  to  a  declining  Federal  budget  and  in-
creasing  need  in  the  various  aspects  of  our  National  War  on  Ter-
rorism.  We’re  concerned  that  these  new  responsibilities  and  pres-
sures  on  the  Coast  Guard  will  impact  their  activities  in  the  area 
of oil spill prevention and response. 

Currently  the  13th  District  Coast  Guard  has  done  an  out-
standing  job  in  balancing  these  demands;  however,  we  urge  Con-
gress to provide more resources to the Coast Guard commensurate 
with the increased demands that are placed on the Agency. 

We  should  also  look  to  states  as  partners  to  help  with  these  de-
mands.  We  should  remember  that  it  was  a  talented  Ecology  Spills 
vessel  inspector  who  first  caught  the  problem  leading  to  the  pen-
alty  to  Evergreen  Shipping.  This  is  a  perfect  example  of  how  the 
state  can  assist  our  Federal  partners  in  oil  spill  prevention,  pre-
paredness, and response. 

Congress  should  consider  methods  by  which  they  can  support 
state  actions  on  oil  spill  prevention,  preparedness,  and  response. 
These actions don’t necessarily have to be funding. Improved regu-
latory authority and flexibility for states can also provide for some 
relief  for  the  Coast  Guard,  as  well  as  increased  cooperation  with 
states. 

One  area  that  needs  additional  attention  is  salvage.  I  strongly 
encourage  the  Coast  Guard  to  complete  the  salvage  role.  In  re-
sponse  to  an  incident  where  fuel  oil  was  spilled  during  a  transfer 
from the facility to a tank barge, the Washington State legislature 
directed  the  spills  program  to  report  on  the  scope  of  oil  and  fuel 
transfers in Puget Sound and to develop standards for these trans-
fers. 

Our  report  will  be  completed  in  the  next  few  months,  but  our 
preliminary  assessment  is  that  information  on  cargo  and  fueling 
volume,  frequency,  location,  and  practices  is  not  consistently  re-
quired and is often incompletely reported. We believe there are reg-
ulatory gaps that our standards can cover that will result in fewer 
spills to water. The next steps in this process will be to work with 
the  Coast  Guard  and  others  on  the  specifics  of  the  rule  and  the 
monitoring program that the state will develop. 

In  2000,  the  U.S.  Supreme  Court  issued  their  decision  on 
Intertanko  v  Locke,  a  seminal  case  in  Federal/State  regulation  of 
shipping. Prior to the decision, Washington had a very detailed and 
aggressive  oil  spill  prevention  program  for  oil  tankers  and  tank 
barges. 

In  brief,  the  court  ruled  that  many  aspects  of  the  state  program 
are preempted by Federal law and historic Congressional action in 
the area of shipping. As a result, much of our state oil spill preven-
tion, preparedness, and response program was struck down. 

This  has  created  a  difficult  situation  where  the  people  of  Wash-
ington  have  very  high  expectations  as  to  the  degree  of  protection 
from the risk of oil spills that they would like to see for our State, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

but  Federal  law  limits  the  scope  of  an  oil  spill  program.  Congress 
can assist in reducing this legal tension by supporting joint cooper-
ative opportunities between states and the Coast Guard. 

Understanding the nature of shipping and the need for a certain 
degree  of  uniform  standards,  Congress  should  also  consider  allow-
ing neighboring states to work together as a region to develop solu-
tions  and  standards  in  the  area  of  oil  spill  prevention,  prepared-
ness and response. 

In  conclusion,  we  must  remember  the  proud  tradition  in  our 
state  of  protecting  our  precious  natural  resources  from  the  risk  of 
oil  spills.  Residents  of  Washington  demand  that  we  maintain  a 
high degree of vigilance and a rapid and aggressive response to all 
major  spills.  We  must  also  remember  that  companies,  including 
shippers and oil facilities of types, consider themselves residents of 
our  great  state.  They  too  share  in  this  desire  to  protect  our  re-
sources. 

We will continue to work collaboratively with the Coast Guard as 
we develop our oil spill prevention, preparedness and response pro-
gram. And we are ready to provide support for the Coast Guard as 
they operate in an increasingly demanding and challenging atmos-
phere. 

And finally, Congress can help by funding for oil spill prevention, 
preparedness and response activities. Again, thank you for this op-
portunity to testify, and I’d be happy to answer any questions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Jensen follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DALE JENSEN, PROGRAM MANAGER, SPILL PREVENTION, 
PREPAREDNESS, AND RESPONSE, WASHINGTON STATE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY 
Senator  Cantwell  and  members  of  the  Subcommittee,  welcome  to  our  beautiful 
state,  and  thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to  testify  today  on  the  state  of  oil  spill 
prevention, preparedness and response in Washington. 

First,  on  behalf  of  the  staff  at  the  Ecology  Spills  Program,  I  would  like  to  thank 
Senator  Cantwell,  and  other  Members  of  the  Senate,  for  including  in  the  Energy 
Policy Act the fix for the Oil Spill Liability Trust Fund. I would also like to express 
the  gratitude  of  the  members  of  the  Pacific  States/BC  Oil  Spill  Task  Force.  The 
long-term sustainability of the Fund is a priority issue for the Task Force. Your pas-
sage of the funding provision will ensure that oil spill response and cleanup actions 
will  continue  to  be  done  in  a  timely  manner,  safeguarding  our  valuable  natural  re-
sources. Again, thank you for your efforts on this issue. 

We have a proud tradition in our state of active citizen and state agency involve-
ment  in  oil  spill  prevention.  Washingtonians  demand  that  we  are  not  only  vigilant 
in  our  efforts  to  prevent  oil  spills,  but  that  we  are  also  prepared  for  a  rapid  and 
aggressive response in the event of a spill. Our citizens have very high expectations 
for an active state oil spills program, and we are meeting those expectations. 

As a leader in state oil spill prevention, preparedness and response we work close-
ly with our U.S. Coast Guard partners, industry, and stakeholders to develop a com-
prehensive  and  innovative  oil  spill  program.  And  I’m  proud  to  report  that  these  ef-
forts have been successful. 

Over  the  past  2  years,  Department  of  Ecology  vessel  inspectors  have  conducted 
over  2,500  inspections.  In  one  case,  an  Ecology  inspector  identified  a  problem  on-
board  an  Evergreen  International  vessel  and  worked  closely  with  the  Coast  Guard 
and Federal investigators leading to a $25 million settlement with the company. 

We  have  also  seen  a  decline  in  the  number  of  spills  in  the  25  to  10,000  gallon 
range.  And  we  are  now  responding  to  99  percent  of  all  reported  spills  within  the 
first 48 hours. 

These  successes  have  come  from  the  dedication  of  a  highly  skilled  and  trained 
staff  at  the  Ecology  Spills  Program,  and  from  the  commitment  of  many  companies 
and stakeholders who all share a pride in ensuring the highest degree of prevention 
and preparedness possible. 

But with these successes we still are faced with many challenges: 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

1. The need for adequate spill response capacity to stage an aggressive spill re-
sponse in the event of a spill. 
2.  Concerns  regarding  new  pressures  on  the  Coast  Guard—increased  emphasis 
on  homeland  security  and  budget  limitations—and  how  these  will  impact  deci-
sions. 
3. New information on oil transfers and the risk they pose to our environment. 
4. Limitations placed on the state in the Intertanko decision, while at the same 
time Washington’s citizens expect an aggressive program to prevent spills, pre-
pare for the potential of a spill, and a rapid and effective response in the event 
of a spill. 

Spill Response Capacity 

Immediately  following  the  Dalco  Passage  spill  in  October  2004,  then-Governor 
Locke  and  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard  established  the  Oil  Spill  Early  Action  Task  Force. 
Consisting of representatives of environmental groups, industry, spill response orga-
nizations, local communities and local government, and tribes, the Task Force exam-
ined  our  spill  response  and  planning  procedures  focusing  on  the  first  hours  of  re-
sponse.  Working  in  a  very  short  time-frame,  the  Task  Force  produced  eleven  rec-
ommendations for improving our response capabilities. But they also recognized that 
‘‘full implementation of the recommendations is outside the funding currently avail-
able to Ecology and the Coast Guard for these activities.’’ 

In  a  recent  report  for  Ecology,  Glosten  Associates  studied  the  possibility  of  uti-
lizing commercial fishing vessels to assist in oil spill response. As part of this report, 
Glosten  conducted  a  ‘‘scenario-based’’  approach  to  determine  the  adequacy  of  spill 
response  vessels  in  the  event  of  a  hypothetical  spill  in  the  San  Juan  Islands  in  the 
amount of approximately 500,000 gallons of oil. The scenario identified the number 
of  vessels  for  an  ideal  response  to  such  a  spill,  and  evaluated  the  actual  number 
that would be available. This analysis revealed a shortfall of available response ves-
sels for this scenario. The report concluded that although current Oil Spill Response 
Organizations (OSROs) could provide all the on-water resources necessary for them 
to meet their current basic obligations, they could not meet the shortfalls identified 
in the report in addition to their current obligations. 

Our experience in the Dalco Passage spill demonstrated the need to have the ap-
propriate  response  equipment  on  the  scene  quickly.  This  recent  report  emphasizes 
that there is much that still needs to be done to ensure that we can respond quickly 
with the most effective spill containment and cleanup resources available. 

We learned many things as a result of the Dalco Passage spill: 

a.  We  partnered  with  the  USCG  to  create  and  work  with  the  Oil  Spill  Early 
Action Task Force 
b. We capitalized on the incident to improve our ability to assess and track spill 
in the dark; 
c.  We  are  streamlining  our  access  to  aerial  and  on-water  reconnaissance  capa-
bilities; 
d. Updating local knowledge specific Geographic Response Plans (GRPs); 
e.  Making  sure  all  private  sector  response  resources  can  immediately  be  called 
upon to respond to an orphan spill; 
f. Growing from our lessons learned. We will continue to strengthen the critical 
functions provided by my program’s Incident Management Action Team (IMAT). 
We will continue to evaluate and test our spill response capabilities to ensure that 

we have the most effective program possible. 

Congress  can  help  in  this  effort  by  providing  funding,  particularly  for  capital 
needs  as  well  as  cleanup  response.  The  Oil  Spill  Liability  Trust  Fund  is  critical  to 
this effort, and I want to thank Senator Cantwell for her leadership in securing con-
tinued funding for this account. 
Increased Coast Guard Responsibilities 

Since  2001,  the  Coast  Guard  has  been  faced  with  increased  demand  for  and  par-
ticipation  in  Homeland  Security  activities.  In  our  region,  the  Coast  Guard  has 
stepped-up  to  these  new  challenges  with  exceptional  professionalism.  However,  the 
agency  is  also  facing  budget  constraints  due  to  a  declining  Federal  budget  and  in-
creasing need in the various aspects of our national War on Terrorism. 

We  are  concerned  that  these  new  responsibilities  and  pressures  on  the  Coast 
Guard  will  impact  their  activities  in  the  area  of  oil  spill  prevention  and  response. 
Currently the regional MSO has done an outstanding job balancing these demands. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

However, we urge Congress to provide more resources to the Coast Guard commen-
surate with the increased demands that are placed on the agency. 

We don’t question the dedication and commitment to the women and men serving 
in the USCG, but we are concerned with these external pressures and demands. We 
must  maintain  our  vigilance  on  spill  prevention,  preparedness  and  response.  We 
should look to states as partners to help with these demands. 

Again, we should remember that it was a talented Ecology Spills vessel inspector 
who  first  caught  the  problem  leading  to  the  penalty  to  Evergreen  Shipping—this  is 
a  perfect  example  of  how  the  state  can  assist  our  Federal  partners  in  oil  spill  pre-
vention, preparedness and response. 

Another  example  of  state/Coast  Guard  cooperation  occurred  on  October  14,  2004, 
when  the  ConocoPhillips’  Polar  Texas  spilled  black  oil  at  Dalco  Passage,  near  Ta-
coma. At the time the spill was reported, the source of the spill was not known. This 
‘‘orphan  spill’’  required  the  close  cooperation  of  our  state  inspectors  and  the  U.S. 
Coast Guard. The response to this highly visible spill has triggered a new dimension 
in  spill  response  in  our  state.  Up  to  last  year,  our  system  for  managing  major  oil 
spills  relied  too  heavily  on  a  Responsible  Party  being  immediately  identified,  and 
participating in the spill response Unified Command. A lesson learned in the Dalco 
spill was that Ecology and the Coast Guard must be better prepared to immediately 
assess orphan spills at night and begin recovery operations during any weather con-
ditions. 

Congress  should  consider  methods  by  which  they  can  support  state  actions  on  oil 
spill  prevention,  preparedness  and  response.  As  I  will  discuss  later,  these  actions 
don’t necessary have to be funding. Improved regulatory authority and flexibility for 
states can also provide for some relief for the Coast Guard, as well as increased co-
operation with states. 
Increasing Risk From Oil Transfers 

On December 30, 2003, a tank barge was taking on bunker fuel at a facility near 
Shoreline, Washington in the middle of the night. The tank was overfilled and 4,620 
gallons  of  fuel  was  spilled  into  the  waters  of  Puget  Sound.  In  response  to  this  inci-
dent, the Washington State Legislature directed the spills program to report on the 
scope  of  oil  and  fuel  transfers  in  Puget  Sound  and  to  develop  standards  for  these 
transfers. 

Our report will be completed in the next few months, but our preliminary assess-
ment is that information on cargo and fueling volume, frequency, location and prac-
tices  is  not  consistently  required  and  is  often  incompletely  reported.  We  believe 
there  are  regulatory  gaps  that  our  standards  can  cover  that  will  result  in  fewer 
spills to water. The next steps in this process will be to work with the Coast Guard 
and  others  on  the  specifics  of  the  rule  and  the  monitoring  program  that  the  state 
will develop. 
Intertanko Limitations on State Activities 

In  2000,  the  U.S.  Supreme  Court  issued  their  decision  in  Intertanko  v.  Locke,  a 
seminal  case  in  Federal/state  regulation  of  shipping.  Prior  to  the  decision,  Wash-
ington  had  a  very  detailed  and  aggressive  oil  spill  prevention  program  for  oil  tank-
ers  and  tank  barges.  In  brief,  the  court  ruled  that  many  aspects  of  the  state  pro-
gram  are  preempted  by  Federal  law  and  historic  Congressional  action  in  the  area 
of  shipping.  As  a  result,  much  of  our  state  oil  spill  prevention,  preparedness  and 
response program was struck down. 

This  has  created  a  difficult  situation  where  the  people  of  Washington  have  very 
high  expectations  as  to  the  degree  of  protection  from  the  risk  of  oil  spills  that  they 
would  like  to  see  for  our  state,  but  Federal  law  limits  the  scope  of  an  oil  spill  pro-
gram. 

Congress  can  assist  in  reducing  this  legal  tension  by  supporting  joint  cooperative 
opportunities  between  states  and  the  Coast  Guard.  Understanding  the  nature  of 
shipping  and  the  need  for  a  certain  degree  of  uniform  standards,  Congress  should 
also  consider  allowing  neighboring  states  to  work  together  as  a  region  to  develop 
solutions  and  standards  in  the  area  of  oil  spill  prevention,  preparedness  and  re-
sponse. We already have some examples such as the Pacific States/BC Oil Spill Task 
Force, where states and the province of BC coordinate and share information on oil 
spill activities in the region. 

Congress  and  the  Administration  should  support  a  structure  where  the  Federal 
laws are a floor, and the states can implement a program to address the particular 
needs of the state or the region. The court in Intertanko allowed a degree of support 
for this approach when it acknowledged that there may be ‘‘peculiar circumstances’’ 
in a state that would allow for state specific regulation. Congress should codify this 
approach and expand it to regions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Conclusion 

25 

In  conclusion,  we  must  remember  the  proud  tradition  in  our  state  of  protecting 
our  precious  natural  resources  from  the  risk  of  oil  spills.  Residents  of  Washington 
demand  that  we  maintain  a  high  degree  of  vigilance,  and  a  rapid  and  aggressive 
response to all major spills. 

We  must  also  remember  that  companies,  including  shippers  and  oil  facilities  of 
types,  consider  themselves  residents  of  our  great  state,  and  they  too  share  in  this 
desire to protect our resources. 

We will continue to work collaboratively with the U.S. Coast Guard as we develop 
our  oil  spill  prevention,  preparedness  and  response  program.  And  we  stand  ready 
to  provide  support  for  the  Coast  Guard  as  they  operate  in  an  increasingly  demand-
ing and challenging atmosphere. 

And  finally,  Congress  can  help  by  continuing  to  provide  funding  for  oil  spill  pre-
vention,  preparedness  and  response  activities  by  both  the  Coast  Guard  and  the 
states.  Congress  should  also  explore  how  to  provide  states  and  regions  with  more 
authority and flexibility to address risks in their areas. 
Again, thank you for this opportunity to testify today. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
1
s
n
e

j

27 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Thank  you,  gentlemen,  for  your  testimony.  I 
should  have  said  at  the  outset  of  this  that  I  invited  my  colleagues 
to come join me today in Seattle and unfortunately I think our late-
ness  in  getting  out  of  Washington,  D.C.  and  our  schedule  made 
that  difficult.  So,  you’ll  have  to  bear  with  me  through  these  ques-
tions.  I  thought  I’d  start  with  just  a  few  questions  generally  to  all 
of you. First of all, I’m sure everybody would love to know the lat-
est on the Dalco spill and where we are. 

Mr.  Helton,  in  your  testimony  you  alluded  to  some  of  the  chal-
lenges in terms of where we are from a technology perspective, for 
example, for spills that happen at night and things of that nature. 
Where are we in terms of improving this process, and what further 
information do we need? 

It  looks  like  the  impacts  were  relatively  minor.  There  was  a,  I 
think one bird that was killed, one that was captured and released. 
There  were  several  harbor  seal  pups  that  were  collected.  All  of 
those, the chemistry on the oil spills did not match the oil from the 
spill, so they appeared to be oil from a creosote source or something 
else.  So  we’re  pretty  confident  that  the  environmental  impacts  are 
relatively  benign,  but  I  would  defer  to  the  state  and  the  Coast 
Guard about the investigation. 

Mr.  HELTON.  Well,  on  the  Dalco  Pass  there  are  obviously  lots  of 
things  going  on  in  terms  of  changing  the  way  Federal  and  State 
agencies  are  responding,  looking  at  new  technologies.  There’s  also 
the  ongoing  investigation  into  the  cause  of  the  incident,  which  I 
would defer to the Coast Guard and the state. 

But the third element that I’m aware of is the environmental as-
sessment  that  has  been  going  on  and  the—on  any  significant  spill 
there  is  a  natural  resource  damage  assessment.  The  state  and  the 
Federal agencies have regulations for how to pursue those. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
2
s
n
e

j

28 

Captain  BOOTHE.  Senator,  I  guess  I  can’t  really  comment  on  the 
investigation  at  this  point  since  it’s  with  the  U.S.  Attorney  and  he 
has  not  yet  decided  whether  to  pursue  criminal  action,  so  we’re 
awaiting  that  decision  so  that  we  may  move  forward  on  the  civil 
case as well. 

But  related  to  your  question  on  response  technologies,  and  in 
particular  remote  sensing  capability,  I  think  the  Dalco  Passage 
spill  presented  a  unique  set  of  circumstances  for  us  that  fortu-
nately  highlighted  a  weakness  in  our  system,  or  at  least  a  weak-
ness  in  our  prior  response  strategies.  The  fact  that  it  was  a  mys-
tery spill where we didn’t have a reporting source immediately tell 
us  that  they  discharged  oil,  caused  a  bit  of  a  problem  in  this  par-
ticular case. 

The U.S. Coast Guard probably responds within the Washington 
waters to in excess of 220 to 250 mystery spills each year, of which 
the Dalco Passage was one. Most of those spills, as Mr. Helton indi-
cated,  are  small  spills,  and  in  particular,  mystery  spills  are  typi-
cally  small  spills  that  the  person  that  discharges  probably  does  it 
most often intentionally. We don’t believe that to be the case in the 
Dalco  Passage  spill,  but  nonetheless,  clearly  we  don’t  normally 
have  a  spill  of  the  magnitude  of  the  Dalco  Passage  spill  as  a  mys-
tery spill. 

So the response in that particular case, I think, was perhaps col-
ored  by  that  experience  in  the  past  and  the  expectation  that  it 
might  be  a  small  spill,  despite  the  fact  that  it  had  been  reported 
as a heavy fuel spill. So we didn’t respond to assess that spill mag-
nitude quickly enough in my view, but nonetheless, there are other 
conditions  that  were  involved  in  it  since  it  occurred  at  2  o’clock  in 
the morning when we first got the report. 

And so there was a gear up phase that the Coast Guard and the 
State  went  through,  coordinating  and  communicating  with  one  an-
other,  and  establishing  a  game  plan  for  the  response.  All  that 
aside,  it  identified  that  maybe  there  is  technology  that  we  could 
use. 

We have Coast Guard helicopters that are equipped with forward 
looking  infrared  capabilities  that  might  have  been  brought  to  bear 
on that before fog set in. We did not employ that in the wee hours 
of  the  morning  on  October  14,  and  fortunately,  but  unfortunately 
perhaps,  we  haven’t  had  another  case  like  that  to  be  able  to  exer-
cise the system that we already have in place, or as we learned in 
the  response  to  the  Dalco  Passage  spill,  other  assets  that  exist 
within the community. King County has some remarkable infrared 
capabilities  as  well  that  we  have  added  to  our  inventory  of  re-
sponse capabilities. 

I  think  that  there  are  a  number  of  things  that  we  are  working 
on  to  improve  our  response.  I  think  the  Dalco  Passage  spill  makes 
us  a  lot  more,  if  you  will,  ‘‘trigger  happy’’  in  the  nature  of  our  re-
sponse, which is a good thing. We need alacrity in our response and 
we  need  to  make  sure  it’s  both  aggressive  and  appropriate.  So—— 
Senator  CANTWELL.  Of  those,  excuse  me,  Captain,  of  those  250 
mystery  spills  you  were  mentioning,  how  many  of  those  happened 
at night? 

Captain  BOOTHE.  Senator,  I’m  not  aware  of  the  percentage  that 

occurred at night versus daytime. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

Senator  CANTWELL.  So  with  respect  to  this  infrared  technology, 
I  guess  my  question  is,  does  this  particular  case  point  to  the  fact 
that  we  need  better  technology,  or  is  it,  as  you  say,  just  running 
our  current  system  with  a  little  bit  better  use  of  existing  tech-
nology? 

Captain  BOOTHE.  Senator,  as  is  the  case  with  computer  tech-
nology,  it  is  changing  so  rapidly  that  it’s  hard  for  me  to  assess 
whether  or  not  the  equipment  that  we  have  in  current  inventory 
is  sufficient  or  is  up-to-date  enough  to  be  able  to  give  us  the  best 
tools. Obviously it’s not cheap technology. 

So  one  of  the  strategies  we  looked  at  in  the  aftermath  of  the 
Dalco  Passage  spill  was,  instead  of  having  in-house  capability  in 
the  Coast  Guard  other  than  for  our  multi-mission  purposes,  that 
we  might  look  at  employing  outside  contractors  that  have  that  ca-
pability  and  have  trained  observers  in  the  use  of  that  equipment 
for oil spills in particular, in lieu of using just our top notch profes-
sional Coast Guard aviators with potentially pollution investigators 
and  observers  from  the  various  marine  safety  officer  sector  com-
mands  across  the  country.  I  think  we  probably  need  to  explore 
more exactly what capability we have and how good it is before we 
decide what the next steps are in terms of new equipment procure-
ment, ma’am. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Mr.  Jensen,  did  you  want  to  comment  on 

this—on the Dalco case? 

Mr.  JENSEN.  I  think,  you  know,  Captain  Boothe  and  Mr.  Helton 
covered  most  of  it.  I  think  just  to  add  to  that,  as  Captain  Boothe 
alluded  to  a  number  of  avenues,  I  think  where  we  are  now  is  how 
do  we  address  these  in  the  future.  And  so  looking  forward  to  the 
future,  and  looking  at  all  the  resources  capable,  we  are  going 
through  assessment  processes  right  now  to  see  what  additional  re-
sources  are  available  within,  you  know,  Puget  Sound.  And,  you 
know,  as  technology  changes,  we  want  to  take  advantage  of  every 
opportunity to improve our system within Puget Sound. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Thank  you.  You  all  mentioned  in  your  testi-
mony,  and  I  mentioned  it  in  my  statement,  that  we  were  very  for-
tunate  to  get  funding  for  the  Oil  Spill  Trust  Fund  reauthorized. 
And it’s probably a little known fact that this provision was buried 
in  the  Energy  Bill,  but  at  one  of  our  first  hearings  with  the  Coast 
Guard  it  was  clear  that  something  needed  to  be  done.  There  was 
some uncertainty about whether the trigger mechanism of the pro-
gram  just  reinstated  itself  or  whether  we  needed  to  reinstate  it, 
and  in  discussions  with  Senator  Stevens,  we  decided  we  needed  to 
do something proactive and that’s how we came to that legislation. 
I  don’t  think  at  the  time  we  thought  we  would  be  having  this 
hearing that we’d be so fast to move. Congress isn’t always so fast, 
but  in  this  particular  case  we’re  very  thankful  that  it  did  move 
quickly so that we know that we have a resource to use for cleanup 
and prevention activities. 

But, Captain Boothe, you mentioned in your testimony that there 
were  some  questions  about  funding  or  issues  in  which  maybe  the 
program liability or structure might be changed in the future? 

Captain  BOOTHE.  You  mean  the  management  by  the  National 

Pollution Fund Center, ma’am? 

Senator CANTWELL. Yes. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

low? 

Captain  BOOTHE.  No,  Senator,  I  don’t  believe  there’s  any  antici-
pation  that  they  would  change  the  structure  of  how  the  funding 
would be used and how they dispense those funds for the purposes 
of  emergency  response.  The  concern  that  I  expressed  in  my  state-
ment, Senator, was that obviously OPA and the Federal Water Pol-
lution  Control  Act  require  the  President  to  respond  to  all  spills, 
and  that  the  United  States  has  a  ‘‘no  discharge’’  or  a  ‘‘zero  toler-
ance,’’  if  you  will,  for  oil  spills  in  that  we  have  a  mandate  to  go 
clean it up. If we don’t have a viable funding source, then obviously 
that makes it a bigger challenge for the Coast Guard and the EPA 
and  the  states  involved  across  the  country  in  dealing  with  this 
threat to the environment. 

It  might  mean  that  we  would  be  faced  with  a  situation  similar 
to the Exxon Valdez where we really didn’t have an adequate fund 
in place to be able to respond nimbly to such an emergency of that 
magnitude. With the Oil Spill Liability Trust Fund solvent I think, 
and  for  a  continuing  sustainable  basis,  I  don’t  see  any  problem  for 
us to be able to respond—— 

Senator CANTWELL. So you don’t think the liability limits are too 

Captain  BOOTHE.  Oh,  yes,  ma’am,  I  think  that  that’s  a  different 
issue, and I think the premise or the tenet of OPA 90 was polluters 
should pay. And the liability caps were established on that premise 
that  we  expected  that  the  responsible  party  would  clean  up  and 
pay for that or finance that cleanup action. 

Right now the cap probably doesn’t address, as you mentioned in 
your  statement,  ma’am,  that  it  didn’t  address  the  Selendang  Ayu 
adequately or the Athos I spill, and so that means the Federal Gov-
ernment has to pick up the rest of that beyond the limit of liability. 
So I think there should be a raise to the liability caps. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Well,  do  you  have  a  suggestion?  Does  the 

Coast Guard have a suggestion on that? 

Captain  BOOTHE.  Well,  as  you  know,  I  guess  OPA  90  provided  a 
mechanism by which the limits of liability could be increased based 
on  the  Consumer  Price  Index;  however,  that  authority  isn’t  vested 
with  the  Coast  Guard,  or  has  not  been  to  date.  So  it  hasn’t  been 
done since 1990. It’s remained at the static level that it was at. 

I  don’t  know,  I’m  not  a  finance  major  so  I’m  not  sure  I  have  the 
best  answer  for  how  do  we  go  about  ensuring  that  we  have  ade-
quate liability limits. I think, though, that the law currently would 
limit us. If we only used the Consumer Price Index, we’re not going 
to get to the level of what the polluter pays that we need to be at. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  Mr.  Jensen,  do  you  have  any  comments  on 

that? 

sive program? 

Mr. JENSEN. Well, I think—— 
Senator CANTWELL. As the State struggles for a more comprehen-

Mr.  JENSEN.  Well,  I  think  from  the  standpoint  of  the  Oil  Spill 
Trust  Fund,  it’s  such  an  important  fund  for  us.  At  the  State  level, 
we have a $9 million response fund at the state level and just even, 
you  know,  the  two  spills  that  we  had  this  year,  if  the  state  would 
have been funding those spills it would have bankrupted that fund. 
So  in  the  event,  it’s  a  great  opportunity  for  us  at  the  State  level 
to be able to kick in our response account because we feel that ag-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

gressive and rapid response is very important. We want to be able 
to  pool  all  the  resources  together,  you  know,  to  do  that  and  then 
back  off  on  resources  when  the  spill  starts,  you  know,  winding,  or 
recovery starts winding down. 

So  we’re  very  appreciative  of  that  fund  being  kicked  in  place,  it 

provides a great safeguard for us in the State. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Well,  I  want  to  get  to  Mr.  Helton  on  our 
unique marine sanctuary and traffic issues, but one more question 
on  this  point.  I  don’t  think  the  Coast  Guard  report  addresses  or 
makes a specific recommendation on this, on the liability issue. 

Captain BOOTHE. No, ma’am, I don’t believe the report—— 
Senator  CANTWELL.  But  if  you  were  going  to  venture  a  guess  on 
how to adequately make sure that there are resources there in the 
future—— 

Captain BOOTHE. Well, I think—— 
Senator  CANTWELL.—what  structure  would  you  look  at  for  in-
creasing liability that you think would be a fair way to look at the 
equation? 

Captain  BOOTHE.  Are  you  talking  about  what  should  the  limits 

of liability be or——? 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Well,  obviously  the  hearing  today  is  to  ad-
dress  this  increase  in  spill  volume  that  we’ve  seen,  and  we’re  here 
because  Washington  State’s  probably  one  of  the  most  aggressive, 
and the Coast Guard response probably is the most technologically 
sophisticated.  Obviously  we  do  have  a  lot  of  traffic  in  and  out  of 
here, so, we’re probably where we have the best deployment so far. 
So, yes, I’m asking you what else do you think we should do to ad-
dress the liability limits? Besides CPI, what else would you look at? 
Captain BOOTHE. Well, I think one of the issues that we have to 
address, Senator, is the fact that I think a preponderance of the Oil 
Spill  Liability  Trust  Fund  expenditures  are  actually  paid  out  to 
claimants  for  third-party  actions  that  caused  the  spill.  So,  for  ex-
ample,  in  the  Athos  I,  although  I  know  the  investigation  has  not 
been  completed,  but  hypothetically  let’s  presume  that  it  finds  that 
some  third-party  caused  the  spill,  the  company  that  owned  Athos 
I which had paid $124 million to date—maybe it’s more than that; 
I’m not sure I have the right figure—but in any event they’re going 
to be seeking compensation from the Oil Spill Liability Trust Fund 
likely to recover their costs, or at least the P&I club or the insurers 
are going to be looking for that funding to come back to them. 

So  I  think  it’s  an  important  aspect  that  the  Oil  Spill  Liability 
Trust  Fund  provides  that  we  have  to  maintain  that  capability  for 
the Federal Government to pay that out. I think somehow you have 
to  look  at  the  spiller  as  paying  for  the  impacts  that  have  been 
caused,  and  I’m  not  sure  how  you  go  about  quantifying  that  ex-
actly.  I  think  OPA  90  did  the  best  it  could,  I  think  so  did  the 
FWPCA  in  trying  to  establish  what’s  a  fair  and  reasonable  value 
per  ton  of  oil  carried,  or  barrel  of  oil  carried  to  establish  a  thresh-
old  that  hopefully  provides  a  reasonable  gauge  on  how  much  is  it 
going to cost to clean up this oil. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Thank  you.  Mr.  Helton,  you  described  our 
marine  sanctuary  off  the  coast  of  Washington,  and  I  don’t  suspect 
anybody  could  possibly  see  this  map  but  maybe  you  can.  And  this 
purple  area  represents  the  outline  of  the  marine  sanctuary  area,  I 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

believe.  So  you’re  talking  about  an  additional  rule  that  was  imple-
mented  by  NOAA  up  here  at  the  top  of  Tatoosh  Island  or  some-
thing of that nature; is that correct? 

[The information referred to follows:] 

Mr. HELTON. Let me clarify the graph that you hold. The purple 
is the area to be avoided. The marine sanctuary is actually slightly 
larger  and  extends  out  further.  So  vessels  are  allowed  to  transit 
through the sanctuary—— 

Senator CANTWELL. So they can transit through this purple area? 
Mr.  HELTON.  No,  the  purple  area  is  the  area  to  be  avoided  for 

tank vessels—— 

Senator CANTWELL. OK. 
Mr. HELTON.—and the blue/gray area that sticks out is the addi-

tional footprint of the sanctuary that’s not within the—— 

Senator CANTWELL. This area here? 
Mr. HELTON. Yes. So the boundaries of the area to be avoided are 
not the same as the sanctuary. But the idea is to keep vessels that 
are approaching the Strait of Juan de Fuca and ports in Vancouver 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.

1
L
E
H
1
0
8

33 

and  Seattle,  to  keep  them  offshore  until  they  have  to  make  the 
turn into the Strait of Juan de Fuca. 

The,  and  that  was  implemented  about  I  think  10  years  ago  now 
and  compliance  has  been  very  good.  It  applies  to  tank  vessels  and 
vessels  carrying  hazardous  materials,  so  smaller  vessels  like  fish-
ing  vessels  can  still  transit  the  area.  And  it’s  a  voluntary  scheme, 
so  if  a  vessel  is  in  duress  or  for  some  reason  they  can  transit  it, 
but it’s not, it’s a voluntary compliance scheme. And our experience 
is that about 95 to 99 percent of the vessels comply with the regu-
lation. 

Senator CANTWELL. And how is that information translated to in-
coming  vessels  and  to  people  who  may  be  traversing  for  the  first 
time into the Strait? 

Mr.  HELTON.  There’s,  I  believe  that  there’s  a,  directly  on  the 
chart  itself  there,  is  a  notation  of  the  area  to  be  avoided,  and  it’s 
also, I think been placed in other documents that mariners use, no-
tice  to  mariners  and  other  sources  of  information.  And  that  I  be-
lieve  that  if  a  vessel  does  transit  through  the  sanctuary,  through 
the area to be avoided, and they are a tank vessel, we have a sys-
tem  in  place  to  contact  them  afterwards  and  clarify  that  they  un-
derstand what the regulations are. 

So there is some follow-up for those vessels that do inadvertently 

transit the area. 

Senator CANTWELL. And how has compliance been? 
Mr.  HELTON.  It’s,  my  understanding  is  that  it  has  been  very 
good.  The  Coast  Guard,  I  think  the,  our  sanctuary  staff  work  with 
both the U.S. and Canadian Coast Guard on their vessel traffic in-
formation that comes into the Strait of Juan de Fuca, so they have 
vessel tracks for all the larger vessels that come through. And I be-
lieve it was in the 98 percent compliance rate. 

Senator CANTWELL. I see on some information that was provided 
by  the  Olympic  Coast  National  Marine  Sanctuary  that  there  are 
some noncompliance statistics that are below that, for tugs and oil 
barges and tugs and chemical barges. 

[The information preferred to follows:] 

VESSEL TRANSITS THROUGH THE OLYMPIC COAST NATIONAL MARINE SANCTUARY AND 

AREA TO BE AVOIDED (ATBA) DURING CALENDAR YEAR 2005 

The  International  Maritime  Organization  (IMO),  a  specialized  agency  of  the 
United  Nations,  has  designated  the  Area  to  be  Avoided  (ATBA)  off  the  coast  of 
Washington  to  reduce  the  risk  of  marine  casualties  including  oil  spills,  and  the  re-
sulting  environmental  damage  in  the  Olympic  Coast  National  Marine  Sanctuary 
(Sanctuary). Vessels advised to stay clear of this ATBA include all ships and barges 
carrying  cargoes  of  oil  or  hazardous  materials  and  all  ships  1,600  gross  tons  and 
larger. The Olympic Coast National Marine Sanctuary, in cooperation with the U.S. 
and  Canadian  Coast  Guards,  monitors  vessel  compliance  under  this  voluntary  pro-
gram. The Cooperative Vessel Traffic System (CVTS) collects data on all vessels en-
tering and leaving the Strait of Juan de Fuca. 

Vessel Type 

Container Ship 
Bulk Carriers 
Oil Tankers 
General Cargo ships 
Tugs with Oil Barges 
Vehicle Carriers 
Chemical Tankers 

Transits in and 

out of the 

Strait of Juan de Fuca 
recorded by the CVTS 1 

1 

2,989 
2,925 
898 
595 
582 
467 
375 

Transits passing 

through the 
Sanctuary 2 

Transits passing 

through the 
ATBA within 
the Sanctuary 3 

Estimated ATBA 
Compliance Rate 4 

2 

1,959 
1,980 
636 
477 
570 
367 
261 

3 

10 
24 
5 
1 
100 
6 
1 

4 

99.5% 
98.8% 
99.2% 
99.8% 
82.5% 
98.4% 
99.6% 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

Transits in and 

out of the 

Strait of Juan de Fuca 
recorded by the CVTS 1 

Transits passing 

through the 
Sanctuary 2 

Transits passing 

through the 
ATBA within 
the Sanctuary 3 

Estimated ATBA 
Compliance Rate 4 

1 

362 
326 
283 
194 
33 
27 

18 
16 
14 
14 
14 

2 

222 
209 
283 
114 
28 
15 

6 
10 
11 
8 
14 

3 

3 
4 
0 
26 
0 
1 

0 
0 
0 
0 
9 

4 

98.6% 
98.1% 
100.0% 
77.2% 
100.0% 
93.3% 

100.0% 
100.0% 
100.0% 
100.0% 
35.7% 

97.3% 

Vessel Type 

Roll-on Roll-off Vessels (RORO) 
Cruise Ships 
Articulated Tank Barges 
Fishing vessels 
Heavy Load Carriers 
Refrigerated Ships 
Liquefied Petroleum Gas 
Carriers (LPG) and 
Liquified Natural Gas 
(LNG) Carriers 
Non-oil Tankers 
Cable Layers 
Ore-Bulk-Oil Vessels (OBO) 
Tugs with Chemical Barges 

TOTALS 

10,132 

7,170 

191 

1 The vessel transits in this column were provided by the Cooperative Vessel Traffic System (CVTS) and include commercial vessels 
greater than 1600 gross tons, or tugs with oil or chemical barges.f2 This column includes a subset of the CVTS vessel transits through 
the Sanctuary. 

3 This  column  includes  a  subset  of  the  Sanctuary  vessel  transits  that  also  go  through  the  ATBA.  These  are  vessels  potentially  not 
complying  with  the  provisions  of  the  ATBA.  This  is  not  known  with  certainty.  For  example,  in  some  cases  fishing  processors  do  not 
transit  the  ATBA,  but  are  engaged  in  operations  within  the  ATBA  and  are  therefore  not  subject  to  ATBA  provisions.  In  other  cases 
tank barges may be transiting while in ballast and not carrying petroleum products or chemicals. 

4 This  column  shows  the  percentage  of  vessels  transiting  through  the  Sanctuary  that  stayed  out  of  the  ATBA  {Column  4  =  1– 

(Column3/Column2)}. This is used as an estimate of compliance with ATBA provisions. 

that? 

Mr.  HELTON.  So  the  target  of  the  restriction  is  on  vessels  car-
rying oil and hazardous materials. And there are lots of other ves-
sels  that  transit,  and  occasionally  a  vessel  may,  a  tank  vessel  or 
a  barge  in  transit,  but  it’s  not,  if  it’s  not  loaded  with  fuel  or—— 
Senator  CANTWELL.  So  you  just  believe  that  those  are  lower 
threats  as  it  relates  to  incidents,  but  why  is  the  compliance  lower 
for these vessels? 

Mr. HELTON. I’d, I have to get back to you on that detail of expla-
nation.  As  I  said  before,  the  rules  apply  to  the  larger  vessels  that 
are  the  larger  threats.  It’s  not  meant  to  preclude  fishing  vessels 
and  other  vessels  that  transit  the  coast  from  having  to  avoid  the 
area. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Capital  Boothe,  did  you  have  a  comment  on 

Captain  BOOTHE.  Yes,  Senator.  It  is  intended  that  all  tank 
barges  that  are  laden  would  also  remain  outside  of  the  ATBA.  I 
think  historically  on  some  occasions  barges  and  barge  traffic  com-
ing out of Grays Harbor would cut the corner, and those would still 
nonetheless  be  considered  to  be,  if  you  will,  in  violation  of  the  vol-
untary  area  to  be  avoided.  Even  though  they  typically,  at  least 
from my experience when I was Captain of the Port, in monitoring 
this, they predominantly try to abide by the outer edge of the area 
to be avoided, if not further offshore than that. 

And  I  think  another  point  that  Mr.  Helton  mentioned  as  well  is 
that  the  commercial  vessels,  deep  draft  vessels,  cargo  vessels  of 
1,600 gross tons or over, are also asked to voluntarily comply with, 
since  they  obviously  have  a  great  deal  of  bunker  oil  on  board  as 
well,  and  we  would  like  to  restrict  as  much  traffic  within  the  ma-
rine  sanctuary  as  possible.  And  they  had,  I  believe,  committed  an 
involuntary  agreement  by  resolution  of  the  then-Puget  Sound 
Steamship Operators Association to remain outside of the ATBA as 
well. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  I  don’t  know  the  specific  statistics  regarding 
the  percentages  of  spills  related  to  vessels  other  than  oil  tankers 
in the last several years, but what we’re trying to get at is that the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

perception that spills come just from oil tankers is the wrong idea; 
correct?  And  that’s  part  of  why  we’re  trying  to  implement  a  more 
cohesive system? 

Captain  BOOTHE.  Yes,  ma’am,  Senator  Cantwell.  I  think  folks 
who  interpret  the  equation  of  risk  as  probability  times  con-
sequence,  seem  to  ignore  the  fact  that  probability  is  a  huge  part 
of  that.  Even  though  you  may  have  a  significant  consequence  po-
tential  from  a  tank  ship,  if  you  have  enough  prevention  strategies 
in place, potentially you can drive the probability down so low that 
it ultimately doesn’t represent the highest risk. 

I’m  not  suggesting  that  to  be  the  case  here,  but  I  think  looking 
at  the  various  measures  that  we  have  in  place  in  Puget  Sound  is 
a  model  for  the  rest  of  the  country  to  view.  I  mean  if  I  had  about 
5  minutes  I  could  probably  walk  you  through  that  safety  net  that 
is pretty substantial here. 

Senator CANTWELL. Including this marine sanctuary and areas to 

be avoided and things of that nature? 

Captain BOOTHE. Absolutely, Senator. 
Senator CANTWELL. Does that exist in any other part of the coun-

try that you know of, like off the coast of Florida? 

Captain  BOOTHE.  There  are  certainly  other  marine  sanctuaries, 
whether  they’ve  actually  established  either  state  restrictions  on 
transit  or  Federal,  I  don’t  know.  Maybe  Mr.  Helton  would  know 
whether, who mans those. 

Mr.  HELTON.  I  believe  that  the  Florida  Keys  National  Marine 
Sanctuary also has a similar traffic avoidance scheme to keep deep 
draft  vessels  away  from  the  coral  reefs  in  that  area.  And  that’s  a 
much more shallow, it’s a coral area so it’s much more critical that 
vessels stay well away from the reefs. About 25 miles off the Wash-
ington  coast  you’re  in  lots  of  water,  but  25  miles  off  the  Florida 
Keys you may still be in, in that, several hundred feet of water. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  I  understand  that  member  countries  of  the 
International  Maritime  Organization  also  agreed  to  speed  up  the 
phasing  out  of  single-hulled  vessels.  Can  I  get  your  comments  on 
that? 

Captain BOOTHE. Well, in terms of the OPA 90 MARPOL similar-
ities  or  differences,  I  think  we  would  end  up  with  a  mixed  effect. 
As it is right now, OPA has much more stringent phase-out period 
dates  for  single-hulled,  pure  single-hulled,  whereas  the  MARPOL 
convention  provides  earlier  phase-out  of  the  double-bottom  and 
double-side  structure  that  is  still  a  single-hulled  vessel,  but  not 
purely  single-hulled,  meaning  there’s  only  one  barrier  throughout 
the whole envelope exposed to the sea. 

So for us to implement the earlier phase-out associated with dou-
ble-bottom  and  double-sided  tank  vessels,  it  would  require  an 
amendment  to  OPA,  and  probably  would  have  some,  obviously 
some impact on shipping within the U.S. as well. 

Senator CANTWELL. Given the incidents you’ve seen, do you think 

that we need to do that? 

Captain  BOOTHE.  No,  ma’am,  I  don’t  believe  so.  From  my  per-
sonal  opinion,  now,  I’m  speaking  predominantly  from  a  Puget 
Sound perspective, and that takes into account the significant safe-
ty  net  that  exists  here.  I  mean  in  Puget  Sound  we  start  almost 
2,000  miles  from  the  coast  when  a  vessel  has  to  give  us  its  ad-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

vanced  notice  of  arrival,  and  with  that  advanced  notice  we  begin 
immediately  getting  the  information  about  the  vessel  and  deter-
mining what kind of risk they pose. 

As  they  approach  the  coast  they  have,  obviously,  the  area  to  be 
avoided,  restrictions  on  the  U.S.  side,  and  Canada  for  tankers  has 
a  tanker  exclusion  zone  that  extends  out  50  miles  from  Vancouver 
Island.  So  channeling  from  north  and  south  vessels  will  come  into 
the  U.S.  waters  or  the  Strait  of  Juan  de  Fuca  from  a  distance  off-
shore. 

We recently modified the, again IMO adopted a traffic separation 
scheme which could be likened to an interstate highway. It has es-
sentially one-way traffic, or if you will, a fast and slow lane on each 
side,  predominantly  one-way,  although  there  is  some  small  traffic 
that’s allowed to go opposite the flow, but well outside of the main 
traffic lines. 

And  the  major  shipping  coming  in  the  opposite  direction  is  obvi-
ously  separated  from  the  inbound  traffic  by  a  several-mile  wide 
separation  zone  typically.  As  they  come  in  then  they  have  to  talk 
to  the  vessel  traffic  service,  and  here  we  have  a  jointly-operated 
Canadian  and  United  States  cooperative  vessel  traffic  service  that 
basically  is  a  mandatory  system.  All  deep  draft  vessels  are  obli-
gated  to  participate  in  that,  and  the  vessel  traffic  service,  at  least 
on  the  U.S.  side,  has  intervened  probably  in  excess  of  a  hundred 
times  in  the  last  5  years  to  prevent  an  accident  from  happening. 
So then they get to Port Angeles, and if we’ve decided they need 
to  be  inspected,  they  get  inspected  there  if  it’s  a  major  deficiency 
that we’ve identified that needs to be addressed. And here in Puget 
Sound,  where  the  rest  of  the  Nation  probably  has  a  foreign  vessel 
examination  program  averaging  about  16  to  19  percent  of  the  for-
eign  vessel  arrivals  get  inspected,  here  the  number  is  up  around 
38  percent.  And  80  percent,  if  you  discount  them  for  those  that 
make repeat calls to the Puget Sound region. 

So we’ve got just a myriad of measures and obviously many more 
that apply specifically to tankers as they come through our waters, 
ma’am. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Mr.  Helton,  any  comments  about  single- 

hulled risks? 

Mr. HELTON. Well, I guess as a resident of the Puget Sound area 
and as a sailor, I’m happy to know that vessels are coming in more 
and  more  with  double-hulled  construction.  It’s  not  a  panacea,  it’s 
a  design  effort  to  prevent  a  leakage  of  a  vessel  after  it’s  collided 
with other objects or grounded. And I think that at that point we’re 
happy  to  know  that  it’s  a  double-hulled  tanker,  and  hopefully  we 
can  minimize  a  spill  or  prevent  a  spill  just  by  rupturing  the  outer 
hull. 

But all of these efforts to prevent the grounding and prevent the 
collision  in  the  first  place  are  very  important  and  we  shouldn’t  let 
the  double  hulls  become  a,  ‘‘let  us  relax  our  confidence  that  we 
have  solved  the  problem,’’  because  those  other  efforts  are  very  im-
portant as well. 

Senator CANTWELL. Mr. Jensen, any comments on that? 
Mr.  JENSEN.  Yes,  I  think  anything  that  we  can  do  to  minimize 
spills and make our Puget Sound waters safer I think is very much 
appreciated. I think that there are many companies that have been 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

ahead of the game. I know that some of the cargo industry vessels 
are beginning to move forward with designing their hull structures 
for double hulls. 

And I think that we’re very fortunate here in Puget Sound, to see 
some  of  those  more  aggressive,  you  know,  moves  from  some  of  the 
companies  and  some  of  the  actions.  But  safety  is  a  big  factor  and 
I  think  that,  you  know,  you  can  do  a  lot  with  hull  designs,  but  I 
think the human factor is a big part of it, so the more that we can 
do  to  work  with  the  crews,  to  work  with  the  companies  to  prevent 
the spills, in the first place, are very helpful. 

And  I  think  that,  just  one  comment  too,  is  we’re  very  fortunate 
here in this state to have a state-funded tug out at, located in Neah 
Bay, and I think that that certainly helps with minimization of risk 
and  it  helps  our  citizens  to  have  some  assurance  that,  you  know, 
we’re doing everything that we can to minimize risk here in Puget 
Sound. 

Senator CANTWELL. Mr. Jensen, you mentioned the state and the 
limits that the Oil Pollution Act of 1990 has on the ability of states 
to implement further regulations. I know I see Representative Coo-
per  here  who’s  been  very  involved  in  this  issue.  Do  you  want  to 
elaborate further on that as my colleagues and I look at this issue 
when  we  return  in  September?  Are  there  things  that  you  would 
recommend right now as changes to the 1990 Act? 

Mr.  JENSEN.  Well,  I  think  that,  I  don’t  have  specifics  to  share 
with  you  right  now.  I  think  that  when,  when  changes  were  made 
through  the  Intertanko  case,  our  focus  really  was  on  the  human 
factor, you know, part of it was, you know, really on the safe oper-
ation  of  waters.  And  I  think  that  that’s  one  area  that  if  the  state 
has  more  authority  we  can  certainly  work,  you  know,  continue  to 
work  more  closely  with  the  Coast  Guard.  But  that’s,  that’s  defi-
nitely one, you know, piece of it. 

itself? 

Senator  CANTWELL.  More  authority,  how  would  that  manifest 

Mr. JENSEN. I think just access to, more access to vessels, which 
I  think  right  now  we  look  at  complementing  our  programs,  the 
Coast  Guard  and  us,  complement  our  programs  through  making 
sure that there isn’t a redundancy, but I think that in areas of fish-
ing  vessels,  cargo,  that  we  can  do  more  to  work  closely  with  those 
operators of those vessels to minimize risk. 

Senator CANTWELL. So what would we need to change in the Act? 
If you have a good working relationship with the Coast Guard now, 
what  would  you  like  to  see?  Not  to  put  you  on  the  spot,  but  just 
to  get  a  general  sense.  Again,  part  of  today’s  field  hearing  is  to 
learn of the good things that Captain Boothe and others elaborated 
on  that  we  are  doing  in  Washington  State  that  can  be  somewhat 
of a model for the rest of the country. 

Mr. JENSEN. I don’t have a specific for you right now. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  All  right.  I  want  to  get  on  to  the  next  panel 
but,  just  to  make  sure  I’m  understanding—Captain  Boothe,  you 
seem  to  be  saying  that  of  the  recommendations  from  the  Coast 
Guard  report,  the  issue  of  resources,  and  the  issue  of  cost  of  spills 
outpacing such resources, is the critical issue; is that correct? 

Captain  BOOTHE.  Yes,  Senator.  I  think  the  fact  that  you  raised 
early in your statement, ma’am, regarding the cost potentially out-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

pacing  the  actual  funds  that  are  available  within  the  Federal  do-
main  apply  toward  oil  spill  response,  or  that  is  provided  through 
the  liability  limits  provided  in  OPA,  probably  need  to  be  reexam-
ined.  And  I’m  not  sure  what  the  best  mechanism  to  address  that 
and the right size of that amount mean. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  And  then  to  the  question  of  whether  all  the 
navigational  tools  are  here  and  available,  it  seems  that  Puget 
Sound has a pretty safe system, and given that we’ve set aside cer-
tain  regions  to  be  avoided,  or  did  I  miss  something  there,  Mr. 
Helton? Do you think we need more navigational tools? 

Mr.  HELTON.  Oh,  I  think  that  we’re,  NOAA  as  the  Nation’s 
chartmaker,  we’re  busy  trying  to  update  our  charts  and  complete 
all of the surveys. There’s still work to do there, but we are making 
progress,  and  most  of  the  areas  have  been  surveyed  recently. 
So—— 

Senator CANTWELL. So are the charts out-of-date? 
Mr. HELTON. Well, when you, if you’re a boater, if you get a chart 
from  the  marine  store,  you’ll  see  that  the  chart  has  an  edition  on 
it.  That  edition  might  be  dated  1999  or  2004,  that’s  the  last  time 
it  was  published.  It  doesn’t  necessarily  refer  to  when  it  was  last 
surveyed.  So  some  of  the,  we  are  going  through  a  survey  backlog 
in  trying  to  update  all  the  critical  areas,  especially  harbor  areas 
and areas where they’re may be shoaling, to update those base sur-
veys  so  that  the  navigation  information  that  goes  to  the  mariners 
is as updated as possible. 

Senator CANTWELL. So you’d say we’re in good shape? 
Mr. HELTON. Well, I think we’re, my understanding is that there 
is  a  backlog  that  is  being  addressed.  I’m  sure  that  the  agency 
would  love  to  provide  a  list  of  other  things  that  could  be,  could  be 
done to improve navigation, but that’s beyond my scope. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  OK.  And  then,  Mr.  Jensen,  I’m  sure  that 
you’ll get back to us on whether there’s adequate manning and in-
spection or if there’s something else that the State would be inter-
ested in looking at this? 

Mr. JENSEN. Yes. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  Great,  well,  thank  you,  gentlemen,  for  your 
testimony,  and  we’ll  have  the  record  open  for  2  weeks  if  you  want 
to  add  any  additional  comments  to  the  record,  but  thank  you  for 
being  here,  and  thank  you  for  giving  testimony.  So  we’ll  move  to 
our next panel. 

Captain BOOTHE. Thank you, Senator. 
Senator CANTWELL. If our next panel would come up, and I don’t 
know  whether  Mr.  Sones  made  it  yet  or  not.  Okay,  if  you  could 
come up and join this panel, that would be great. 

[Brief pause in proceedings.] 
Senator  CANTWELL.  Mr.  Sones,  we’re  going  to,  since  you  were 
supposed  to  be  on  Panel  1,  we’ll  go  ahead  and  start  with  you  this 
morning,  and  we  appreciate  your  time  in  being  here  to  give  testi-
mony to the Commerce Committee field hearing. So thank you. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

STATEMENT  OF  DAVID  SONES,  VICE  CHAIRMAN,  MAKAH 
TRIBAL  COUNCIL;  ON  BEHALF  OF  THE  NORTHWEST  INDIAN 
FISHERIES COMMISSION (NWIFC) 
Mr. SONES. Well, thank you. I had to catch a boat, I missed one, 
missed  our  canoe,  as  we  Indians  would  say.  We’re  at  Tribal  Jour-
neys  this  week  so  we’ve  really  got  a  busy  schedule,  but  we  really 
appreciate  you  holding  this  hearing.  And  I’m  fairly  familiar  with 
this  group  of  people  as  the  last  panel  we  tried  to  sort  of  kind  of, 
right in the middle of a lot of the issues that happen here and work 
with all of the groups, so I thank you. 

My  name’s  Dave  Sones,  I’m  the  Vice  Chairman  with  the  Makah 
Tribe  and  representing  the  Northwest,  20  Northwest  Indian  Fish-
eries  Commission  tribes.  I  want  to  thank  the  Senator  for  holding 
this  hearing.  We  do  appreciate  that,  and  the  Fisheries  and  the 
Coast  Guard  Subcommittee  also.  These  are  essential  environment 
issues,  sensitive  issues  for  Washington  State  Treaty  Tribes  in  pro-
tecting our natural resources from oil spills. 

I’d also like to take this time to reaffirm the mutual trust respon-
sibility  that  exists  between  the  Federal  and  tribal  governments  to 
defend  our  treaty-protected  resources  from  the  long-term  cultural, 
economic,  and  social  impacts  from  an  oil  spill.  Northwest  Indian 
Fisheries  Commission  Tribes  and  the  Makah  Tribe  recognize  that 
it is a matter of when, not if, the next oil spill will occur in Wash-
ington waters. 

Simply acknowledging this fact acknowledges at least a base un-
derstanding  that  an  oil  spill  places  a  greater  strain  on  an  already 
strained  marine  environment.  Makah  has  witnessed  this  firsthand 
from the devastating effects of an oil spill on our resources and our 
cultural way of life. 

The  Makah  Tribe  is  involved  and  has  been  involved  in  tracking 
this  issue,  not  only  as  a  resource  trustee  and  a,  but  as  a  co-man-
ager with the State and Federal Governments, but we are also first 
responders  contracted  by  major  oil  spill  response  organizations  to 
assist in oil spill response efforts off the Olympic Coast and in the 
Strait  of  Juan  de  Fuca.  Other  Northwest  Indian  Fish  Commission 
Tribes  could  offer  the  same  oil  spill  response  capability  if  properly 
trained by the oil spill response companies. 

Other,  we,  other  Washington  tribes  have  experienced  the  dev-
astating  impacts  of  an  oil  spill.  The  Suquamish,  Puyallup,  and 
Muckleshoot  Tribes  were  severely  impacted  by  the  Dalco  Pass  in 
the  2004  spill,  while  the  Suquamish  Tribe  was  particularly  im-
pacted by the December 2003 spill at Point Wells. Like the number 
of spills off of Cape Flattery, little oil was recovered from these in-
cidents before the oil hit the beach. 

Tribal  notification  and  the  opportunity  for  tribal  involvement  in 
the  decisionmaking  process  during  these  incidents  was  difficult  for 
us  to  establish.  Northwest  Indian  Fish  Commission  Tribes  need  a 
more institutionalized solution to these shortcomings. 

We  believe  the  Washington  State  legislature  has  recognized  the 
importance  of  tribal  notification  from  the  time  a  spill  is  detected, 
but there is still a need to assure tribal input in the Incident Com-
mand  established,  that  is,  established  during  the  spill.  For  exam-
ple,  Tribal  input  in  the  Incident  Command  is  crucial  to  the  pro-
posed  U.S.  Coast  Guard’s  rulemaking  aimed  at  requiring  new  ap-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

plication  capabilities  for  oil  spill  dispersants  while  maintaining  re-
sponse requirement levels for mechanical recovery. 

40 

Decisions relating to dispersant use need to be made on a timely 
basis,  but  need  to  consider  long-term  impacts  on  the  ability  of 
tribes  to  harvest  shellfish,  as  well  as  impacts  on  the  ability  to  re-
cover undispersed oil through skimming or in situ burning. 

Formal  consultation  when  major  rulemakings  are  undertaken 
such  as  the  Coast  Guard’s  proposed  2003  Removal  Equipment  Re-
quirements  and  Alternative  Technology  Revisions,  are  critical  for 
Tribal involvement. We concur with Washington State Department 
of Ecology that there continues to be a need to increase mechanical 
recovery  equipment  capabilities  rather  than  decrease  them.  It  is 
the  Northwest  Indian  Fish  Commission  Tribal  members’  position 
that  treaty  protected  resources  cannot  simply  be  calculated  as  a 
cost  of  doing  business  reflected  in  the  cost  of  a  barrel  of  oil  re-
trieved  scenario,  but  rather  represents  far-reaching  cultural  and 
economic implications. 

We  also  believe  that  offering  a  credit  to  offset  purchases  of  in 
situ  burn  equipment  does  not  encourage  the  maintenance  of  a  full 
response toolkit. To that end we are concerned that proposed DOE 
contingency  planning  standards  that  are  more  stringent  than  the 
proposed  Coast  Guard  rules,  will  be  interpreted  by  the  Coast 
Guard  to  frustrate  its  purpose  and  overrule  DOE’s  effort.  In  order 
to  adequately  protect  the  Washington  waters  from  oil  spills  we 
must reconcile these political—or potential differences. 

The Makah Tribe realizes that there is a greater, there is a need 
for  greater  tribal  involvement  in  the  oil  spill  arena  as  well  as  the 
limitations  in  our  technical  ability  to  review  and  comment  on  var-
ious state and Federal oil spill policy documents, and that becomes 
problematic.  To  address  that  shortcoming  we  solicited  technical 
support from NOAA Hazmat in Seattle to assist us with navigating 
and clarifying issues of particular concern to the Tribe. 

The  Makah  Tribe  is  currently  analyzing  the  planning  and  re-
sponse  assets  the  NOAA  Hazmat  Response  Division  is  able  to  pro-
vide  the  Makah  Tribe  during  an  oil  spill  and  we  are  finding  them 
quite capable. Our initial request highlighted the underlying neces-
sity to develop a strong partnership between the Makah Tribe and 
NOAA’s  National  Marine  Sanctuary  Program  through  Olympic 
Coast  National  Marine  Sanctuary.  We  hope  to  develop  similar  col-
laborations with the EPA and the Coast Guard and the U.S. Navy 
over the next year. 

While  the  Makah  Tribe  is  part  of  the  region’s  front  line  of  de-
fense  on  the  outer  coast,  we  believe  equipment  and  training  that 
is reconciled to ocean conditions can be further improved. It would 
be  a  considerable  improvement  if  the  on-the-water  identification 
phase  of  an  oil  spill  response  were  conducted  as  soon  as  possible 
after  an  incident  occurs.  We  need  to  build  the  capacity  to  provide 
the Makah Indian Tribe and other Northwest Indian Fish Commis-
sion  tribes  with  personnel  trained  in  such  procedures,  and  to  have 
equipment post—pre-positioned to respond to the oil spill once it is 
detected. 

There  is  also  a  need  for  expanding  response  infrastructure,  i.e., 
dedicated response gear. When response to the Dalco Pass spill oc-
curred,  much  of  the  spill  response  gear  situated  at  Neah  Bay  had 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

to  be  redirected  to  other  areas,  and  this  action  left  our  treaty-pro-
tected  resources  unprotected.  The  Makah  Tribal  Council,  or  the 
Makah  Tribal  Council  fully  supports  the  year-round  positioning  of 
a  rescue  tug  in  Neah  Bay  outfitted  with  multi-mission  capability. 
The  outer  coast  of  Washington  State  includes  the  Olympic  Na-
tional  Park  and  three  wildlife,  national  wildlife  refuges,  the  Olym-
pic  Coast  National  Marine  Sanctuary,  numerous  endangered  spe-
cies, and four tribal reservations that are located there. 

The  Makah  Tribe  believes  that  in  order  to  adequately  address 
these  trust  interests  translates  into  increasing  the  salvage,  rescue 
and towing capabilities for the outer coast. Two National Academy 
of Sciences reports on the state of U.S. salvage capability point out 
that  there  is  an  immediate  need  for  improved  salvage  capability 
within  the  United  States.  The  U.S.  Coast  Guard  is  tasked  with 
completing the salvage and firefighting rulemaking as part of OPA 
90. 

The  National  Academy  of  Science  has  also  sponsored  two  sepa-
rate reports of knowledge regarding oil spill dispersants. We are re-
viewing  this  second  study  very  carefully  and  are  concerned  to  find 
that the unknowns are still unknown. The lack of solid conclusions 
about the efficacy and effects of dispersants in cold water and near 
shore environments raises concerns with the Makah Tribe and the 
Northwest  Indian  Fish  Commission  Tribes  in  regard  to  the  appro-
priate  application  of  dispersants  in  our  waters  and  the  rigor  with 
which such information is being sought. 

Finally,  in  order  for  the  Makah  Tribe  and  the  Northwest  Tribes 
to  understand  a  real  world  picture  of  our  state  of  readiness  for  oil 
spill  response,  we  need  to  conduct  an  oil  spill  drill.  We  know  how 
difficult it is to respond to an oil spill in our region from first-hand 
experience. We do not, however, have a clear understanding on how 
that overall capability has changed or improved over the years. 

The  Makah  Tribe  would  like  to  do  its  part  in  assisting  with  the 
coordination of an oil spill drill to be conducted within the Olympic 
Coast  National  Marine  Sanctuary,  enabling  us  a  realistic  evalua-
tion  of  our  oil  spill  response  capabilities.  A  goal  of  the  original 
OCNMS  management  plan  was  to  conduct  an  oil  spill  drill  within 
the sanctuary boundaries. 

In  closing,  we  appreciate  the  Senator’s  leadership  in  reinstating 
the  Oil  Spill  Liability  Trust  Fund  and  increasing  its  cap  to  $3  bil-
lion. We respectfully request that tribal governments be allowed to 
draw  from  this  account  in  the  same  manner  as  the  U.S.  Coast 
Guard  and  EPA  and  other  Federal  organizations.  This  ability  will 
increase  our  capacity  to  address  the  risks  associated  with  the  in-
creasing volumes of oil transiting through our waters. 

We  see  opportunities  to  improve  our  oil  spill  prevention  and  re-
sponse  capabilities  at  the  Federal  level  through  the  finalization  of 
the  Salvage  and  Fire  Fighting  Rule,  continued  funding  of  a  rescue 
tug  in  Neah  Bay,  oil  spill  drills  being  used  to  identify  where  to 
stockpile  equipment  appropriate  to  the  operating  environment, 
evaluation  of  the  oil  barge  traffic  moving  through  the  ATBA,  and 
the  ability  for  State  and  tribal  governments  to  exceed  Federal  re-
sponse standards where appropriate. 

We have a mutual trust obligation to protect the treaty resources 
of  the  20  federally  recognized  Indian  tribes  in  the  Pacific  North-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Transportation: 

My  name  is  David  Sones.  I  am  Vice  Chairman  of  the  Makah  Tribal  Council  and 
I am speaking on behalf of the 19 other Washington State Treaty Tribes that make- 
up the Northwest Indian Fisheries Commission (NWIFC). We appreciate the oppor-
tunity  to  present  to  you  our  tribal  interests  and  concerns  in  regard  to  the  develop-
ment and implementation of oil spill policy. 

We would like to thank Senator Cantwell and the Fisheries and Coast Guard Sub-
committee  for  holding  this  field  hearing  and  for  recognizing  the  mutual  trust  re-
sponsibility  that  exists  between  the  Federal  and  Tribal  governments  to  defend  our 
treaty-protected  resources  from  the  long-term  cultural,  economic  and  social  impacts 
of a major oil spill. The NWIFC Tribes and Makah Tribe recognize that it is a mat-
ter  of  when,  not  if,  the  waterways  in  the  State  of  Washington  will  experience  an-
other oil spill. In fact, as we are preparing this testimony the Canadian fishing ves-
sel, Ocean Tor, has been drifting capsized for over 24 hours carrying four thousands 
gallons  of  fuel  oil  and  350  gallons  of  hydraulic  oil  through  our  Usual  and  Accus-
tomed fishing area. 

42 

west.  We  appreciate  Senator  Cantwell’s  leadership  in  calling  for 
this hearing and look forward to working with the Senator and the 
Committee  to  see  that  these  recommendations  are  implemented. 
Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Sones follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DAVE SONES, VICE CHAIRMAN, MAKAH TRIBAL COUNCIL; 

ON BEHALF OF THE NORTHWEST INDIAN FISHERIES COMMISSION (NWIFC) 

Senator  Cantwell  and  Members  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and 

In  our  case  the  Makah  Tribe  is  not  only  a  resource  manager  with  the  state  and 
Federal Governments, we are first responders, contracted by major oil spill response 
organizations  to  assist  in  timely  and  capable  responses  to  oil  spills  off  the  Olympic 
Coast and in the Strait of Juan de Fuca. These waters are transited by 10,000 com-
mercial vessels annually carrying over 15 billion gallons of oil. Other NWIFC Tribes 
could  offer  the  same  oil  spill  response  capability  if  properly  trained  by  the  spill  re-
sponse companies. 

The  Makah  Tribe  has  first  hand  experience  with  three  of  the  largest  oil  spills  in 
Washington State (General Meiggs, 2,300,000 gallons in 1972; Nestucca, 231,000 gal-
lons in 1988, Tenyo Maru, 400,000 gallons in 1991). However, the Makah Tribe does 
not have a monopoly on suffering the negative impacts of oil spills. The Suquamish 
Tribe,  Duamish,  Puyallup  and  Muckelshoot  Tribes  have  recently  been  impacted  by 
the  October  2004  Dalco  Pass  spill  while  the  Suquamish  Tribe  was  particularly  im-
pacted by the December 2003 spill at Point Wells. Like the spills off Cape Flattery, 
little was recovered from these incidents before oil hit the beach and tribal notifica-
tion  and  the  opportunity  for  tribal  involvement  in  the  decisionmaking  process  was 
difficult to establish. 

We  believe  the  Washington  State  Legislature  has  recognized  the  importance  of 
tribal notification from the time a spill is detected, but there is still a need to assure 
Tribal input in the Incident Command established during a spill. For example Trib-
al  input  in  the  Incident  Command  is  crucial  to  the  proposed  USCG  rulemaking 
aimed at requiring new application capabilities for oil spill dispersants while main-
taining  response-requirement  levels  for  mechanical  recovery.  Decisions  relating  to 
dispersant  use  need  to  be  made  on  a  timely  basis,  but  need  to  consider  long-term 
impacts on the ability of tribes to harvest shellfish as well as impacts on the ability 
to recover un-dispersed oil through skimming or in situ burning. 

The  Makah  Tribe  has  repeatedly  supported  the  maintenance  of  a  full  toolkit  of 
oil  spill  response  options.  We  Tribes  depend  on  the  Federal  Government  to  assist 
us  in  developing  the  assurances  that  our  treaty-protected  interests  will  be  rep-
resented  when  policy  decisions  are  being  made.  These  decisions  include  not  only 
having  a  seat  at  the  Incident  Command  but  also  formal  consultation  when  major 
rulemakings are undertaken, such as the USCG proposed 2003 Removal Equipment 
Requirements  and  Alternative  Technology  Revisions  (USCG–2001–8661).  The  Draft 
Programmatic  Environmental  Impact  Statement  associated  with  this  rulemaking 
has  a  written  comment  deadline  of  August  1,  2005.  We  concur  with  Washington 
State Department of Ecology that there continues to be a need to increase mechan-
ical  recovery  equipment  capabilities  rather  than  decrease  them.  It  is  the  NWIFC 
Tribal members position that treaty-protected resources cannot be simply calculated 
as  a  cost  of  doing  business  reflected  in  the  cost  of  a  barrel  retrieved  scenario  but 
rather  represents  far  reaching  cultural  and  economic  implications.  We  also  believe 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

that offering a credit to offset purchases of in situ burn equipment does not encour-
age  the  maintenance  of  a  full  toolkit.  To  that  end  we  are  concerned  that  proposed 
DOE  contingency  planning  standards  that  are  more  stringent  than  the  proposed 
USCG  rules  will  be  interpreted  by  the  USCG  to  ‘‘frustrate  its  purpose,’’  this  rule 
has  implications  for  ‘‘federalism’’  which  is  explicitly  allowed  for  under  Executive 
Order 13132, but contradicted in the proposed USCG rule. 

The  Makah  Tribe  realized  the  need  for  greater  tribal  involvement  in  the  oil  spill 
arena  as  well  as  the  limitations  in  its  technical  ability  to  review  and  comment  on 
various state and Federal oil spill policy documents had become problematic. To ad-
dress  that  shortcoming  we  solicited  technical  support  from  NOAA  HAZMAT  in  Se-
attle  to  assist  us  with  navigating  and  clarifying  issues  of  particular  concern  to  the 
Tribe. This initial request highlighted the underlying necessity to develop a partner-
ship  between  the  Makah  Tribe  and  NOAA’s  National  Marine  Sanctuary  Program 
through Olympic Coast National Marine Sanctuary. We hope to develop similar col-
laborations  with  the  EPA,  Coast  Guard  and  Navy  next  year.  This  collaboration  be-
tween  the  National  Marine  Sanctuary  Program  and  the  Makah  Tribe  is  just  begin-
ning yet progressing well. 

The  necessity  of  stationing  dedicated  response  gear  became  evident  to  the  MTC 
when  in  order  to  respond  to  the  Dalco  Pass  spill  much  of  the  spill  response  gear 
situated  at  Neah  Bay  had  to  be  redirected  to  other  areas.  The  Washington  State 
DOE  just  released  a  study  showing  that  15  additional  spill  response  vessels  would 
be needed to respond to a 420,000-gallon spill in the San Juan Islands. If such addi-
tional  assets  are  needed  in  close  proximity  to  four  oil  refineries  where  the  majority 
of  our  spill  response  assets  are  pre-positioned,  the  same  or  even  more  would  be 
needed  to  address  a  spill  in  the  more  remote  waters  of  the  Olympic  coast.  We  sup-
port the DOE’s call for training fishermen to assist in spill response and believe that 
tribal  fishermen  may  be  particularly  helpful  in  that  they  are  more  likely  to  be 
present in the State year round. 

While  the  Makah  Tribe  is  part  of  the  region’s  front-line  of  defense  on  the  outer 
coast,  we  believe  equipment  and  training  that  is  reconciled  to  ocean  conditions  can 
be further developed. It would be a considerable improvement if the on-water identi-
fication  phase  of  an  oil  spill  response  were  conducted  as  soon  as  possible  after  an 
incident  occurs.  We  need  to  build  the  capacity  to  provide  the  Makah  Indian  Tribe 
and  other  NWIFC  member  Tribes  with  personnel  trained  in  such  procedures  and 
to have equipment pre-positioned to respond to the spill once it is detected. 

We  recognize  that  the  Strait  of  Juan  de  Fuca  receives  more  vessel  traffic  bound 
to  ports  in  British  Columbia  and  Washington  State  than  any  other  water  body  in 
North  America.  Further,  we  understand  that  current  projections  suggest  trade  vol-
umes  are  expected  to  double  or  triple  in  the  next  10  to  20  years.  We  understand 
these  projections  to  affect  an  increase  in  the  number  and  size  of  ships  calling  on 
our  waters.  These  larger  ships  require  larger  tugs  to  tow  them,  especially  off  the 
coast  where  high  winds  and  waves  counteract  a  tug’s  ability  to  assist  a  vessel.  The 
rescue tug stationed in Neah Bay is only available on a seasonal basis and only as-
sured State funding for another 3 years. 

The  Makah  Tribe  fully  supports  the  year-round  positioning  of  a  rescue  tug  in 
Neah  Bay  outfitted  with  multi-mission  capability.  The  outer  coast  of  the  State  of 
Washington  includes  the  Olympic  National  Park,  three  National  Wildlife  Refuges 
and  Olympic  Coast  National  Marine  Sanctuary,  numerous  species  listed  under  the 
Endangered  Species  Act,  and  the  four  tribal  reservations  that  are  located  there. 
While  the  Federal  Government  has  a  much  vested  interest  in  protecting  the  outer 
coast  from  the  impacts  of  an  oil  spill,  it  makes  sense  for  the  Federal  Government 
to  support  year  round  funding  of  a  rescue  tug.  The  Makah  Tribal  Council  believes 
addressing  these  interests  translates  to  increasing  the  salvage,  rescue,  and  towing 
capability  for  the  outer  coast.  According  to  the  Olympic  Coast  National  Marine 
Sanctuary  Program’s  efforts  to  monitor  vessel  compliance  with  the  Area  To  Be 
Avoided (ATBA) off the coast, 142 tugs with oil barges transited through the ATBA 
in  2004.  While  this  represents  a  75  percent  compliance  rate  of  the  tugs  and  barges 
that avoided the ATBA, of the remaining 25 percent, just one accident with a laden 
oil  barge  can  impact  us  for  over  10  years.  We  therefore  view  near-shore  transits  of 
laden oil barges to be one of the greatest risks to our treaty-protected resources and 
our way of life. 

Two National Academy of Sciences reports on the state of U.S. salvage capability 
point  out  the  immediate  need  for  improved  salvage  capacity  in  the  United  States. 
The U.S. Coast Guard is tasked with completing the Salvage and Firefighting rule-
making  as  part  of  OPA  90.  During  the  December  6,  2004  incident  involving  the 
Selendang  Ayu  over  400,000  gallons  of  oil  spilled  in  the  waters  surrounding  the 
Aleutian Islands. The Coast Guard and the State of Alaska, despite expending con-
siderable  resources  in  responding  to  the  incident  were  unable  to  prevent  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

Selendang Ayu from grounding. Governor Murkowsky of Alaska has since called for 
Coast  Guard  vessels  to  be  equipped  with  rescue  towing  capability.  This  option 
should be kept in mind for remote areas such as Neah Bay. Alternatively, uniquely 
capable Navy Powhatan Class salvage tugs could be strategically stationed in Neah 
Bay  and  operated  by  either  private  contractors,  Military  Sealift  Command,  the 
Navy, or the Coast Guard. 

In  our  own  waters  during  a  November  11th  incident  with  a  cargo  ship  the  Neah 
Bay  Rescue  tug  had  to  travel  16  hours  round  trip  from  Neah  Bay  to  Port  Angeles 
and back in order to pick up salvage equipment and boom—resources that could re-
side in Neah Bay. The salvage master and dive crew could have been transited into 
Neah  Bay  rather  than  having  the  tug  make  the  trip  to  PA.  Fortunately  the  bulk 
carrier Thrasyvoulos V was well offshore when the call came in. Passage of a strong 
Salvage and Firefighting rule should be a priority of this year. 

The National Academy of Sciences has also sponsored two separate reports on the 
state-of-knowledge  regarding  oil  spill  dispersants.  We  are  reviewing  this  second 
study carefully, and are concerned to find that the unknowns are still unknown. The 
lack  of  solid  conclusions  about  the  efficacy  and  effects  of  dispersants  in  cold  water 
and near-shore environments raises concerns with the Makah Tribe and the North-
west  Indian  Fish  Commission  Tribes  in  regard  to  the  appropriate  application  of 
dispersants  in  our  waters  and  the  rigor  with  which  such  information  is  being 
sought. 

Finally, in order for the Makah Tribe and the N.W. Indian Fisheries Commission 
to understand a real world picture of our state-of-readiness for oil spill response we 
need  to  conduct  oil  spill  drills.  We  know  how  difficult  it  is  to  respond  to  a  spill  in 
our region from first-hand experience, we do not have a clear understanding on how 
that  overall  capability  has  changed  or  improved  in  recent  years.  The  Makah  Tribe 
would  do  its  part  in  assisting  with  the  coordination  of  a  spill  drill  to  be  conducted 
off the Olympic Coast National Marine Sanctuary enabling us a realistic evaluation 
of  our  oil  spill  response  capabilities.  A  goal  of  the  original  OCNMS  Management 
Plan was to conduct an oil spill drill within the sanctuary boundaries. 

In  closing,  we  appreciate  the  Senator’s  leadership  in  reinstating  the  Oil  Spill  Li-
ability Trust Fund (OSLTF) and increasing its cap to $3 billion. We respectfully re-
quest  that  tribal  governments  be  allowed  to  draw  from  this  account  in  the  same 
manner  as  the  USCG  and  EPA.  This  ability  will  increase  our  capacity  to  address 
the  risks  associated  with  the  increasing  volumes  of  trade  moving  through  our 
shared waters. 

To summarize, the Makah Tribe and the Northwest Indian Fisheries Commission 
Tribes  stand  ready  to  constructively  contribute  to  the  level  of  oil  spill  readiness  in 
Washington  State  through  our  participation  in  the  development  of  oil  spill  policy, 
the Incident Command System, and as spill response contractors. However, in order 
maximize our contributions, increased levels of consultation will be needed with the 
tribes before and during our next oil spill. 

We  see  opportunities  for  improvements  to  our  oil  spill  prevention  and  response 
capabilities  at  the  Federal  level  through  the  finalization  of  the  Salvage  and  Fire-
fighting  rule,  continued  funding  of  a  rescue  tug  in  Neah  Bay,  oil  spill  drills  being 
used to identify where to stockpile equipment appropriate to the operating environ-
ment,  evaluation  of  the  oil  barge  traffic  moving  through  the  ATBA,  and  the  ability 
for state and tribal governments to exceed Federal response standards where appro-
priate. 

We have a mutual trust obligation to protect the treaty resources of the 20 feder-
ally  recognized  Indian  tribes  in  the  Pacific  Northwest.  We  appreciate  Senator 
Cantwell’s  leadership  in  calling  for  this  hearing,  and  look  forward  to  working  with 
her and the Committee to see that the recommendations are implemented. 

Thank you. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Sones.  Where  did  you  start 

your morning? 

Mr. SONES. In Port Angeles. And back there for the Journeys, the 

canoes are coming in today. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Even  that’s  a  distance,  but  I  thought  maybe 

you started on the reservation this morning. 

Mr.  SONES.  Well,  my  staff  did  so  they  came  and  picked  me  up. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  And  that  is  a  long  journey  to  get  here,  so 

thank you very much for being here. 

Mr. Holmes, did you want to go next? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

STATEMENT  OF  FRANK  E.  HOLMES,  NORTHWEST  REGIONAL 
MANAGER,  WESTERN  STATES  PETROLEUM  ASSOCIATION 
(WSPA) 
Mr.  HOLMES.  Sure.  Good  morning,  my  name  is  Frank  Holmes, 
I’m the Manager for the Northwest region for Western State Petro-
leum  Association,  or  WSPA.  WSPA  is  the  petroleum  trade  associa-
tion for the six western states. Our members produce, refine, mar-
ket, and transport petroleum and petroleum products. 

Thank you for inviting us here today to participate in this panel 
on  this  very  important  topic  of  oil  spill  prevention  response  in  the 
State  of  Washington.  Our  members  are  committed  to  oil  spill  pre-
vention  and  timely  and  effective  response  in  case  of  an  incident. 
Washington State is a major refining center with five refineries lo-
cated in the western portion of the state. These five refineries have 
a  combined  crude  oil  processing  capacity  of  approximately  621,000 
barrels per day. 

Washington State does not have any oil and gas production so all 
the  petroleum  the  state  consumes  needs  to  be  transported  in  the 
state.  Eighty-five  percent  of  the  crude  oil  refined  in  the  state  is 
transported  to  the  refineries  by  tanker,  with  the  remaining  being 
brought in by pipeline from Canada. Thirty-eight percent of the pe-
troleum products that are produced in Washington are transported 
by vessel. The remaining 50 percent is transported by pipeline. 

The Puget Sound is a safe waterway and supports marine vessel 
activities  from  both  the  United  States  and  Canada.  This  marine 
vessel activity includes a wide range of uses from transportation of 
goods and products to military operations to fishing to recreational 
boaters.  The  petroleum  industry  has  always  been  supportive  of  a 
robust oil spill prevention and response program. We willingly pay 
the barrel tax that funds the Department of Ecology’s oil spill pre-
vention and response program. 

The  industry  is  a  very  active  participant  in  the  oil  spill  preven-
tion  and  response  actions  within  the  State  of  Washington.  The  in-
dustry  is  engaged  in  every  possible  venue  to  consider  improve-
ments to the oil spill prevention and response, along with investing 
heavily  at  our  facilities  and  in  new  vessels  to  protect  the  Puget 
Sound. 

Here  are  some  of  the  more  recent  and  ongoing  examples  of  this. 
Some of these you’ve heard in the previous panel. Through the Pa-
cific  States/British  Columbia  Oil  Spill  Task  Force,  the  shipping 
routes were moved further offshore so that the tanker traffic of per-
sistent  oil  is  50  miles  or  more  offshore,  along  with  tug  and  barge 
traffic being 25 miles offshore. 

In  cooperation  with  the  Olympic  Coast  National  Marine  Sanc-
tuary,  the  area  to  be  avoided  was  established.  Also  the  Coast 
Guard  moved  the  entrance  buoy  to  the  Strait  of  Juan  de  Fuca  ten 
miles  further  offshore,  again  to  be  more  protected  by  moving  all 
vessels off shore. 

Under the OPA 90, the oil industry is spending billions of dollars 
to build the safest double hull redundant system tank ships in the 
world. The U.S. and Canadian industry jointly instituted the Inter-
national  Tug  of  Opportunity  Systems,  or  ITOS,  to  track  and  iden-
tify  tugs  within  the  Puget  Sound  that  could  be  called  to  support  a 
vessel  if  needed.  ITOS  is  now  being  enhanced  by  the  installation 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

of  the  AIS,  or  Automatic  Identification  System,  by  the  Coast 
Guard,  which  will  in  real-time  track  most  vessels  over  65  feet  and 
towing vessels over 26 feet. 

The  petroleum  industry  is  spending  millions  of  dollars  annually 
to  fund  oil  spill  response  organizations,  OSRO’s,  such  as  MSRC 
that is here today, which are located here in the Puget Sound. This 
funding  provides  for  the  acquisition  of  appropriate  equipment  and 
the  continuous  staffing  of  trained  personnel.  Individual  companies 
have  expended  large  amounts  for  dedicated  equipment  at  their  fa-
cilities,  and  have  ongoing  extensive  training  and  drill  programs  to 
keep employees ready to respond in the case of an incident. 

Industry  participates  in  the  Northwest  Area  Committee  which 
developed  the  area  contingency  plan  for  the  Puget  Sound.  The  in-
dustry  and  the  OSRO’s  have  been  instrumental  in  testing  the  pro-
tective  strategies  for  the  Geographic  Response  Plans  for  sensitive 
sites within the Puget Sound. 

The  petroleum  industry  provides  the  bulk  of  the  funding  for  the 
program  and  the  contingency  fund.  The  State  of  Washington  legis-
lature has established an Oil Spill Advisory Council under the Gov-
ernor’s office that is currently being organized, and industry hopes 
to actively participate in the council’s efforts. 

The industry is also currently engaged in a number of regulatory 
efforts here in the State of Washington. The Washington State Oil 
Spill Contingency Plan regulation is in the process of a stakeholder 
work  group.  This  effort  will  include  a  review  of  the  responsive 
equipment  requirements  for  the  state.  Also,  there  is  a  regulatory 
process to develop a rule for oil spill transfer regulations. This was 
instituted  through  a  piece  of  legislation  last  year,  and  this  regu-
latory  effort  focuses  on  the  booming  and  manpower  requirements 
for transfer operations. 

Industry  is  also  working  very  closely  with  the  Coast  Guard  on 
the Outer—Outer Coast Logistics Project to develop an initial data-
base identifying logistical and communication needs as well as local 
tribal and agency contact information. This effort is continuing. An-
other Coast Guard drill is planned for this fall. 

This  list  is  not  a  comprehensive  list,  but  I  hope  this  gives  you 
an understanding of the serious attention that’s being put forth by 
the  industry  regarding  the  issue  of  oil  spill  prevention  and  re-
sponse.  No  one  wants  to  spill  oil.  Industry  is  actively  engaged  in 
conducting  the  appropriate  activities  and  practices  to  reduce  the 
risk  inherit  in  the  transportation  of  oil  and  prevent  spills  from  oc-
curring.  Industry  is  also  trained  and  ready  to  respond  to  any  inci-
dent  that  may  occur  in  Washington.  Thank  you  again  for  allowing 
me to participate. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Holmes follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF FRANK E. HOLMES, NORTHWEST REGIONAL MANAGER, 

WESTERN STATES PETROLEUM ASSOCIATION (WSPA) 

Good  morning.  My  name  is  Frank  Holmes.  I  am  the  Manager  for  the  Northwest 
Region  for  Western  States  Petroleum  Association  (WSPA).  WSPA  is  the  petroleum 
trade  association  for  the  six  western  states.  Our  members  produce,  refine,  market, 
and  transport  petroleum  and  petroleum  products.  We  provide  the  transportation 
fuels  that  transparently  move  the  entire  economy  of  the  Northwest,  and  we  do  so 
while  responsibly  managing  virtually  every  drop  of  oil  and  product  throughout  the 
distribution system. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

Thank  you  for  inviting  us  to  participate  on  this  panel  today  to  discuss  the  very 
important topic of oil spill prevention and response in the state of Washington. Our 
members  are  committed  to  oil  spill  prevention  and  timely  and  effective  response  in 
the  case  of  an  incident.  We  are  surprised  that  the  oil  industry  was  not  contacted 
to participate in today’s Senate Hearing until last Wednesday evening. 

Washington  State  is  a  major  refining  center  with  five  refineries  located  in  the 
western  portion  of  the  state.  These  five  refineries  have  a  combined  crude  oil  proc-
essing  capacity  of  approximately  621,000  barrels  per  day  (in  2003  operated  at  94 
percent of capacity). 

Washington  does  not  have  any  oil  and  gas  production  so  all  of  the  petroleum  the 
state  consumes  needs  to  be  transported  into  the  state.  Eighty-five  percent  of  the 
crude oil refined in the state is transported to the refineries by tanker, with the re-
maining  being  brought  in  by  pipeline  from  Canada.  Thirty-eight  percent  of  petro-
leum  products  produced  in  Washington  are  transported  by  vessel,  with  50  percent 
being transported by pipeline. 

The  Puget  Sound  is  a  safe  waterway  and  supports  marine  vessel  activities  from 
both  the  United  States  and  Canada.  This  marine  vessel  activity  includes  a  wide 
range  of  uses  from  transportation  of  goods  and  products,  to  military  operations,  to 
fishing, to recreational boaters. 

The petroleum industry has always been supportive of a robust oil spill prevention 
and  response  program.  We  willingly  pay  the  barrel  tax  that  funds  the  Department 
of Ecology’s Oil Spill Prevention and Response Program. 

The industry is a very active participant in the Oil Spill Prevention and Response 
actions  in  Washington  State.  The  industry  is  engaged  in  every  venue  possible  to 
consider  improvements  in  oil  spill  prevention  and  response  along  with  investing 
heavily  at  our  facilities  and  in  new  vessels  to  protect  the  Puget  Sound.  Here  are 
some of the more recent and ongoing examples: 

1.  Through  the  Pacific  States/British  Columbia  Oil  Spill  Task  Force,  the  ship-
ping  routes  were  moved  further  offshore  so  the  tanker  traffic  of  persistent  oil 
is 50 miles or more offshore along with the tug and barge traffic being 25 miles 
offshore. 
2.  In  cooperation  with  the  Olympic  Coast  National  Marine  Sanctuary,  an  Area 
to Be Avoided (ATBA) was established which moved vessel traffic entering and 
leaving the Strait of Juan de Fuca further away from sensitive areas. 
3.  The  Coast  Guard  moved  the  entry  buoy  to  the  Strait  of  Juan  de  Fuca  10 
miles  further  offshore—again  to  be  more  protective  by  moving  all  vessels  fur-
ther offshore. 
4. Under the OPA 90 the oil industry is spending billions of dollars to build the 
safest double-hull/redundant system tank ships in the world. 
5. U.S. and Canadian industry jointly instituted the International Tug of Oppor-
tunity  System  (ITOS)  to  track  and  identify  tugs  within  the  Puget  Sound  that 
could  be  called  for  support  if  needed  by  a  vessel.  ITOS  is  now  being  enhanced 
with the installation of the Automatic Identification System (AIS) by the Coast 
Guard  which,  in  real-time  identifies  most  vessels  over  65  feet  and  towing  ves-
sels over 26 feet. 
6.  The  industry  supported  placement  of  an  equitably-funded-dedicated  tug  at 
the  entrance  to  the  Strait  of  Juan  de  Fuca  during  the  9-month  long  Oil  Spill 
Risk  Management  stakeholder  process  in  1999  and  2000  and  subsequent  legis-
lative funding efforts. 
7.  The  petroleum  industry  is  spending  millions  of  dollars  annually  to  fund  Oil 
Spill Response Organizations (OSROs) such as MSRC, located here in the Puget 
Sound.  This  funding  provides  for  the  acquisition  of  appropriate  equipment  and 
the continuous staffing of trained personnel. 
8.  Individual  companies  have  expended  large  amounts  for  dedicated  equipment 
at  their  facilities  and  have  ongoing  extensive  training  and  drill  programs  that 
keep employees ready to respond in the case of an incident. 
9.  Industry  participates  in  the  Puget  Sound  Harbor  Safety  Committee,  which 
has developed the Puget Sound Harbor Safety Plan and Standards of Care that 
focus on reducing the risks of spills. 
10. Industry participates in the N.W. Area Committee which developed the Area 
Contingency  Plan  for  the  Puget  Sound.  Industry  and  OSROs  have  been  instru-
mental  in  testing  the  protection  strategies  for  the  Geographic  Response  Plans 
(GRP) for sensitive sites throughout Puget Sound. 
11. The petroleum industry provides the bulk of the funding for the Washington 
State Department of Ecology Oil Spill program and the state’s contingency fund. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

12.  The  Washington  State  Legislature  has  established  an  Oil  Spill  Advisory 
Council  under  the  Governor’s  office  that  is  currently  being  organized.  Industry 
hopes to actively participate in the council’s efforts. 
13. Industry is currently an active participant in ongoing oil spill regulatory ac-
tivities such as: 

a.  The  re-write  of  the  Washington  State  Oil  Spill  Contingency  Plan  Regula-
tion  through  a  stakeholders  work  group.  This  effort  will  include  a  review  of 
the response equipment requirements for the state. 
b.  Participation  in  the  stakeholder  work  group  to  develop  Oil  Transfer  Regu-
lations  as  required  under  legislation  passed  last  year.  This  regulatory  effort 
focuses  on  booming  and  manpower  requirements  during  transfer  operations. 
c. Industry has worked very closely with the USCG on the Outer Coast Logis-
tics  Project  to  develop  an  initial  database  identifying  logistical,  and  commu-
nication  needs,  as  well  as  local  tribal  and  agency  contact  information.  This 
effort is continuing; another USCG drill is planned for this fall. 

This  is  not  a  comprehensive  list  of  activities,  but  I  hope  it  gives  you  an  under-
standing  of  the  serious  attention  being  put  forth  by  the  industry  concerning  the 
issue of Oil Spill Prevention and Response. 

NO ONE wants to spill oil. Industry is actively engaged in conducting the appro-
priate  activities  and  practices  to  reduce  the  risk  inherent  in  the  transportation  of 
oil  and  to  prevent  spills  from  occurring.  Industry  is  also  trained  and  ready  to  re-
spond to any spill incident that may occur in Washington. 

Thank you for inviting us to participate. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Holmes.  Mr.  Wright,  do  you 

want to go next? Thank you for being here. 

STATEMENT OF RICHARD WRIGHT, 

PACIFIC/NORTHWEST REGION VICE PRESIDENT, 
MARINE SPILL RESPONSE CORPORATION (MSRC) 

Mr. WRIGHT. Senator Cantwell, good morning. Thank you for this 
opportunity.  My  name  is  Richard  Wright.  I’m  the  Region  Vice 
President of the Marine Spill Response Corporation, Pacific North-
west  region,  that  encompasses  Washington,  Oregon  and  Hawaii. 
Prior to the merger last April of MSRC and Clean Sound Coopera-
tive,  Incorporated,  I  was  the  President  of  the  latter  response  orga-
nization.  I’m  also  a  retired  U.S.  Coast  Guard  captain  and  was  a 
member  of  the  Governor’s  and  District  Commander  Early  Action 
Task Force. 

The Marine Spill Response Corporation is the largest oil spill re-
sponse  and  cleanup  company  operating  in  the  United  States. 
MSRC  is  a  private,  not-for-profit  organization  founded  in  1990  by 
industry  as  a  direct  result  of  the  Oil  Pollution  Act  of  1990.  MSRC 
is  funded  by  the  Marine  Preservation  Association,  MPA,  whose 
member  companies  include  those  involved  in  the  transportation  of 
petroleum  products  by  water,  refining  companies,  pipeline  compa-
nies,  energy  companies,  as  well  as  various  other  types  of  shippers. 
Since the passage of OPA 90, MPA member companies have funded 
in excess of $1 billion to MSRC to develop and enhance oil spill re-
sponse capability. 

In  April  of  this  year  MSRC  merged  with  Clean  Sound  Coopera-
tive,  Incorporated,  an  Everett,  Washington-based,  industry-funded 
not-for-profit response organization, in existence since 1971 to pro-
vide oil spill response services to the oil industry in Western Wash-
ington.  At  the  time  of  the  merger  both  MSRC  and  Clean  Sound 
independently  had  significant  resources  that  greatly  exceeded  the 
U.S.  Coast  Guard  planning  capacities  required  to  meet  both  Facil-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

49 

ity  Response  Plans  as  well  as  Vessel  Response  Plans  under  OPA 
90 regulations. 

This  merger  has  enhanced  the  readiness  and  response  capabili-
ties in the State of Washington by making a larger inventory of re-
sponses—resources  available  as  well  as  access  to  the  broader  re-
source  base  of  MSRC  on  the  West  Coast  and  nationally.  Impor-
tantly,  the  merged  organization  provides  the  ability  for  a  member 
or the U.S. Coast Guard to call out and manage all of the combined 
resources with a single telephone call. 

As we all know, in an emergency situation, minimizing the inter-
faces  and  simplifying  decisionmaking  is  critical  to  the  success  of 
the  response,  particularly  in  the  earliest  hours.  The  merger  com-
bines  the  talents  of  both  MSRC  and  the  former  Clean  Sound,  who 
together  have  responded  to  over  500  spills  throughout  the  United 
States.  In  addition,  a  Memorandum  of  Agreement  between  MSRC 
and  Burrard  Clean  Operations  of  British  Columbia,  Canada,  af-
fords MSRC access to the considerable assets of that response orga-
nization. 

Nationally,  MSRC  has  400  dedicated  personnel  and  88  equip-
ment  sites  along  the  U.S.  Coastline  including  the  U.S.  Caribbean 
and  the  Hawaiian  Islands.  MSRC’s  entire  inventory  includes  15 
multi-million  dollar  state-of-the-art  ‘‘Responder’’  class  oil  spill  re-
sponse vessels and over 100 additional supporting oil spill response 
vessels  and  storage  barges.  We  have  600,000  feet  of  boom,  240 
skimming  systems,  and  mobile  emergency  telecommunications  ca-
pability.  In  addition  to  our  own  inventory,  MSRC  has  contracts 
with approximately 90 environmental service providers at over 200 
locations  nationwide  to  provide  additional  resources  at  the  time  of 
a spill. 

In Washington State alone, at manned sites in Tacoma, Port An-
geles, Anacortes, Bellingham, Seattle, and Everett, MSRC has over 
60  full-time  people  managing  the  most  comprehensive  inventory  of 
response  resources  and  equipment  in  any  one  area  in  the  entire 
United  States.  This  includes  16  dedicated  primary  response  ves-
sels,  over  40  support  vessels,  approximately  120,000  feet  of  boom, 
44  skimming  systems,  and  four  large  barges,  with  a  total  capacity 
of over 94,000 barrels or almost four million gallons, to ensure that 
recovered oil and water do not constrain a cleanup action. 

While  the  above  information  may  seem  to  be  mere  facts,  please 
allow  me  to  put  this  level  of  resource  base  into  a  perspective. 
Guidelines developed by the United States Coast Guard for a clas-
sification  of  oil  spill  removal  organizations,  OSRO’s,  are  based  on 
the  OSRO’s  ability  to  bring  quantities  of  resources  to  various  loca-
tions  within  certain  time  frames.  These  resources  include  skim-
ming capacity, booming capacity, and storage capacity examination. 
MSRC  has  received  the  highest  rating  available  under  the  sys-
tem, which was developed as part of OPA 90. Further, through in-
dustry  commitment  and  funding,  MSRC’s  resource  base  is  far  in 
excess  of  what  the  regulatory  guidelines  require,  even  for  those 
with the highest ratings. For example, depending on which location 
in  the  Puget  Sound  area  is  selected,  our  skimming  capacities  ex-
ceed such guidelines for initial timeframe requirements by at least 
five-fold. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

50 

Similarly, our storage and booming capacities exceed the Federal 
guidelines by over more than double, and in some cases by as much 
as ten-fold. The above are calculated only referencing MSRC-owned 
and dedicated equipment and not contractor resources which would 
greatly supplement this capability. 

Obviously,  the  above  demonstrates  the  commitment  on  the  part 
of MSRC and the funding companies of MPA to exceed Federal re-
quirements,  thereby  ensuring  a  strong  and  robust  response  capa-
bility  in  the  event  of  an  incident  in  Washington  State.  Further-
more,  all  the  MPA  member  companies  operate  a  significant  exer-
cise  and  drill  program  on  a  regular  basis  with  MSRC  to  ensure 
that not only the resource base is constantly tested, but also to en-
sure that the management processes are in place to successfully re-
spond to any discharges. 

We  all  know  prevention’s  the  key.  Like  firemen,  the  response 
community would like nothing better than to never have to respond 
to  a  spill.  Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  here  today.  I’m 
available to answer any questions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Wright follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF RICHARD WRIGHT, PACIFIC/NORTHWEST REGION VICE 

PRESIDENT, MARINE SPILL RESPONSE CORPORATION (MSRC) 

Good  morning.  My  name  is  Richard  Wright.  I  am  the  Region  Vice  President  of 
the  Marine  Spill  Response  Corporation  Pacific/Northwest  Region  that  encompasses 
Washington, Oregon, and Hawaii. Prior to the merger last April of MSRC and Clean 
Sound  Cooperative,  Inc.,  I  was  the  President  of  the  latter  response  organization.  I 
am also a retired U.S. Coast Guard Captain. 

The  Marine  Spill  Response  Corporation  (MSRC)  is  the  largest  oil  spill  response 
and  clean  up  company  operating  in  the  United  States.  MSRC  is  a  private,  not-for- 
profit  organization  founded  in  1990  by  industry  as  a  direct  result  of  the  Oil  Pollu-
tion  Act  of  1990.  MSRC  is  funded  by  the  Marine  Preservation  Association  (MPA) 
whose member companies include those involved in the transportation of petroleum 
products  by  water,  refining  companies,  pipeline  companies,  energy  companies,  as 
well as various other types of shippers. Since the passage of OPA 90, MPA member 
companies  have  funded  in  excess  of  $1  billion  dollars  to  MSRC  to  develop  and  en-
hance oil spill response capability. 

In April of this year, MSRC merged with Clean Sound Cooperative Inc., an Ever-
ett, Washington-based, industry-funded not-for-profit response organization in exist-
ence  since  1971  to  provide  spill  response  services  to  the  oil  industry  in  western 
Washington. At the time of the merger, both MSRC and Clean Sound independently 
had  significant  resources  that  greatly  exceeded  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard  planning  ca-
pacities  required  to  meet  both  Facility  Response  Plans  as  well  as  Vessel  Response 
Plans  under  OPA  90  regulations.  This  merger  has  enhanced  the  readiness  and  re-
sponse  capabilities  in  the  state  of  Washington  by  making  a  larger  inventory  of  re-
sources  available  as  well  as  access  to  the  broader  resource  base  of  MSRC  on  the 
west coast and nationally. Importantly, the merged organization provides the ability 
for  a  member  or  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard  to  call-out  and  manage  all  of  the  combined 
resources with a single phone call. As we all know, in an emergency situation, mini-
mizing the interfaces and simplifying decisionmaking is critical to the success of the 
response—particularly  in  the  earliest  hours.  The  merger  combines  the  talents  of 
both MSRC and the former Clean Sound, who together have responded to over 500 
spills  throughout  the  United  States.  In  addition,  a  Memorandum  of  Agreement  be-
tween  MSRC  and  Burrard  Clean  Operations  in  British  Columbia,  Canada,  affords 
MSRC access to the considerable assets of that response organization. 

Nationally, MSRC has 400 dedicated personnel and 88 equipment sites along the 
U.S.  coastline  including  the  U.S.  Caribbean  and  the  Hawaiian  Islands.  MSRC’s  en-
tire  inventory  includes  15  multi-million  dollar  state-of-the  art  ‘‘Responder’’-class  oil 
spill  response  vessels,  and  over  100  additional  supporting  oil  spill  response  vessels 
and storage barges, 600,000 feet of boom, 240 skimming systems, and mobile emer-
gency  tele-communications  capability.  In  addition  to  our  own  inventory,  MSRC  has 
contracts  with  approximately  90  environmental  service  providers  at  over  200  loca-
tions nationwide to provide additional resources at the time of a spill. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

51 

In  Washington  State  alone,  at  manned  sites  in  Tacoma,  Port  Angeles,  Anacortes, 
Bellingham,  Seattle,  and  Everett,  MSRC  has  over  60  full-time  personnel  managing 
the  most  comprehensive  inventory  of  response  resources  and  equipment  in  any  one 
area  in  the  entire  United  States.  This  includes  dedicated  16  primary  response  ves-
sels, over 40 support vessels, approximately 120,000 feet of boom, 44 skimming sys-
tems,  and  four  large  barges  (with  a  total  capacity  of  over  94,000  barrels  or  almost 
4,000,000 gallons) to ensure that recovered oil/water product does not constrain the 
clean-up. 

While  the  above  information  may  seem  to  be  mere  facts,  please  allow  me  to  put 
this  level  of  resource  base  into  perspective.  Guidelines  developed  by  the  United 
States  Coast  Guard  for  classification  of  Oil  Spill  Removal  Organizations  (OSROs) 
are based on the OSRO’s ability to bring quantities of resources to various locations 
within certain timeframes. These resources include skimming capacity, booming ca-
pacity, and storage capacity. MSRC has received the highest rating available under 
this  system  that  was  developed  as  part  of  OPA  90.  Further,  through  industry  com-
mitment and funding, MSRC’s resource base is far in excess of what the regulatory 
guidelines require, even for those with the highest ratings. For example, depending 
on  which  location  in  the  Puget  Sound  area  is  selected,  our  skimming  capacities  ex-
ceed  such  guidelines  for  initial  timeframe  requirements  by  at  least  five-fold.  Simi-
larly,  our  storage  and  booming  capacities  exceed  the  Federal  guidelines  by  over 
more  than  double,  and  in  some  cases  by  as  much  as  ten-fold.  The  above  are  cal-
culated  only  referencing  MSRC-owned  and  dedicated  equipment  and  not  contractor 
resources that would greatly supplement this capability. 

Obviously,  the  above  greatly  demonstrates  the  commitment  on  the  part  of  MSRC 
and  the  funding  companies  of  MPA  to  exceed  federal  requirements,  thereby  ensur-
ing  a  strong  and  robust  response  capability  in  the  event  of  an  incident  in  Wash-
ington State. Furthermore, all the MPA member companies operate a significant ex-
ercise and drill program on a regular basis with MSRC to ensure that not only the 
resource  base  is  constantly  tested,  but  also  to  ensure  that  the  management  proc-
esses  are  in  place  to  successfully  respond  to  any  discharges.  I  am  available  to  an-
swer any questions the Committee may have. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Wright,  for  being  here.  Doc-

tor, is it Leschine? 

Dr. LESCHINE. Leschine. 
Senator CANTWELL. Thank you for being here. 

STATEMENT OF PROFESSOR THOMAS M. LESCHINE, 

DIRECTOR, SCHOOL OF MARINE AFFAIRS, 

UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON 

Dr.  LESCHINE.  Thank  you  very  much.  I’m  very  pleased  and  hon-
ored  to  be  invited  to  speak  at  this  hearing,  Senator  Cantwell.  I’m 
a Professor and Director of the School of Marine Affairs at the Uni-
versity  of  Washington,  not  an  oil  spill  professional  per  se,  so  my 
remarks will be a little more general, broader, and reflective. 

I’ve  been  in  and  out  of  the  oil  spill  business  over  my  career.  I 
worked  in  the  late  1980s  to  help  develop  the  Washington  Com-
pensation  Schedule  that  the  state  now  uses  for  oil  spill  damages. 
I  developed  the  Federal  On-Scene  Coordinator’s  Report  for  the 
Exxon Valdez spill for the Coast Guard, and most recently I’ve been 
a  member  of  a  scientific  advisory  panel  of  an  organization  at  the 
University  of  New  Hampshire,  joint  between  them  and  NOAA,  the 
Coastal  Response  Resource  Center,  that  is  dedicated  to  promoting 
independent research. So I said all that just as background because 
I’m  going  to  reflect  in  my  testimony  on  my  experiences  in  those 
arenas. 

I’ve got four basic points to make, first of all, a comment on over-
all  safety  in  the  system  and  how  we’re  maintaining  it.  Second,  I’ll 
address  social  conflict,  because  I’m  a  social  policy  scientist,  and  I 
think  it’s  ever-present  and  doesn’t  tend  to  get  spoken  to  in  discus-
sions  that  are  primarily  technical.  Third,  I’ll  address  the  nature  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

52 

the risk. I’ve had a fair amount of experience as a risk assessment 
practitioner,  commenter.  And  last,  being  a  professor  it’s  only  right 
I should address research, so I’ll do that. 

First of all, with respect to the overall safety, it’s very clear that 
improvements  in  the  system  have  been  enormous  since  Exxon 
Valdez  occurred.  At  the  same  time  this  risk  will  never  be  reduced 
to zero and that’s why we’re all still here. And I guess I’ll just com-
ment that what we were doing before Exxon Valdez was relying on 
government  to  provide  the  ability  to  respond  to  spills.  What  we’re 
doing  now  is  relying  on  the  private  sector,  or  maybe  I  should  say 
non-governmental  organizations  such  as  Mr.  Wright  just  spoke  to. 
And I guess I just want to say that there are some inherent dif-
ficulties  here  because  just  the  extent,  to  the  extent  that  one  must 
maintain  profitability  in  private  sector  operations,  for  example, 
there’s  a  difficulty  in  maintaining  readiness.  You  know,  we  have  a 
Fire  Department  and  we  have,  and  the  Fire  Department  is  there 
if we need it, and firemen oftentimes are growing the best tomatoes 
in  town  because  they’ve  got  lots  of  time  to  tend  their  gardens.  It’s 
difficult to make money in that kind of a system. 

So  I  note  that  a  recent  report  to  the  State  of  Washington  by 
Glosten  Associates  made  reference  to  the  need  to  incorporate  ves-
sels of opportunity such as fishing vessels into the response system, 
and it seems that the State Department of Ecology is interested in 
doing,  and  maybe  in  spite  of  all  the  resources  that  we  obviously 
have available, things like this are, potentially, still needed. 

Let me go to my second point, social conflict. I think it’s inherent 
in  this  kind  of  situation  because  of  many,  many  reasons.  People 
don’t really expect oil spills, neither do the experts. The experts as-
sure  us  they  won’t  happen.  They  do  everything  they  can  to  ensure 
they  won’t  happen,  but  inevitably  one  does  and  sometimes  anger, 
disappointment,  and  other  sorts  of  reactions  are  the  result.  And 
there are always the questions of liability that seems to split people 
right down the middle when the lawyers get involved. 

So  I  think  it’s  worth  noting  that  the  arenas  in  which  we  talk 
about oil spills and oil spill prevention are really dominated by pro-
fessionals.  This  has  been  the  experience  my  whole  career.  And  the 
citizen voice is often fairly weak, in the background, sometimes to-
tally absent. So I think a heartening advance I see is that Governor 
Gregoire  signed  legislation  in  May  to  create  an  Oil  Spill  Advisory 
Council.  Social  scientists  that  have  looked  at  this  problem  often 
end  up  looking  at  the  Prince  William  Sound  Regional  Citizens  Ad-
visory Council as a model for really engaging stakeholders into the 
arena in which safety improvements are made. 

I participated in a National Academy study that reviewed a risk 
assessment  that  was  commissioned  by  the  Prince  William  Sound 
RCAC, and it was really interesting in our briefings with members 
of that organization how much industry and citizens and represent-
atives  of  industries  like  tourism  were  able  to  come  together  and 
talk constructively about what needed to be done under that mech-
anism. 

So if you’re going to do things like that, you need time to let rela-
tionships develop. You really need adequate resources to make sure 
the  organization  can  function,  and  people  really  have  to  be  willing 
to come to an agreement. Those are sort of necessities. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

53 

Let me go to the nature of the risk and I think I’ll just reinforce 
some of what I heard Captain Boothe say in Panel Number 1. The 
sources  of  risk  in  Washington  waters  I  think  are  extraordinarily 
complex  in  their  distribution.  As  I  mentioned,  I  was  part  of  an 
evaluation  of  a  big  risk  assessment  study  that  cost  more  than  a 
million  dollars  that  was  conducted  in  Prince  William  Sound  in  the 
late 1990s. 

The panel that I was on came to the conclusion that Prince Wil-
liam  Sound  was  actually  relatively  simple  as  a  problem  of  risk 
analysis  compared  to  Puget  Sound.  So  what  this  says  to  me,  and 
I should add my background’s in mathematics, but I’m going to say 
I  don’t  think  technical  analysis  is  as  useful  as  we  make  it,  and 
really it’s deliberation where you’re constantly talking about, ‘‘what 
are the sources of risk’’ that is important. 

I think the Sound is very different in the sense that spill risk on 
the  outer  coast  is  dominated  by  the  prospects  of  a  large  tanker 
spill,  but  when  you  get  into  the  interior  parts  of  Puget  Sound,  it’s 
the  bunkering  operations,  it’s  the  wealth  of  different  craft  on  the 
water.  The  fact  that  it  is  a  pleasure  craft  can  precipitate  a  major 
accident  just  by  misbehaving.  I  was  a  Commissioner  of  Pilotage  in 
this state for 7 years, and it was amazing how many times vessels 
were  forced  to  leave  the  lanes,  or  actually  collisions  occurred  with 
passenger  vessels  that  were  anchored  in  the  sea  lanes,  despite  all 
of the prohibitions against that. 

So  these  are  real  difficulties,  and  it  tells  you  we’ve  really  got  to 
keep  looking  at  the  whole  system.  I  think  there  was  a  period  that 
I  hope  we’ve  gotten  past  where  we  were  being  forced  to  consider 
this  ‘‘either/or’’  choice,  a  tug  in  Neah  Bay  or  times  of  opportunity. 
I  don’t  think  we  should  be  looking  at  risk  reduction  as  an  either/ 
or  measure.  I  think  we  should  look  at  all  the  sources  of  risk  and 
address each in proportion to its reality of occurring. 

As  Captain  Boothe  said,  it’s  the  probability  times  the  con-
sequence,  and  the  things  that  happen  over  and  over  again  may  be 
relatively  low  consequence  but  they  are  higher  probability  events. 
My last point about research, I think research is really essential 
to  not  only  improving  the  technology,  the  ability  to  respond,  but 
also to understanding what it is that people are looking for to head 
off social conflict. So to me a proper research agenda is technology 
and  engineering,  it’s  natural  science  and  it’s  social  science,  it’s 
dealing with the human dimensions of oil spill risk. 

I don’t think that happens very often. I think there’s a real prob-
lem in the kind of responses that happen to major spills like Exxon 
Valdez where the nature of the research that’s done is injury deter-
mination, and when you look at what the ecologists have to say 10 
or 15 years later, such as Charles Peterson in an article in Science 
that appeared last year, it turns out there can be long-term effects 
that  really  are  the  issue  and  the,  you  know,  kind  of  immediate 
acute  toxicity  and  lethality  is  still  being  debated  as  to  whether, 
how consequential it was. 

So  we  have  to  be  mindful  of  asking  the  wrong  questions.  And 
when you use an incidence of a spill as the basis for launching re-
search, you’re never in a very good position for that research to do 
as well as it could. So you need other mechanisms and I think the 
CRRC mechanisms that I mentioned—which I think was set up by 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

54 

Senator Judd Gregg; is that right? New Hampshire?—is very inter-
esting  because  it  is  independent  and  it  is  a  group.  I’m  a  member 
of  a  panel  of  natural  and  social  scientists.  We  meet  annually.  We 
have  a  lot  of  feelers  out  and  we  look  at  what  we  think  needs  to 
be  done  and  then  we  try  to  convince  people  to  apply  for  funds  to 
do it. 

It’s  a  competitive  grants  program,  everything  is  peer-reviewed, 
and  as  a  result  we’re  taking  on  now  with  the  research  project 
something  that  the  American  Petroleum  Institute  has  been  urging 
be done, that is, to try to come up with agreed performance stand-
ards for oil spill response and prevention. 

And  yes,  prevention  systems  can  be  evaluated  too.  How  do  we 
know  they’re  really  ready  to  go?  It’s  a  difficult  question,  and  part 
of the major difficulty is that we have to really get everybody’s per-
spective  on  this.  There  isn’t  some  magic  set  of  indicators  that  are 
the  right  indicators  to  assess  readiness  of  the  system.  We  can 
quickly  spew  out  all  kinds  of  numbers  on  how  much  of  this  and 
that equipment we’ve got, but what does readiness really mean? As 
we are learning more and more we need to really ask that question 
very  broadly,  and  you  can’t  do  that  if  you  don’t  have  social  sci-
entists,  I  would  argue,  as  part  of  the  group  that’s  doing  that  kind 
of thing. 

So  I  think  also  more  could  be  done  with  organizations  like  the 
National Sea Grant program. Even institutions like my own, we get 
officers from the Coast Guard who come and collect our master de-
gree  in  marine  affairs,  and  while  they’re  there,  they  often  take  on 
a  research  project,  something  the  Coast  Guard  asks  them  to  do.  A 
recent graduate of our program developed a system to evaluate re-
sponsive  response  preparedness  for  the  Coast  Guard,  developed  a 
framework  for  it.  He  was  then  passed  to  Washington,  D.C..  to  put 
that  system  into  operation.  So  I  think  that  ability  to  step  outside 
the formal mechanism sometimes is very useful. 

I guess my last comment is just, you know, thoughts on learning 
because  that’s  what  this  is  all  about,  that’s  what  I  stand  for.  You 
have  a  choice.  Are  you  going  to,  you  know,  learn  from  disaster, 
which  is  trying  to  recoup  after  some  catastrophe  occurs,  or  do  you 
want  to  really  learn  by  design  and  be  more  conscious  about  it?  I 
think the fundamental problem in this arena is that we tend to get 
all  excited  and  pour  money  into  problems  in  the  event  of  major 
spills,  and  then  we  let  our  guard  down  and  we  don’t  do  much  in 
the interregnum between events, and that’s when we really should 
be  putting  together  our  Citizen’s  Advisory  Councils,  deliberating 
about  safety,  and  not  pretending  like  just  because  nothing’s  hap-
pened for 5 years, the problem is solved. 

Thank you very much, I’d be happy to answer any questions. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Leschine follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF PROFESSOR THOMAS M. LESCHINE, DIRECTOR, 

SCHOOL OF MARINE AFFAIRS, UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON 

My  name  is  Tom  Leschine.  I  am  Professor  of  Marine  Affairs  at  the  University  of 
Washington where I have been since 1983. I became Director of UW’s School of Ma-
rine  Affairs  in  2003.  My  academic  training  is  in  mathematics,  and  my  research  ca-
reer  has  been  in  ocean  policy  studies  with  an  emphasis  on  environmental  decision-
making,  especially  with  regard  to  pollution  policy  and  management.  A  considerable 
portion  of  my  work  has  emphasized  the  conduct  and  application  of  risk  assessment 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

55 

studies  in  support  of  public  policy  decisions  affecting  the  environment.  I’m  a  long- 
time member of the Society for Risk Analysis. 

Oil  spill  prevention,  preparedness  and  response  have  been  among  my  academic 
pursuits  since  the  late  1980s,  when  I  received  a  grant  from  the  Washington  State 
Legislature  to  provide  research  support  to  the  Department  of  Ecology  in  the  devel-
opment  of  more  effective  approaches  to  oil  spill  damage  assessment.  The  resulting 
Washington  Oil  Spill  Compensation  Schedule,  adopted  by  the  state  legislature  in 
1989, has greatly facilitated Ecology’s ability to assure the public is adequately com-
pensated  for  damage  to  public  resources  caused  by  oil  spills.  In  the  early  1990s  I 
served  as  Historian  for  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard,  leading  the  team  that  prepared  the 
Federal  On-Scene  Coordinator’s  Report  for  the  Exxon  Valdez  oil  spill.  I  served  as  a 
Commissioner  of  Maritime  Pilotage  in  the  state  for  7  years  during  the  1990s,  and 
currently  I’m  a  member  of  the  Scientific  Advisory  Board  of  the  Coastal  Response 
Restoration  Center  (CRRC).  The  CRRC  is  a  joint  center  of  NOAA’s  Office  of  Re-
sponse  and  Restoration  and  the  University  of  New  Hampshire  whose  mission  is  to 
support  research  aimed  at  improving  oil  spill  preparedness,  response  and  restora-
tion  capabilities  through  a  competitive  grants  program.  I’ve  also  served  on  numer-
ous  National  Research  Council  Committees,  one  of  which  examined  the  quality  of 
risk  assessments  being  conducted  to  identify  effective  risk  reduction  measures  for 
Prince William Sound oil transport, in the wake of the Exxon Valdez spill. 

I am honored to be invited to testify at this field hearing on vessel-source oil pol-
lution  being  held  by  the  U.S.  Senate  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Trans-
portation’s Subcommittee on Fisheries and the Coast Guard. I wish to address four 
points in my testimony. These points are summarized in bulleted paragraphs below. 
• Significant  improvements  have  been  made  in  the  safety  of  oil  transport  since 

the Exxon Valdez spill, both nationally and in Washington State. 

—Oil spill risk will never be reduced to zero however, and additional improve-
ments in the total system that deals with oil spill prevention, preparedness 
and response for Washington waters remain necessary. Reliance on the pri-
vate sector for provision of response resources—the current approach—is in-
herently problematic due to the necessity of maintaining profitability. 

—The  recommendation  of  the  June  2005  report  by  The  Glosten  Associates 
(Oil  Spill  Response  Vessel  Capabilities  in  Washington)  to  increase  reliance 
of fishing vessels and other vessels of opportunity offers an innovative way 
to  address  this  problem,  though  non-specialized  vessels  may  not  prove 
equally useful or available in all circumstances, suggesting the need for ad-
ditional specialized assets as well. 
• Social conflict is inherent in the arena of oil spill prevention, preparedness and 
response.  Historically  little  has  been  done  to  address  this  problem  directly,  de-
spite  the  high  costs  it  can  impose  on  efforts  to  deal  with  spills  and  safety  im-
provements. 

—The  arenas  in  which  oil  spill  safety  is  deliberated  have  been  overly  domi-
nated  by  government  and  industry,  with  the  public  voice  absent  or  weak, 
and this has been true in Washington State. 

—The  public  is  vulnerable  to  ‘‘hindsight  bias’’  a  psychological  heuristic  that 
colors public reactions when the fact of an oil spill on the water belies ear-
lier  assurances  by  experts,  public  officials,  and  industry  representatives 
that everything was under control. 

—Studies  suggest  that  the  Prince  William  Sound  Regional  Citizens  Advisory 
Council  is  an  effective  model  for  citizen  participation  (G.  Busenberg,  Inno-
vation,  learning  and  policy  evolution  in  hazardous  systems,  American  Be-
havioral Scientist 44(4) 679, 2000.) Legislation signed by Governor Gregoire 
in May creating an oil spill advisory council (ESSB 5432, Chapt. 304, Laws 
of  2005)  could  produce  a  similar  body  for  Washington,  a  major  advance  in 
my view. Time, sufficient resources, and commitment by all parties to nego-
tiate an agreement will be necessary for the new council to work effectively. 
• The  sources  of  oil  spill  risk  in  Washington  waters—particularly  in  Puget 
Sound—are  numerous  and  interconnected  in  difficult-to-understand  ways.  This 
seriously  complicates  the  task  of  finding  a  few  key  remedies  that  convincingly 
reduce the overall risk of spills. The whole maritime transport and oil-handling 
system  needs  to  be  examined  critically  for  sources  of  risk  and  reexamined  fre-
quently. 

—Spill risk on the outer coast and Strait of Juan de Fuca is likely dominated 
by different threats than risk in more inland waters, especially central and 
southern  Puget  Sound,  where  risk  is  likely  most  associated  with  non-tank-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

56 

ship  traffic  and  operations—for  example,  fueling  operations.  Pleasure  craft 
or  other  non-commercial  or  non-oil  transport  vessels  can  easily  emerge  as 
proximate  causes  of  oil  spills,  or  themselves  be  directly  involved  in  inci-
dents  that  lead  to  significant  spills.  The  1991  Tenyo  Maru  spill  resulted 
from  a  collision  between  a  Japanese  fishing  vessel  and  a  Chinese  freighter 
in  Canadian  waters,  but  close  enough  to  Cape  Flaherty  to  cause  consider-
able environmental damage in its vicinity. 

—Much  rhetoric  over  the  past  several  years  has  suggested  the  region  needs 
to  make  ‘‘either/or’’  choices  on  protection,  an  unrealistically  oversimplified 
proposition in my view. Resources need to be invested in each aspect of the 
oil spill risk problem in proportion to the risk each poses, and in ways that 
effectively  address  identified  risks.  The  challenge  is  to  know  when  we’ve 
done enough or done the right things. 

—Approaches  dominated  by  technical  analysis,  like  that  of  the  major  Prince 
William  Sound  risk  assessment  study  evaluated  by  the  National  Research 
Council  several  years  ago  (Review  of  the  Prince  William  Sound,  Alaska, 
Risk  Assessment  Study,  National  Academies  Press,  1998),  are  likely  less 
useful  in  Puget  Sound,  meaning  more  reliance  needs  to  be  placed  on  open, 
active, and transparent deliberation among all parties on the likely sources 
of  risk  and  what  can  be  done  to  address  them.  This  reinforces  the  value 
of  a  Prince  William  Sound  RCAC-like  model  for  Washington  State  in  my 
view. 
• Research is vital to understand how better to avoid major oil spills and to deal 
with  their  aftermath.  But  opportunities  and  funding  for  research  are  too  fre-
quently tied to oil spill incidents, where social conflict and questions of legal li-
ability  make  it  difficult  for  the  right  research  to  be  done,  or  for  research  to  be 
sustained to the point where real understanding emerges. Moreover, oil spill re-
search has historically been dominated by the natural sciences and engineering, 
at the expense of understanding important ‘‘human dimensions’’ of oil spill pre-
vention, preparedness and response. 

—Marine  ecologists  have  argued  that  oil  spills  set  researchers  up  to  ask  the 
wrong  questions,  focusing  on  quantifying  wildlife  injury  rather  than  trying 
to understand how best to help the areas affected by a spill get on the road 
to  recovery  (R.  Paine  and  others,  ‘‘Trouble  on  oiled  waters’’  Annual  Review 
of  Ecological  Systems,  27:197–235,  1996).  A  recent  radical,  new  (and  much 
discussed) view on how difficult recovery from a spill like Exxon Valdez can 
be  given  the  continued  presence  of  hydrocarbon  contaminants  in  sensitive 
environments—propounded  by  Charles  Peterson  of  the  University  of  North 
Carolina  and  colleagues—emerged  only  after  more  than  a  decade  of  moni-
toring results were available for analysis (C.H. Peterson and others, ‘‘Long- 
term  ecosystem  response  to  the  Exxon  Valdez  oil  spill’’,  Science  302:  2082– 
2086, 2003). 

—Important ‘‘human dimensions’’ of oil spill prevention, preparedness and re-
sponse  have  received  much  less  attention  than  natural  scientific  and  engi-
neering aspects. 

—Human factors that can influence profoundly the real level of safety in risky 
technologies  like  marine  oil  transport  are  receiving  increasing  attention, 
but data is difficult to come by due to the relative rarity of spill events and 
factors  like  legal  liability.  Information  on  ‘‘near  misses’’  is  crucial,  and  the 
airline industry has been very successful in developing good data, while ef-
forts  to  do  the  same  thing  in  the  maritime  domain  seem  to  remain  beset 
by difficulties. 

—Developing accurate and sensitive indicators of ‘‘what counts for success’’ in 
the  performance  of  preparedness,  prevention,  and  response  systems—as 
judged  from  the  perspective  of  all  interests  potentially  affected  by  spills— 
is an especially important task that has to include researchers from the so-
cial sciences to be done properly. A 1999 issue paper of the American Petro-
leum  Institute,  underscores  the  importance  of  this  problem  (Judging  Oil 
Spill  Performance:  The  Challenge  of  Competing  Perspectives,  API  Technical 
Report IOSC–008, prepared by June Lindstedt-Siva, 1999). 

—A  potentially  useful  and  innovative  model  for  bolstering  research  quality 
and  scope  is  the  Coastal  Response  Research  Center  (CRRC),  a  partnership 
between  NOAA’s  Office  of  Response  and  Restoration  in  Silver  Spring,  MD, 
and the University of New Hampshire. The CRRC operates through a peer- 
reviewed competitive grants program. It uses its Scientific Advisory Panel— 
of  which  I  am  a  member—to  make  an  independent  assessment  of  research 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

57 

needs, and to encourage researchers to develop proposals to address under- 
researched questions. 

—The  National  Sea  Grant  College  Program  could,  with  encouragement,  also 
become  an  effective  conduit  of  research  in  these  areas,  and  the  practice  of 
the U.S. Coast Guard to select promising junior officers for graduate train-
ing  in  schools  like  the  School  of  Marine  Affairs  has  also  been  effective  in 
developing  fresh  perspectives  on  problems  of  preparedness,  prevention  and 
response  that  then  get  carried  back  to  the  parent  organization.  A  recent 
student of mine at the School of Marine Affairs, USCG Lt. Cdr. Drew Tucci, 
devoted  his  master’s  thesis  to  developing  understanding  of  impediments  to 
evaluating  oil  spill  response  readiness,  and  his  work  proved  so  useful  that 
the Coast Guard tasked him with the further development and implementa-
tion  of  his  own  recommended  approach  to  evaluating  response  readiness 
upon his assignment to Coast Guard headquarters following graduation. 

As  a  final  thought,  opportunities  for  learning  about  the  nature  of  risk  and  what 
to do about it, as well as for learning how best to cope with the environmental and 
social  costs  incurred  as  a  result  of  a  major  oil  spill  should  one  occur,  are  essential. 
The  kind  of  learning  I’m  talking  about  includes  robust  organizational  design  such 
as the Prince William Sound RCAC seems to represent, as well as research and de-
velopment. The key is to take advantage of opportunities to learn outside the situa-
tion  of  being  in  the  midst  of  a  major  oil  spill.  I  alluded  earlier  to  the  work  of  Prof. 
George Busenberg of the University of Colorado at Denver, in reference to the PWS 
RCAC.  To  paraphrase  what  he  said  in  his  article,  do  you  want  to  try  to  learn  from 
disaster  with  a  major  oil  spill  already  on  your  doorstep  and  with  passions  running 
high  and  the  likelihood  of  genuine  learning  low,  or  would  you  rather  learn  by  de-
sign,  through  considered  and  ongoing  deliberation  among  all  parties  potentially  af-
fected  by  a  major  oil  spill  should  one  occur,  in  an  environment  defined  by  the  ab-
sence of a spill disaster and with the prospects of useful learning much more likely 
to be high? 

I  sincerely  thank  the  distinguished  Senator  and  her  staff  for  this  opportunity  to 
present  my  thoughts  on  ways  to  address  the  risks  that  oil  spills  from  vessels  pose 
to Washington waters, and ways to reduce those risks, at this hearing. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Thank  you,  Doctor  Leschine.  Let’s  let  Mr. 
Felleman go next and then we have questions for all the panelists. 
But thank you for being here. 

STATEMENT OF FRED FELLEMAN, NORTHWEST DIRECTOR, 

OCEAN ADVOCATES 

Mr.  FELLEMAN.  Thank  you,  Senator  Cantwell  and  members  of 
the  Subcommittee,  wherever  they  may  be.  I  appreciate  this  oppor-
tunity  to  testify  and  want  to  tell  you  that  Ocean  Advocates  is  a 
small  national  non-profit  NGO  that  specializes  in  maritime  safety. 
Our Executive Director Sally Lentz often goes to the IMO and goes 
often  on  behalf  of  other  environmental  organizations.  We’re  also  a 
member  of  the  Shipping  Safety  Partnership,  a  coalition  of  Alaska 
Natives,  commercial  fishermen,  recreation,  science  and  community 
interests  formed  in  response  to  the  December  2004  Selendang  Ayu 
incident  in  the  Aleutian  Islands,  specifically  addressing  maritime 
safety in the Great Circle route. 

There  is  certainly  no  question  that  a  major  oil  spill  here  would 
be  the  straw  that  breaks  the  ecosystem’s  back.  And  the  last  time 
this sort of question was addressed was in this newspaper clipping 
I  have  from  June  17,  1989,  ‘‘Big  Oil  Spill  Here,  Are  We  Unpre-
pared?’’  We  are  unprepared.  This  is  when  the  Merchant  Marine 
Fisheries Committee held a hearing here on the heels of the Exxon 
Valdez  and  this  archival  photograph  is  for  you  to  keep  and  should 
be  part  of  the  record.  You’ll  see  Jolene  Unsoeld,  and  John  Miller, 
and Congressman Dicks and other familiar faces. 

[The information referred to follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

58 

Seattle Post—Intelligencer, June 17, 1989 

BIG OIL SPILL HERE? WE’RE UNPREPARED 

By Mike Merritt 

The  Coast  Guard,  state  officials  and  oil-industry  groups  told  a  U.S.  House  Sub-
committee  yesterday  that  Washington  State  is  unprepared  for  an  oil  spill  as  large 
as the one that fouled Alaska’s Prince William Sound. 

The Nestucca barge spill off Washington’s coast in December dumped 231,000 gal-
lons  of  oil  into  the  sea,  and  the  spill  ‘‘stretched  our  resources  to  the  limit,’’  said 
Christine Gregoire, Director of the Washington State Department of Ecology. 

More  than  11  million  gallons  of  oil  spilled  from  the  Exxon  Valdez  when  it  ran 

aground on March 24. 

‘‘It  goes  without  saying  we  are  not  prepared,  nor  could  we  respond,  to  a  Valdez 

spill in Washington State,’’ said Gregoire. 

Gregoire and other officials painted a bleak picture of the consequences of a major 
spill  in  Puget  Sound  during  day-long  testimony  in  Seattle  before  the  House  Coast 
Guard and Navigation Subcommittee. 

Yesterday’s hearing was the first in a series across the country on oil spills. Rep. 
Bill Tauzin, D–LA., Committee Chairman, has sponsored legislation to create a na-
tionwide $500 million fund to clean up oil spills. 

‘‘The issue is not if another spill will happen, but when and where it will happen,’’ 

said Tauzin. 

Coast  Guard  and  industry  authorities  came  under  tough  questioning  from  mem-
bers  of  Washington’s  Congressional  delegation,  including  Democratic  Reps.  Norm 
Dicks,  Jolene  Unsoeld,  and  Jim  McDermott  and  Republicans  Rod  Chandler  and 
John Miller. 

McDermott and Sen. Brock Adams, D–WA, are sponsoring legislation requiring all 
new  oil  tankers  be  built  with  double-bottoms  as  a  safety  measure,  a  measure  the 
industry opposes as unnecessary. 

Dicks said Alaskan officials and oil companies had 14 years to plan for an oil spill 
in  Prince  William  Sound.  ‘‘Sadly,  after  14  years,  that  system,  when  it  was  called 
on, failed,’’ he said. 

The Coast Guard’s regional commander, Rear Adm. Robert Kramek, conceded that 
a  spill  in  Puget  Sound  the  size  of  the  Exxon  Valdez  disaster  had  never  been  con-
templated in contingency planning. If a spill that large occurred today, ‘‘there is not 
enough equipment existing in Puget Sound’’ to clean up the oil, Kramek said. 

In the case of a spill, Kramek has authority to take over the cleanup if the spiller 
fails  to  respond  or  acts  too  slowly.  Kramek  said,  however,  that  the  oil  industry  in 
Washington has been cooperative in planning and carrying out cleanup efforts. 

But  Miller,  citing  the  disarray  among  government  and  industry  groups  after  the 
Alaska  spill,  asked  whether  the  Coast  Guard  should  not  have  immediate  powers  to 
clean up a spill before it spreads too far. 

Dicks, while praising the Coast Guard’s efforts, said the Puget Sound Vessel Traf-
fic  Control  System’s  radars  are  outdated,  can’t  see  ships  in  key  locations  and  don’t 
extend to Tacoma. 

He  noted  that  the  Coast  Guard  cannot  order  industry  to  keep  oil-containment 

booms, oil skimmer vessels and other equipment ready for a spill. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e

.

1
t
r
a

59 

‘‘I think that is a gap, yes, I do,’’ replied Kramek. 
Petroleum  industry  speakers  told  lawmakers  the  Valdez  spill  has  prompted  a  re- 
evaluation  of  plans  for  coping  with  a  much  more  massive  spill  than  they  now  can 
handle. 

An  industry  cleanup  organization,  Clean  Sound  Cooperative.  has  $9  million  in 

equipment on hand to respond to spills. 

‘‘Clean Sound and its member companies are committed to ensuring the protection 
of Puget Sound and making sure that a Valdez spill never happens here,’’ said John 
Wiechert, a former Coast Guard officer and Clean Sound Manager. 

Only since the Valdez spill, Wiechert said, has the industry begun a study of how 
much  and  what  kinds  of  equipment  would  be  needed  to  handle  a  ‘‘worst-case’’  spill 
of 7 million to 8 million gallons of oil in Puget Sound. 

Wiechert declined to predict how much more equipment would be needed for such 

a spill, but he said the industry group should make decisions within a month. 

Industry  authorities  rejected  charges  from  environmental  groups  that,  their  oil- 
spill  contingency  plans  have  been  kept  secret.  They  offered  to  make  available  the 
computer databases that would guide a response in the event of a spill. 

Environmentalists called for tough new regulations requiring each oil tanker and 

barge, and each oil-handling facility. to have its own emergency cleanup plan. 

But  I  greatly  appreciate  the  fact  that  your  leadership  has  re-
duced the likelihood that this incident would be happening here in 
the  tradition  of  the  late  Senator  Magnuson.  Not  only  are  we 
pleased  that  this  hearing  addresses  issues  that  we  normally  only 
see or hear about when dead birds are on TV and there’s oil in the 
water,  but  I’m  particularly  thankful  for  your  effort  in  drafting  the 
energy bill—three provisions are worthy of note and recognition. 

Specifically, taking the Arctic National Wildlife Refuge out of the 
bill shows that we can’t drill our way to energy independence; sec-
ond,  the  inclusion  of  the  $500  million  in  subsidies  for  biofuels  will 
make  a  substantial  contribution  to  our  reduction  in  our  regional 
energy  needs  and  hopefully  reduce  the  amount  of  tanker  traffic; 
and third, the passage of Senate Bill 1222 certainly makes a large 
step toward filling the gap in our Nation’s ability to respond to and 
prevent oil spills. 

I’m  of  the  belief,  at  the  time  and  still  of  the  belief  to  this  day, 
that  a  contributing  factor  to  the  slowness  of  the  response  to  the 
Dalco  Pass  spill  had  to  do  with  concerns  about  the  money  in  the 
bank. The fact is we should no longer need to worry when you don’t 
have  a  responsible  party,  that’s  when  you  have  to  open  the  bank 
account. Your leadership on S. 1222 makes that so. 

The  Dalco  Pass  mystery,  there  was  no  mystery.  We  knew  there 
was  a  black  oil  spill  in  the  Sound,  a  mariner  reported  it,  but  we 
didn’t  know  who  was  going  to  pay  the  bill.  Any  sort  of  question 
that our responding agencies have that there won’t be somebody to 
pay the bill should not be on their mind. Having the money in the 
bank is a great thing. 

The fact that we had low impact to wildlife, people say is a good 
thing.  I  suggest  to  you  it’s  perhaps  because  there  isn’t  that  much 
wildlife  to  impact  anymore  and  it’s  quite  concerning  that  we  could 
have  a  spill  of  that  size,  without  more  noticeable  impact.  Having 
spent  a  lot  of  time  on  the  water,  doing  my  graduate  work  on  ma-
rine  wildlife,  I  conclude  the  fact  that  we  didn’t  hit  more  wildlife  is 
because  it’s  harder  to  find  sea  birds  on  the  sea,  and  this  is  a  not 
a good thing. 

One  promising  technology  for  both  preventing  and  responding  to 
oil  spill  is  salvage.  Salvage  includes  a  wide  range  of  technologies 
from  firefighting,  spill  response,  pulling  a  ship  off  the  beach, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

60 

dewatering  a  sinking  ship.  Salvage  tugs  can  also  assist  in  spill  re-
sponse  and  lifesaving  exercises,  but  despite  the  fact  that  Congress 
called  for  a  salvage  and  firefighting  rule  in  OPA  90,  the  Coast 
Guard still has not implemented such a regulation. The distraction 
associated with homeland security should not be seen as an excuse, 
but actually a further reason for implementing this law, because in 
fact  the  potential  risks  for  environmental  terrorism  or  impacts  to 
cruise  ships  or  ferries  associated  with  post-9/11  concerns  is  only 
heightening  the  need  for  increased  salvage  posture  in  the  United 
States. 

The  cost  effectiveness  of  salvage  can  only  be  best  articulated 
when  you  look  at  incidences  like  the  New  Carrissa  or  the 
Selendang  Ayu.  New  Carrissa  cost  over  a  hundred  million  dollars 
when you include fines, and the ship’s still on the beach. Selendang 
Ayu  is  expected  to  cost  three  times  that  amount,  and  it’s  unlikely 
that they’re going to get the ship off the beach—not to mention the 
endangered plovers that were impacted off of Oregon and the thou-
sands  of  marine  mammals,  sea  birds,  and  subsistence  lifestyles 
that were impacted in Alaska. 

In  2002,  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard  and  the  Navy  hosted  a  Maritime 
Salvage  Conference  in  Seattle.  The  Admiralty  Counsel  to  the  U.S. 
National  Supervisor  of  Salvage,  Richard  Buckingham,  presented  a 
paper  and  I  would  like  to  quote  a  very  brief  section.  ‘‘The  problem 
of inadequate domestic marine salvage capacity is well documented 
and  recognized  by  both  the  government  and  commercial  sectors; 
furthermore, the situation is not getting any better. Because of the 
Nation’s  overriding  interest  in  the  protection  of  the  environment/ 
economy/marine  transportation  system,  as  well  as  meeting  home-
land  security  needs,  we  need  a  cohesive  Federal  national  savage 
policy.’’ 

This has been reiterated by numerous reports, and in fact one of 
the  ways  in  which  to  address  this  need  could  be  through  the  re-
building  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  Deepwater  fleet.  The  Coast  Guard 
doesn’t  put  towing  winches  on  their  cutters,  but  in  fact  when,  of-
tentimes when the Navy surpluses cutters to the Coast Guard, they 
take  the  towing  winches  off.  In  fact  we  could  have  probably  kept 
the  Selendang  Ayu  off  the  beach  if  one  of  those  Coast  Guard  cut-
ters  hadn’t  been  de-towed  when  it  was  up  in  Alaska.  We  didn’t 
have  enough  towing  capacity  up  there  to  deal  with  the  sea  state 
at the time. 

The  other  alternative  as  proposed  by  the  National  Academy  of 
Sciences is to surplus the Navy’s T–ATF, the Powhatan class tugs, 
to  the  Coast  Guard  or  to  the  private  sector  to  have  really  robust 
salvage capacity around the country. 

Some  others,  the  State  of  Washington  obviously  has  taken  on 
this  burden  to  have  a  salvage  tug  in  Neah  Bay  or  a  rescue  tug  in 
Neah  Bay.  It  is  not  salvage  capable,  doesn’t  have  firefighting  or 
spill  response  capacity  on  it,  and  it’s  only  funded  for  three  more 
years.  This  is  an  opportunity,  I  think,  for  the  Federal  Government 
to match the state in this exercise. 

In particular, you’ve heard a lot about the efforts on the Olympic 
Coast,  but  the  fact  of  the  matter  remains  the  first  70  miles  of  the 
Strait  of  Juan  de  Fuca,  there  are  no  tanker  size  limits,  there  are 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

61 

no  speed  limits,  there  are  no  pilots,  there  are  no  tug  escorts,  and 
that’s a long distance to go before you get to Port Angeles. 

Similarly,  as  you  saw  with  the  ATBA,  all  the  ships  are  allowed 
to  cut  the  corner  of  the  sanctuary,  and  every  ship  entering  the 
Strait  of  Juan  de  Fuca  comes  within  two  miles  of  Duntze  Rock,  so 
even with the ATBA we still have a close approach to the Olympic 
Coast National Marine Sanctuary. 

Furthermore,  there  are  142  tugs  that  cross  through  there.  We’re 
not sure how many of them were laden with their tows. This is an 
easy  question.  We  know  from  the  nature  of  the  trade  the  south-
bound  traffic  is  loaded,  the  northbound  traffic  is  usually  empty 
coming back from San Francisco or the Columbia River. We should 
know by now whether or not those tugs and tows are laden or not. 
So  some  suggested  Federal  actions,  we  need,  now  that  we’ve 
tapped  the  Oil  Spill  Liability  Trust  Fund,  we  need  to  remove  the 
sunset  date.  There’s  no  reason  to  revisit  this  again  in  the  future, 
as  long  as  there  are  ships  sailing  on  the  sea  we’re  going  to  need 
that account. 

We  should  amend  OPA  creating  a  cargo  account,  because  as  we 
know,  tankers  are  not  the  only  ships  on  the  sea  that  spill  oil,  and 
there  should  be  an  account  to  draw  for  non-tank  vessels.  We  can 
amend OPA to make it easier for the Oil Spill Liability Trust Fund 
to  be  used  for  preventative  purchases.  Jolene  Unsoeld  was  able  to 
get  a  sum  of  money  drawn  from  the  Oil  Spill  Liability  Trust  Fund 
for  setting  up  a  marine  firefighting  association  in  the  Columbia 
River. It’s one of the few times I’ve ever heard it drawn from when 
it  was  not  during  a  spill  or  not  for  standard  administrative  pur-
poses of the Coast Guard, the EPA, or NOAA. 

Have  the  Coast  Guard  either  include  towing  capability  in  their 
new  deep  water  fleet  or  have  the  Navy  Powhatan  class  tugs 
brought to bear to help our Nation’s salvage posture. Conduct a re-
view of the tow boat lanes in the Strait of Juan de Fuca with tows 
passing through the area to be avoided. 

Captain  Boothe  made  mention  to  the  fact  that  we  have  two-way 
lanes.  The  fact  of  the  matter  is,  the  reason  why  we  have  tugs  and 
tows  cutting  through  the  Olympic  Coast  sanctuary  is  because  we 
allow  these  tugs  to  go  outbound  on  the  inbound  lanes.  Following 
along  the  shoreline  of  Clallam  County,  so  when  you  come  to  Cape 
Flattery and you’re going to California, the first thing you want to 
do  is  head  south.  So  instead  of  going  outbound  like  the  other  out-
bound  traffic  along  the  Canadian  coast  and  you’re  way  off  shore 
when  you’re  coming  down  the  coast,  these  guys  are  hugging  the 
corner and in fact going outbound in the inbound lane. It’s a prac-
tice that is traditional, but I don’t think it is sensible. 

A  couple  of  more  recommendations.  Provide  Congressional  over-
sight  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  Salvage  and  Firefighting  rule  assuring 
that  it’s  adequate  and  completed  this  year.  Have  the  National 
Academy  of  Sciences  evaluate  the  Coast  Guard’s  cost  benefit  anal-
ysis  methodology.  They  use  factors  like  the  cost  per  barrel  not 
spilled  for  prevention  studies  and  the  cost  per  barrel  recovered  for 
response  studies,  but  neither  of  these  analyses  look  at  the  cost  to 
the  marine  environment  or  the  economy  from  a  spill.  And  I  think 
this  frustrates  the  purposes  of  NEPA.  We’re  only  looking  at  the 
cost  of  the  industry,  not  the  benefits  to  the  environment.  So  it 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

62 

strikes  me  as  a  one-sided  equation  that  makes  it  hard  to  advance 
the score. 

I  mentioned  to  you  about  the  need  to  review  the  Strait  of  Juan 
de  Fuca,  first  70  miles,  there’s  a  gap  in  our  protection,  otherwise 
very  robust  network  that  I’m  very  proud  of.  We  have  a  long  tradi-
tion up in the State of Washington. 

And  then,  I  think,  finally,  there  was  mention  made  by  Mr. 
Wright  of  the  consolidation  of  the  maritime  response  community. 
Like  the  oil  and  shipping  industry  we  have  great  consolidation  oc-
curring. We know mergers often are for cost savings and it results 
in downsizing that occurs when you merge organizations. 

Right  now  MSRC  is  like  the  only  game  is  town  because  they 
bought  Clean  Sound,  and  the  National  Response  Corporation 
bought Foss Environmental, so we actually have two organizations, 
before  we  used  to  have  four  organizations  in  this  town.  In  the 
Dalco  Pass  spill,  MSRC  didn’t  respond  at  all,  but  we  had  to  go 
labor-ready, for a thousand gallon spill. We had to have labor-ready 
workers  on  the  beaches  for  a  simple  thousand  gallon  spill.  What’s 
going to happen when we have a really big spill? 

In  closing,  the  late  Senator  Magnuson  oversaw  the  great  transi-
tion  from  when  Washington  State  received  its  crude  oil  primarily 
from Canadian pipelines to U.S. tankers. This change in risk in our 
waters required proactive leadership and enabled us to maintain a 
relatively  good  oil  spill  record  to  this  date.  For  example,  Senator 
Magnuson  made  it  clear  that  he  wanted  to  limit  the  size  and 
amount  of  tankers  transiting  through  the  San  Juan  Islands  and 
passed several laws fulfilling his vision. 

The  one  constant  in  the  maritime  world  is  change,  and  we  need 
constant  vigilance  to  keep  up  with  these  changes.  We  appreciate 
Senator  Cantwell’s  proactive  efforts  and  look  forward  to  working 
with her office and this Committee on these matters in the future. 
Thank you for your time. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Felleman follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF FRED FELLEMAN, NORTHWEST DIRECTOR, 

OCEAN ADVOCATES 
Senator Cantwell and members of the Committee: 
Thank you for the opportunity to provide testimony to you this morning. My name 
is Fred Felleman. I am the Northwest Director of Ocean Advocates, a small national 
non-profit environmental organization specializing in maritime safety. My offices are 
based in Seattle and San Juan Island. I have a Masters of Science degree from the 
University  of  Washington’s  College  of  Ocean  and  Fishery  Sciences  and  have  been 
involved in the study and conservation of our resident killer whale population since 
1980. 

My  involvement  with  oil  spills  began  in  1988  when  I  moved  to  Washington  D.C. 
to help Congressman Lowry develop the legislation creating the Olympic Coast Na-
tional  Marine  Sanctuary.  Since  then  I  have  conducted  damage  assessment  on  the 
Exxon Valdez oil spill and have served on numerous state and Federal oil spill com-
mittees.  Ocean  Advocates  is  also  a  member  of  the  Shipping  Safety  Partnership 
(SSP), a coalition of Alaska Natives, commercial fishermen, recreation, science, and 
community  interests  formed  in  response  to  the  December  6,  2004  grounding  of  the 
Selendang  Ayu  in  the  Aleutian  Islands  to  advance  the  safety  of  cargo  shipping 
through the Great Circle route. 

There can be no question that a major oil spill would wreck havoc on the biologi-
cal,  economic  and  cultural  environments  that  are  so  closely  tied  to  Washington’s 
waters. This is especially true now. The marine environment is showing many signs 
of  stress,  from  elevated  sea  surface  temperatures  region-wide,  to  depleted  oxygen 
levels in Hood Canal, and a lack of upwelling on the outer coast, making the recov-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

63 

ery  of  our  remnant  populations  of  herring,  salmon,  and  killer  whales  all  the  more 
difficult.  A  major  oil  spill  would  end  up  being  the  straw  that  broke  the  ecosystem’s 
back, undermining many years and millions of dollars of investment in recovery ef-
forts. 

We are encouraged by Senator Cantwell’s leadership to help reduce the likelihood 
of  such  a  fate  in  the  tradition  of  the  late  Senator  Warren  Magnuson.  Not  only  are 
we pleased by the attention this field hearing brings to an issue that seems to only 
get addressed when there is oil in the water and dead birds on TV, but we are par-
ticularly  thankful  for  the  Senator’s  efforts  in  drafting  the  energy  bill.  Three  provi-
sions  in  particular  deserve  recognition.  First,  removing  the  provision  that  would 
have  opened  the  Arctic  National  Wildlife  Refuge  to  oil  exploration  recognizes  that 
we  will  not  be  able  to  drill  our  way  to  energy  independence.  Second,  the  inclusion 
of  $500  million  in  subsidies  to  encourage  the  development  of  biofuels  makes  a  sub-
stantial contribution to our regional energy needs, and will hopefully serve to reduce 
the  amount  of  tanker  traffic  calling  on  our  waters  in  the  future.  Finally,  the  intro-
duction  of  S.  1222,  the  Oil  Spill  Liability  Trust  Fund  Maintenance  Act,  reinstating 
the  5  cent/barrel  fee  and  raising  the  cap  to  $3  billion  is  an  essential  step  toward 
filling the gap in our Nation’s ability to respond to and prevent oil spills. 

Our  concern  about  oil  spills  is  not  theoretical.  According  to  the  Department  of 
Ecology  there  were  more  than  80  spills  exceeding  1,000  gallons  in  Washington 
waters between 1986 and 2004. Ocean going vessels are the Nation’s primary vehi-
cles  of  trade.  The  Strait  of  Juan  de  Fuca  is  the  busiest  commercial  waterway  in 
North  America  serving  both  Canada’s  and  the  U.S.’s  busiest  ports,  and  it  is  only 
getting busier as Pacific Rim Trade has eclipsed that with Europe. While the num-
ber  of  oil  spills  has  declined  since  the  passage  of  OPA  90  the  volume  of  oil  spilled 
varies  widely  each  year  depending  on  whether  one  large  ship  has  had  an  accident 
or not. Therefore, we cannot be lulled into complacency by these spurious statistics. 
Of particular concern are the 142 tugs with oil barges that passed through the Area 
To  Be  Avoided  within  Olympic  Coast  National  Marine  Sanctuary  in  2004.  While 
there  was  a  96.3  percent  overall  compliance  with  the  ATBA  in  2004,  it  only  takes 
one  laden  oil  barge  to  break  its  tow  as  recently  happened  off  the  Columbia  River 
to cause long-term damage. It is also important to note that even ships that comply 
with  the  ATBA  come  within  2  miles  of  shore  as  they  enter  the  Strait  of  Juan  de 
Fuca. It is also worth noting that laden oil barges are allowed to transit near shore 
of  the  inbound  shipping  lanes,  putting  the  shoreline  of  Clallam  County  at  unneces-
sary  risk  and  setting  the  tugs  up  to  cut  through  the  ATBA.  This  practice  needs  to 
be reevaluated. 

Our  ability  to  respond  to  even  relatively  small  spills  has  been  called  into  serious 
question  of  late.  The  responses  to  both  the  4,700  gallon  December  2003  Foss  spill 
at  Point  Wells  and  the  1,000  gallon  October  2004  Dalco  Pass  spill  were  lackluster 
at  best.  There  has  also  been  a  series  of  recent  transfer  spills  at  refineries  in  Fern-
dale  and  Tacoma  that  have  unnecessarily  spread  into  the  marine  environment  be-
cause  vessels  are  not  required  to  pre-boom  before  conducting  such  transfers.  It  is 
my understanding that the State of Washington has a task force studying this issue. 
The  State  Department  of  Ecology  just  released  a  report  documenting  that  there 
would  not  be  enough  response  equipment  in  the  San  Juan  Islands  to  respond  to  a 
420,000 gallon spill, despite the fact that some of the State’s largest caches of equip-
ment  are  stored  at  the  four  refineries  surrounding  the  islands.  This  bodes  poorly 
for our state-of-readiness in more remote locations such as the Olympic Coast where 
the  State’s  largest  spills  have  occurred  in  its  most  pristine  and  productive  environ-
ment.  In  a  Congressional  field  hearing  held  June  17,  1989,  then  Ecology  Director, 
Christine  Gregoire,  said  in  reference  to  the  231,000  gallon  1988  Nestucca  spill  that 
we  ‘‘stretched  our  resources  to  the  limits.’’  Unfortunately,  very  few  additional  re-
sources  have  been  brought  to  bear  on  the  problem  since  1988,  and  there  has  not 
been a drill in the Olympic Coast Sanctuary evaluating our response capacity in the 
10 years since its creation. 

Another  issue  affecting  our  ability  to  respond  to  oil  spills  has  been  the  unprece-
dented mergers that have been occurring in the oil and shipping companies, as well 
as  their  spill  response  contractors.  We  can  only  speculate  on  the  political  impact  of 
the  consolidation  of  the  world’s  largest  corporations,  but  the  downsizing  that  com-
monly  occurs  during  mergers  can  reduce  the  capacity  of  our  spill  response  contrac-
tors. This past year the National Response Corporation bought Foss Environmental 
and  MSRC  bought  Clean  Sound,  leaving  the  state  with  just  two  primary  spill  re-
sponse contractors. 

Rather than react to the growing threat of oil spills posed by increased vessel traf-
fic  through  our  waters  with  increases  in  the  levels  of  spill  response  capability,  the 
Coast Guard has been urging the liberalized use of dispersants and capping our cur-
rently  inadequate  spill  response  posture.  While  dispersants  have  been  shown  to  be 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

64 

effective  in  reducing  impacts  to  sea  birds  at  the  surface  in  warm  waters,  no  such 
demonstration  has  been  made  in  the  cold  waters  that  characterize  our  situation. 
Furthermore, sinking the oil allows it to be taken up into the food chain that makes 
near  shore  applications  problematic.  Rather  than  trading  off  one  spill  response  ca-
pacity  for  another,  the  Coast  Guard  should  be  calling  on  the  maritime  industry  to 
expand  their  ability  to  respond  to  spills.  This  should  include  additional  mechanical 
on-water  recovery,  dispersants  for  offshore  spills  when  the  sea  state  makes  skim-
ming impractical and dispersants more effective, and in situ burning which removes 
oil from the water at even higher rates than skimming. 

Of  particular  concern  is  the  Coast  Guard’s  assertion  of  Federal  preemption  in 
their  2003  Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking  on  Vessel  and  Facility  Response  Plans 
for  Oil  Removal  Equipment  Requirements  and  Alternative  Technology  Revisions. 
Unlike  the  case  involving  prevention  efforts,  the  state’s  response  authority  is  not 
subject to Federal preemption, and the Coast Guard should not be trying to suggest 
otherwise. 

One promising technology for both preventing and responding to an oil spill is sal-
vage. Salvage includes a wide range of capabilities from rescue towing, firefighting, 
and patching to dewatering a sinking ship. Furthermore, salvage tugs can assist in 
oil  spill  response  efforts  and  lifesaving  exercises.  Unfortunately,  despite  Congress 
calling  for  a  salvage  and  firefighting  rule  in  OPA  90,  the  Coast  Guard  has  yet  to 
complete such a measure. The Coast Guard’s added responsibilities for homeland se-
curity  should  not  be  used  as  a  reason  for  this  delay,  but  rather  as  an  additional 
reason for completion given the potential for acts of environmental terrorism or the 
need to respond to a cruise ships or ferry in distress. 

We  only  have  to  look  at  the  impact  and  expense  of  not  having  adequate  salvage 
capacity  to  see  how  cost-effective  it  is.  In  1999,  when  the  New  Carrissa  broke  in 
half off the Oregon coast because there was not adequate tug support available, the 
resultant  oil  spill  impacted  a  threatened  population  of  plovers,  cost  over  $100  mil-
lion (including fines) and ended with the wreck left on the beach. Similarly the 2004 
grounding  of  the  Selendang  Ayu  in  the  Aluetian  Islands  has  already  cost  $100  mil-
lion,  and  cost  is  expected  to  triple  while  thousands  of  sea  birds  and  marine  mam-
mals have been killed and subsistence lifestyles impacted. 

The  need  to  enhance  our  Nation’s  salvage  capacity  has  been  acknowledged  for 
many  years,  but  has  taken  on  particular  urgency  since  September  11.  In  1994,  the 
Marine  Board’s  Committee  on  Marine  Salvage  Issues  of  the  National  Research 
Council  wrote,  ‘‘Congress  should  update  the  national  salvage  policy  to  ensure  that 
an  adequate  level  of  salvage  capacity  is  present  in  U.S.  waters.  The  policy  should 
clearly delineate the following goals: to protect national security, to minimize or pre-
vent environmental impacts due to pollution from marine casualties, to protect pub-
lic safety, and to ensure minimal disruption to the U.S. economy resulting from ma-
rine casualties in the Nation’s port and waterways (p. 4).’’ 

While the 1989 Exxon Valdez disaster will be forever remembered by the general 
public  for  11  million  gallons  of  oil  spilled,  among  salvors  it  will  be  remembered  for 
the vast majority of oil that was safely transferred to another ship. In contrast, the 
relatively  small,  New  Carissa,  that  grounded  off  the  Oregon  Coast  in  1999  is  the 
poster  child  for  what  happens  when  adequate  salvage  capacity  is  not  readily  avail-
able. 

The  Federal  On  Scene  Coordinator  (FOSC)  in  the  New  Carissa,  Captain  Mike 

Hall, summed up the problem when he stated: 

[W]e  are  essentially  an  island  nation  with  over  47,000  miles  of  shoreline;  ap-
proximately  85  percent  of  all  Americans  live  within  100  miles  of  these  shore-
lines; and 90 percent of all international commerce enters the United States by 
vessel. One can see from these facts that our Nation’s ports and waterways are 
the  backbone  of  the  U.S.  intermodal  transportation  system.  This  system  must 
include a national salvage plan. We need a salvage plan more capable than that 
demonstrated  during  the  initial  stages  of  the  New  Carissa  casualty.  It  was  my 
belief  on  4  February  1999,  and  it  remains  my  belief  today,  that  adequate  and 
timely  salvage  capability  would  have  significantly  mitigated  this  crisis  on  the 
coast. There are currently only two salvage vessels on the Pacific Coast capable 
of refloating a large grounded ship, and neither was readily available to respond 
in this case. 

In  January  2002,  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard  and  Navy  hosted  the  National  Maritime 
Salvage Conference in Seattle. The Admiralty Counsel to the U.S. Navy Supervisor 
of  Salvage  and  Diving,  Richard  Buckingham  presented  a  paper  entitled,  ‘‘Toward  a 
National Salvage Policy.’’ The abstract to his paper states: 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

65 

The  problem  of  inadequate  domestic  marine  salvage  capacity  is  well  docu-
mented  and  recognized  by  both  the  government  and  commercial  sectors;  fur-
thermore,  the  situation  is  not  getting  any  better.  Because  of  the  Nation’s  over-
riding  interest  in  the  protecting  the  environment/economy/marine  transpor-
tation  system  (MTS),  as  well  as  meeting  homeland  security  needs,  we  need  a 
cohesive Federal national salvage policy. The first step, however, will be identi-
fying  a  Federal  agency  to  take  the  lead  in  forging  such  a  policy.  Should  it  be 
the  Coast  Guard,  the  Navy,  or  perhaps  some  other  agency?  Who  appears  best 
suited  for  the  role?  Once  the  appropriate  agency  assumes  (or  is  tasked  with) 
this  leadership  responsibility,  what  are  some  of  the  likely  issues  to  be  initially 
confronted?  Also,  this  pressing  need  for  a  national  salvage  policy  should  really 
be a high profile issue on the agenda of the newly created U.S. Commission on 
Ocean  Policy,  as  well  as  a  specific  focus  of  the  Department  of  Transportation’s 
MTS policy and SEA–21 maritime infrastructure funding initiatives. 

The Marine Board of the National Academy of Sciences wrote to the Ocean Com-

mission in June 2002 on the issue of national salvage capacity. They wrote: 

Within  the  maritime  community,  as  well  as  government  agencies,  it  is  recog-
nized  that  the  Nation’s  domestic  salvage  capacity  is  inadequate  to  meet  basic 
and  emergency  needs.  This  inadequacy  jeopardizes  environmental,  transpor-
tation, and homeland security objectives. There is a need for a cohesive, Federal 
national salvage policy and a designated lead government agency to implement 
that policy. 

While  the  Coast  Guard  and  Navy  try  to  resolve  this  longstanding  problem,  the 
Makah Tribe have sought to have the U.S. Navy provide one of their uniquely quali-
fied T–ATF tugs for dedicated rescue tug service in and around Neah Bay. The Na-
tional  Research  Council  found  in  their  1994  report  on  salvage  that  surplus  assets, 
particularly the T–ATF class of ships, if operated by the private sector and strategi-
cally  deployed,  could  go  a  long  way  to  restoring  the  traditional  salvage  capacity  of 
the  United  States,  particularly  in  rescue  towing.  The  operation  of  these  vessels  by 
the  private  sector  would  require  substantial  subsidy,  as  it  has  been  demonstrated 
in the United States and elsewhere that salvage revenues cannot cover the costs of 
operating  and  maintaining  the  vessels  and  their  crews.  The  excess  costs  could  be 
covered,  as  they  were  in  the  past,  through  the  Salvage  Facilities  Act,  and  the  plan 
could  be  implemented  through  the  arrangements  in  place  for  Navy  contracting  for 
commercial  salvage  services.’’  (pp.  55–56).  The  Coast  Guard’s  Deepwater  Program 
as  well  as  the  environment  could  be  benefited  by  such  Naval  assets.  Alternatively, 
the  Coast  Guard  should  consider  including  towing  capability  in  the  construction  of 
their deepwater fleet. 

The  State  of  Washington  has  public  funding  for  just  three  more  seasons  of  the 
Neah Bay rescue tug. This tug, while having provided a significant amount of addi-
tional  protection  to  the  Olympic  Coast  and  entrance  to  the  Strait  over  the  past  6 
seasons,  is  still  only  seasonal,  and  is  not  equipped  for  salvage,  firefighting,  or  spill 
response. 

Suggested Federal Actions: 

1.  Reinstate  the  OSLTF  and  raise  the  cap  to  $3  billion  and  remove  any  sunset 
clause,  for  the  account  will  be  needed  as  long  as  there  are  ships  sailing  on  the 
sea. 
2.  Create  a  Cargo  account  within  the  OSLTF  that  would  be  drawn  from  when 
non-tank vessels are the cause of the oil spill. 
3. Amend OPA 90 making it easier for the OSLTF to be drawn from for prevent-
ative measures, not just spill response. Such funds could be used to help station 
salvage  tugs  in  high-risk,  remote  places  such  as  Unimak  Pass  and  Neah  Bay. 
Other  potential  uses  of  the  Fund  could  be  for  improved  vessel  tracking  tech-
nology  or  additional  aids  to  navigation.  Tribal  governments  should  be  able  to 
draw from the Fund as the EPA and Coast Guard do. 
4.  Have  the  Coast  Guard  either  include  towing  capability  in  their  new  deep-
water fleet or get the Navy to provide their T–ATF Powhatan class tugs to the 
Coast Guard to improve our Nation’s salvage posture and their deepwater capa-
bility. 
5.  Conduct  review  of  towboat  lanes  in  Strait  of  Juan  de  Fuca  and  142incidents 
of tugs with tows passing through the ATBA in 2004. 
6.  Provide  Congressional  oversight  on  the  status  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  Salvage 
and Firefighting rule assuring that it is adequate and completed this year. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

66 

7. Have the NAS conduct an evaluation of the Coast Guard’s Coast benefit anal-
ysis  methodology.  They  use  factors  such  as  cost  per  barrel  not  spilled  for  pre-
vention  studies  and  cost  per  barrel  recovered  for  response  studies,  but  neither 
of  these  analyses  includes  the  cost  to  the  marine  environment  and  economy 
when  a  spill  does  occur.  These  selective  studies  appear  to  frustrate  the  goals 
of NEPA. 
8.  Conduct  a  no-notice,  equipment  deployment  drill  in  the  Olympic  Coast  Na-
tional Marine Sanctuary to evaluate our level of readiness off the coast. 
9.  Provide  federal  funds  for  year  round  Neah  Bay  Rescue  tug  for  first  70  miles 
of  Juan  de  Fuca  Strait  lack  tanker  size  limits,  speed  limits,  and  tug  escorts 
while being exposed to increasingly high volumes of traffic from Canada and the 
US. 
10.  Review  impact  of  consolidation  of  oil  spill  response  organizations  on  readi-
ness. 
11. Amend OPA 90 increasing liability caps on tankers and freighters. 

In  closing,  the  late  Senator  Magnuson  oversaw  the  great  transition  from  when 
Washington  State  received  its  crude  oil  primarily  from  Canadian  pipelines  to  U.S. 
tankers.  This  change  in  risk  to  our  waters  required  proactive  leadership  that  en-
abled us to maintain a relatively good oil spill record to this date. For example, Sen-
ator Magnuson made it clear that he wanted to limit the size and amount of tankers 
transiting  through  the  San  Juan  Islands  and  passed  several  laws  fulfilling  his  vi-
sion. The one constant in the maritime world is change, and we need constant vigi-
lance to keep up with these changes. We appreciate Senator Cantwell’s proactive ef-
forts and look forward to working with her office and this Committee on these mat-
ters in the future. 

Thank you for the opportunity to present these issues before you, and I would be 

happy to answer any questions. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Felleman,  for  your  testi-
mony, and to all the panelists, thank you for being here this morn-
ing  and  giving  us  input  for  the  record.  As  I  said  with  the  other 
panel,  any  questions  or  comments  or  additional  things  that  come 
up  as  part  of  your  testimony,  you  have  2  weeks  to  submit  to  the 
record. 

Captain  Boothe,  I  know  you  might  be  leaving.  I  hate  to  put  you 
on the spot, but I was wondering if you could come up for a couple 
of  questions—you  can  sit  right  there  next  to  Mr.  Sones.  If  you  can 
manage. Thank you. 

Captain BOOTHE. We’ll see. I don’t think this is on. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  Is  there  a  button  there?  Maybe  you  have  to 

move to a different spot. 

Captain BOOTHE. Looks like it’s on now. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  OK.  In  Mr.  Sones’  testimony  he  was  talking 
about  this  issue  of  chemical  dispersants  versus  equipment.  Could 
you comment on that, and where you think we are and do we have 
the  right  equipment,  or  are  we  using  these  dispersants  in  ways 
that  we  shouldn’t  be?  Are  we  measuring  their  environmental  im-
pact? 

Captain  BOOTHE.  Senator,  I  think  from  a  response  perspective, 
and  I’ve  been  in  the  business  for  quite  a  while,  certainly  not  as  a 
responder  like  Mr.  Wright  and  his  organization,  but  I  think  as  a 
Coast Guard marine safety professional, I never want to be in a po-
sition  where  I  don’t  have  all  the  tools  in  my  tool  bag.  And  right 
now dispersants have been in debate between the science and biolo-
gists for a long, long time. I think from a Coast Guard perspective 
we  believe  dispersants  are  a  necessary  part  of  the  inventory  of  re-
sponse capability. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

67 

For  high-energy  environments,  dispersants  can  be  effective  in 
protecting  sensitive  ecosystems,  wetlands,  etc.,  off  the  coast.  And 
we know that we have very limited mechanical recovery capability. 
I  think  some,  I  don’t  know  what  the  exact  figures  are,  but  some-
where  between  10  and  20  percent  of  oil  spilled  on  the  water  is 
going  to  be  able  to  be  recovered  by  mechanical  means.  So  to  the 
degree  that  dispersants  might  keep  that  oil  from  getting  on  the 
beach  and  from  affecting  the  sensitive  ecosystem  on  that  side  of 
things, it might be better. 

It’s  always  a  trade-off.  You’re  going  to  either  potentially  affect 
waterfowl  and  marine  mammals,  or  you’re  going  to  affect  the  fish 
and crabs, or et cetera, that might live on the bottom. 

Senator CANTWELL. So you’re in the process, right, in continuing 
on  this  rule  that’s  required  by  OPA  to  determine  what  vessel 
equipment requirements would be? 

Captain BOOTHE. Right. 
Senator CANTWELL. And, Mr. Sones, you have some concerns that 

they’re over-focusing on dispersants; is that the case? 

Mr. SONES. No, I think our position has been that, you know, we 
want  all  the  tools  in  the  toolbox,  and  because  of  the  conditions  of 
the Pacific Ocean, there are a lot of variables that we deal with out 
there.  Sometimes  mechanical  equipment  will  work  very  efficiently 
if  the  weather  conditions  allow.  So  where  our  concern  has  been  is 
using certain tools in lieu of other tools. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  What  would  you  like  to  see  in  the  Coast 

Guard’s rule? 

Mr.  SONES.  I  think  we  would  like  to  see  all  of  those  resources 
being able to be utilized depending on the conditions and the effec-
tiveness  of  those  particular  tools.  There  are  still  questions  I  guess 
that we don’t have enough information about, is, what does happen 
to the oil, how does it affect the other resources when a dispersant 
is  used,  it’s  breaking  down  the  oil  and  just  moving  it  to  the  ocean 
floor rather than on the surface. So we’re interested in seeing more 
research  and  really  what  the  effects  of  using  dispersants,  and  how 
the long-term impacts of that tool might affect our resources on the 
ocean. 

And  we  may  find  that  just  simply  letting  it  come  ashore  might 
have less impacts. We don’t know. So we want to look at all of the 
opportunities,  tools  available  to  us,  but  not  use  one  over  another 
I guess would be our biggest concern. 

Captain BOOTHE. Senator, might I offer one other point? Related 
to  the  rulemaking  that’s  underway,  the  adjusted  caps  for,  or  the 
issue  of  adjusting  mechanical  recovery  and  removal  caps  will  not 
be impacted by the decision to require plan holders to actually have 
a response plan that includes a dispersing capability. They are not 
trading off. Usually we’re—— 

Senator  CANTWELL.  I  think  it’s  more  that  Mr.  Sones  is  worried 

that you’re going to lessen the requirement on equipment. 

Captain  BOOTHE.  No,  the  point  I’m  trying  to  make,  Senator,  is 
that  it  will  not.  We  do  not  allow  a  substitution  or  credit  for 
dispersants  for  mechanical  recovery  equipment  because  they  actu-
ally operate at opposite ends. If the conditions are ripe for mechan-
ical  recovery,  dispersants  won’t  work.  And  where  dispersants  are 
intended  to  be  used,  mechanical  recovery  typically  will  not  work. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

68 

Senator CANTWELL. When are we expected to have the final rule? 
Captain  BOOTHE.  That  particular  rulemaking  I  believe  has  now 
been placed back on the fast track and hopefully will be completed 
by the winter of 2006, Senator. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Thank  you.  And  to  Mr.  Felleman’s  point 
about  cranes  and  ability  to  remove  ships  and  the  Coast  Guard  is 
the  Deepwater  Program,  since  we’re  reviewing  the  Deepwater  Pro-
gram  right  now  since  the  Committee  just  passed  out  authorizing 
language,  and  since  the  Deepwater  Program  is  going  to  be  a  huge 
investment  by  taxpayers  in  the  Coast  Guard  capability,  is  there  a 
point here about the ability to remove vessels? 

Captain  BOOTHE.  Well,  all  of  our  assets,  Senator,  are  multi-mis-
sion  assets,  whether  or  not  we  have  the  same  capability  as  a  sal-
vage  tug  is  clearly  no  question.  We  do  not.  We  don’t,  our  cutters 
aren’t designed for that purpose. Typically if we’re going to impose 
a  requirement  for  marine  salvage  and  firefighting,  we  would  look 
for  that  to  be  established  through  regulation  and  impose  upon  the 
industry  to  provide  a  separate  mechanism  other  than  the  Coast 
Guard cutter fleet to do that. 

However, the Coast Guard is Semper Paratus, we’re going to re-
spond  to  all  search  and  rescue  cases,  and  we  will  tow  where  we 
have that capability. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Mr.  Felleman,  it  sounds  like  the  Coast 
Guard  is  saying  they  want  to  have  a  good  public/private  sector 
partnership on salvage. 

Mr.  FELLEMAN.  And  if  they  implemented  the  salvage  and  fire-
fighting  rule,  that’s  possible,  but  this  has  been  in  development 
since OPA 90, so the question is, what’s the status of that rule and 
will  it  be  robust  enough  to  really  require  the  industry  to  invest  in 
the salvage capability necessary to protect this Nation’s burgeoning 
shorelines. You know, Pacific Rim trade has eclipsed that with the 
East  Coast,  so  we  are  on  the  forefront  of,  you  know,  a  growth  of 
doubling and tripling of trade volume, and the question is whether 
we’re going to have salvage capability to match that. 

Captain BOOTHE. Well, I hope we do, Senator. Obviously the rule 
is  still  in  progress  and  I  think  part  of  the  problem  or  part  of  the 
suspension  associated  with  that  was  an  impact  registered  that  it 
might  have  on  the  small  business  side  of  the  house.  We  pulled  it 
back  for  reconsideration,  making  sure  we  had  all  of  those  things 
addressed in the environmental and economic assessment, and un-
fortunately the Maritime Transportation Security Act requirements 
kind  of  overwhelmed  the  Coast  Guard’s  regulatory  processes,  and 
everything  was  kind  of  shelved  to  enable  us  to  address  those 
rulemakings. 

Now  we’re  back  on  focus,  hopefully  we  can  address  this  within 

the next year, Senator. 

Senator CANTWELL. What do you mean the impact on small busi-

ness, in terms of the Coast Guard being a competitor? 

Captain BOOTHE. In terms of, yes, ma’am, in terms of being able 

to provide some of those services as well. 

Senator CANTWELL. Well—— 
Captain BOOTHE. Salvage businesses. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  No,  I  understand,  but  I  mean  our  efforts  in 

Iraq have not stopped us from using contractors; right? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

69 

Captain BOOTHE. No, ma’am. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  So  why  not  do  the  same?  I  mean  why  not 
have  everything,  why  not  have  a  salvage  rule  that  basically  gives 
the  ability  to  do  salvage  whether  you  use  a  ship  in  the  Deepwater 
Program or a contract? Is that not possible? 
Captain BOOTHE. Yes, ma’am, I believe so. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  OK.  So  how  would  it  have  an  impact  on 
small  business?  If,  yes,  we’ve  built  10  ships  from  the  Deepwater 
fleet  to  do  salvage  only,  yes,  I  get  that  point.  I  just  want  to  make 
sure that the Coast Guard, in its oversight for salvage, has the au-
thority now to use your existing vessels or contract with the private 
sector? 

Captain BOOTHE. Yes, ma’am, we do. 
Senator CANTWELL. OK. 
Captain  BOOTHE.  And  we  do  contract  with  salvors  using  the  Oil 
Spill Liability Trust Fund in many cases. And if I might have a lit-
tle bit of license here, Senator Cantwell, the Coast Guard response 
to  the  Dalco  Passage  spill  in  no  way  was  delayed  because  of  con-
cern  of  funding.  We  spent  over  $2  million  cleaning  up  the  oil  from 
the  Dalco  Passage  spill  and  we  used  the  Oil  Spill  Liability  Trust 
Fund  to  do  that.  It  had  nothing  to  do  with  our  hesitancy  to  access 
the fund to be able to respond. 

As  I  mentioned,  we  respond  to  mystery  spills  hundreds  of  times 
a year and we access the fund more in Puget Sound probably than 
any other ports in the nation. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  I  don’t  want  to  speak  for  Mr.  Felleman,  but 
I  think  his,  the  point,  is  that  a  healthy  fund  makes  everybody  be 
aggressive. 

Captain BOOTHE. Yes. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  And  so,  and  we  certainly  have  taken  part  of 
that  step  last  Friday,  and  hopefully  the  President  will  sign  that 
legislation. 

But  let  me  turn  to  Mr.  Holmes.  As  you  know,  with  the  passage 
of  this  legislation  we’re  back  on  track,  so  to  speak.  Do  you  worry 
about  the  liability  caps?  Do  you  think  that  we  should  look  at  that 
issue? 

Mr.  HOLMES.  Well,  again,  Western  States  Petroleum  Association 
really focuses on the local and State issues, and that would be han-
dled  through  our  sister  organization  API,  American  Petroleum  In-
stitute.  But  I  know  that  they  supported  the  continuation  of  the 
trust  fund.  I  think  there  were  concerns  about  raising  the  cap  and 
felt that the $1 billion would be an adequate amount. And also, we 
would have liked to have seen some auditing provisions added into 
the provisions which were not. But—— 

Senator  CANTWELL.  So  you  don’t  support  or  oppose  changes  to 

the liability caps? 

Mr. HOLMES. No, I’m not ready to comment on that. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  OK.  And  what  about  this  issue  off  the  coast 
in  the  marine  sanctuary  area  where  there  were  142  tugs  with  oil 
barges  that,  as  Mr.  Felleman  stated—I  liked  his  way  of  describing 
that, ships are going outbound in the inbound lanes. 

So  in  the  area  to  be  avoided,  it  seems  like  there  are  a  certain 
number  of  vessels  there  that  we  don’t  have  very  good  compliance 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

70 

rates  for.  What  do  you  think  is  occurring  there,  and  what  should 
we do about that? 

Mr. HOLMES. Well, I’m a member of the Advisory Council for the 
Olympic Coast National Marine Sanctuary as an alternate, and the 
sanctuary  staff  presented  a  presentation  I  believe  three  meetings 
ago  regarding  that  topic.  And  my  recollection  of  the  presentation 
that the sanctuary staff made was that there was very good compli-
ance, similar to the numbers that the past panel quoted which was 
98 percent or something like that overall. 

So  from,  my  understanding  from  the  overall  program,  it’s  very 
successful,  and  the  staff  was  very  careful  to  say  that  they  didn’t 
really have all the answers where there were tracks going through 
the system, and the staff was very careful not to make any conclu-
sions  on  that  and  required  further  research  to  get  the  proper  an-
swers.  But  I  know  from  our  members’  perspective,  they’re  making 
every effort to comply. 

Senator CANTWELL. If you’ll look at the sheet and document that 
I was given, it looks like the overall numbers for vessels are pretty 
good. 

You  know,  oil  tankers  have  a  99.8  percent  compliance  rate,  but 
then you look at some of the other categories—tank barges with oil, 
75  percent  compliance;  chemical  barges,  43  percent.  So  I  don’t 
know if it’s a communication issue or whether we have people tak-
ing a different path or there’s a different economic issue there. 

Mr.  HOLMES.  Right,  and  again  I  don’t  want  to  speak  for  the 
Olympic  Coast  National  Marine  Sanctuary  staff,  but  my  under-
standing  is  that  there  were  some  questions  that  needed  to  be  re-
searched  on  that  line  item,  tug  and  barges,  to  see  whether  they 
were loaded or not. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Well,  whether  they  were  loaded  or  not 
wouldn’t really matter, though; right? You’d want them to stay out 
of that area? 

Mr.  HOLMES.  If  they’re  empty  they  can  pass  through  there  with 
no problem. This is to protect the sensitive areas within the Olym-
pic  Coast  National  Marine  Sanctuary  from  the  threat  to  sensitive 
areas  for  spill.  And  if  there’s  an  empty  tank  going  through  there 
that’s not a threat and I believe that’s allowed. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  So  you  think  that  43  percent  isn’t  an  accu-

rate statistic because—— 

Mr. HOLMES. I don’t know, I just know that I saw a presentation 
by  the  sanctuary  staff  saying  that  there’s  more  research  needed  to 
answer that question. 

Senator CANTWELL. OK. 
Captain BOOTHE. Senator, I think Mr. Felleman’s comment in his 
statement  was  accurate.  We  ought  to  be  able  to  at  some  point  be 
able to ascertain which direction they were going and whether they 
were  laden  or  not,  and  then  address  that  with  the  particular  com-
panies  involved  if  indeed  we  find  that  they  were  laden  because,  I 
think,  as  Mr.  Holmes  has  pointed  out,  the  Western  States  Petro-
leum Association has agreed with the ATBA in concept and in prac-
tice, and they endorse it completely and expect their member com-
panies  to  comply.  And  so  I  know  when  I  was  Captain  of  the  Port 
here  I  would  co-sign  letters  with  the  sanctuary  manager  to  all 
those  companies,  saying,  ‘‘Hey,  we  can’t  really  tell  from  the  data 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

71 

that we have because we don’t have, VTS does not have radar cov-
erage off the coast there typically, so we can’t really tell which way 
you were going and whether you were laden or unladen, but if you 
were  laden,  here  are  what  the  ATBA  rules  are  all  about  and  we 
would expect and ask for your voluntary compliance. 

Mr.  FELLEMAN.  Senator  Cantwell,  I  just  ask  that  you  keep  in 
mind  that  because  we  have  10,000  transits  going  on  our  waters, 
when people present to you statistics in percents that you recognize 
that even a small percent is a lot of transits, and it only takes one 
laden barge to really wreck your decade. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you. I think we will work with the or-
ganization  to  try  to  further  shed  light  on  these  statistics,  and  it 
may be that as we attack the problem, as Doctor Leschine was say-
ing,  going  from  the  highest  incidence  before  to  now  developing  a 
system, that it continues to need development. 

One  of  those  issues,  Mr.  Wright,  is  the  commissioning  of  fishing 
vessels  to  assist  in  response.  I  know  that  the  Department  of  Ecol-
ogy  found  that  maybe  there  may  be  insufficient  vessel  capacity  to 
respond to spills. So do you agree with that? 

Mr.  WRIGHT.  Well,  the  study  was  commissioned  by  the  Depart-
ment  of  Ecology,  Senator,  just  came  out  mid  last  week.  I  actually 
have  it  in  front  of  me  because  I’ve  been  studying  it  since  it  came 
out,  and  of  course  it’s  a  very  direct  effect  on  us.  MSRC  has  a  fish-
ing  vessel  program  which  is  not  as  robust  as  it  once  was,  and  we 
were  in  the  process  long  before  this  study  was  even  commissioned 
of breathing life back into that program. 

And additionally, we don’t want to limit ourselves to fishing ves-
sels  because  there  are  other  vessels  of  opportunity  in  our  water-
ways that could be very helpful and we are looking at them as well, 
such  as  tugboats,  or  work  boats,  or  small  dredges,  those  kinds  of 
things that folks are more, more likely to be around than the fish-
ing vessels which are quite nomadic in their, by their very nature, 
and  their  crews  being  even  more  nomadic  than  the  vessels  them-
selves. 

Additionally,  one  thing  that  was  overlooked  in  that  study  was 
that  we  have  a  Memorandum  of  Understanding  that  I  mentioned 
in my testimony, with Burrard Clean Operations which brings sig-
nificant  resources  to  bear  if  we  have  a  major  spill,  especially  the 
one that was envisioned in the study which is a 10,000 barrel spill 
in  Rosario  Strait.  So  those  things  put  together  really,  I  think  we 
could  benefit  from  it.  There  are  a  lot  of  good  points  made  in  the 
study,  the  study  was  very  well  done,  and  we  are  taking  it  right  to 
heart. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  So  you  would  say  then,  in  general,  let’s  look 

at a program for getting assistance from other vessels? 

Mr. WRIGHT. Yes, ma’am. In any kind of a large response there’s 
always  going  to  be  a  ‘‘more  is  better’’  look  at  things.  Can  we  get 
geographic response plans in place quicker? Can we tend those that 
are  in  place  better?  And  this  is  all  the  kinds  of  things  that  we’re 
looking at right now. 

When  you  get  into  actual  contact  with  the  oil,  the  cost  of  doing 
business  rises  dramatically  because  of  the  training  requirements 
that  are  in  place  through  the,  through  OSHA  and  through  the 
Washington  equivalent.  So  keeping  people  trained  to  be  in  the  oil 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

72 

is  a  really  difficult  process,  and  it’s  something  that  we’ve  done  in 
the past and are looking into doing again. 

However,  to  train  people  to  be  at  the  fringes  when  they’re  not 

likely to be in the oil is a lot easier. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Do  we  need  additional  research  on  cleanup 

technology? 

Mr. WRIGHT. The cleanup technology itself really hasn’t changed 
dramatically over the years. I think earlier on we heard testimony 
that  remote  sensing  is  something  that  might  be  advantageous  to 
look  at  considerably  more  closely.  It’s  very  difficult  to  find  oil  on 
the  water.  The  vision  of  putting  a  whole  drum  of  oil  in  a  bathtub 
is  not  what  it  looks  like  when  you’re  out  there  on  the  water.  It 
spreads out very quickly, it gets into stringers, it becomes very dif-
ficult  to  see  from  the  water.  So  normally  we  spot  it  from  the  air 
as best we can. Of course at night that becomes problematic. 

So,  we  heard  Captain  Boothe  talk  about  the  infrared  technology 
capabilities  of  the  Coast  Guard  and  of  the  King  County  Sheriff’s 
Office. Also, there has been some considerable research done by the 
Canadians  by  Transport  Canada  and  the  Canadian  Coast  Guard 
into  the  use  of  lasers  as  detection  devices.  So  these  are  the  kinds 
of research things that could bear very big benefits. 

Finding  the  oil,  especially  at  night,  is  the  key.  If  you’re  going  to 

pick it up, very obviously you have to find it first. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  And  so  you  would  say  if  there  are  improve-
ments  such  as  lasers  and  other  solutions,  we  should  look  at  these, 
but otherwise you think no more research is needed? 

Mr.  WRIGHT.  Well,  I  would  never,  I  would  never  say  that  there 
shouldn’t be more research in all the areas. There may be a break-
through  out  there  that’s  possible  in  mechanical  pickup,  but  as  I 
say,  folks  have  been  looking  at  this  for  quite  some  time  and  there 
just,  there  haven’t  been  many  breakthroughs.  Certainly  there 
should  be  a  segment  of  the  research  community  looking  at  these 
kinds of things. And we will work with them as we do with every-
one  else  in  partnership,  and  of  course  in  the  State  of  Washington 
partnerships are the name of the game with the response industry, 
with the oil industry, and with the State and Federal Government. 
Senator CANTWELL. Doctor Leschine, you talked a lot about part-
nerships. Do you think that this new Citizen’s Advisory Committee 
will solve some of the issues you raised? 

Dr.  LESCHINE.  It’s  hard  to  read  legislation  and  know  exactly 
what it will mean in practice, but it, I did read the legislation and 
it  seems  like  the  ingredients  are  there.  A  couple  of  things  that  I 
see  that  are  there  very  positive  are,  first  of  all,  very  broad  partici-
pation by a large group of people, both from the industry technical 
side and the environmental community. 

I  also  see  something  in  the  way  of  marching  orders,  in  other 
words,  we’re  not  just  meeting  to  have  an  open,  free-form  ongoing 
dialogue,  but  we  really  have  a  serious  charge  I  believe  every  two 
or  3  years  to  kind  of  revisit  the  oil  spill  safety  question.  I  think 
when  I  was  a  Pilotage  Commissioner  one  of  the  things  I  learned 
is  the  situation  changes  more  rapidly  than  you  might  think.  You 
know, you get a different kind of vessel showing up all of a sudden 
because  there’s  a  new  kind  of  trade  or  you  have  a  different  kind 
of,  you  know,  jet  skis,  a  whole  new  idea,  a  group  of  people  with  a 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

73 

whole  new  sense  of  themselves  and  what  they’re  doing  out  on  the 
water. And things like that can happen overnight. 

So  I  see  the  ingredients  in  place  to  all  that.  I  guess  where  I 
might  ask  a  question—which  is  not  the  same  as  criticism—is 
whether  the  resource  provision  through  time  will  be  adequate.  I 
think  the  state  has  tended  to  fund  things  initially  and  then  the 
gases  kind  of  run  out  of  the  balloon.  This  has  certainly  happened 
to  the  Office  of  Marine  Safety.  We’ve  tried  to  use  barrel  taxes  and 
things like that, and the legislature seems to sort of lose its incen-
tive to keep those kinds of funds going. 

So, you know, I suppose, I’ve heard around the fringes of the dis-
cussion  over  this  Oil  Spill  Advisory  Committee  whether  some  kind 
of  Federal  funding,  or  more  guaranteed  funding,  and  the  state 
might be willing to provide would in fact be necessary to make this 
a  full  equivalent  to  the,  to  Prince  William  Sound’s  model.  Which  I 
believe  is  funded  directly  by  the  Congress,  because  at  least  it  got 
an initial appropriation through OPA 90, and I think they’re being, 
continuing  appropriations  since  then.  So  if  you  don’t  have  the  re-
sources, then you don’t have—— 

Senator CANTWELL. Yes, I think the Prince William Sound Advi-

sory Group gets money from the Trust Fund. 

Mr.  HOLMES.  May  I  correct  you?  The  Prince  William  Sound 

RCAC is funded through Alyeska. 

Mr.  FELLEMAN.  It  was  actually  set  up  before  OPA  passed.  It’s  a 
model  that  was,  that  happened  before.  Any  future  RCAC’s  are  to 
be funded through the trust fund. This one was set up beforehand. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  Committee  staff  is  telling  me  that  it’s  taken 
out  of  the  Fund—is  authorized  by  OPA,  and  the  last  time  Com-
mittee  staff  told  me  something  about  this  in  the  Committee,  they 
proved to be right and that’s how we got to reauthorizing the Trust 
Fund.  But  we’ll  get  to  the  bottom  of  how  the  money  flows  because 
it is important and we certainly want the resources to be there and 
we  should  look  at  this  question,  how  the  advisory  committees  are 
set up, what resources they have, and what role they play. 

The  state  issue,  Mr.  Felleman,  did  you  want  to  add  any  com-
ments? You mentioned something about the first 70 miles and—— 
Mr.  FELLEMAN.  Right.  The  gaps  that  I’ve  identified  after  looking 
at  this  issue  for  many  years  has  been  in  our  inability  to  provide 
the  adequate  protection  for  the  Olympic  coast  in  particular,  open 
ocean skimming is a challenge, and I would suggest if there’s R&D 
money to be spent, my colleagues in Alaska have a design that they 
would  like  to  see  be  put  to  a  tank  test  that’s  basically  using  a 
trimaran  type  vessel.  Instead  of  using  the  boom  that  has  all  the 
problems  of  deployment,  you  have  the  rigid  hulls  of  a  vessel,  you 
create  a  very  wide  swathe  that  can  move  through  an  oil  spill  in 
large  sea  states  because  the  vessel  has  much  better  stability  than 
most  of  the  smaller  type  skimmers  than  we  have.  And  this  would 
actually,  the  vessel’s  hull  itself  would  be  able  to  be  used  to  skim. 
This  is  something  that  I  think  in  order  to  have  the  full  toolkit  as 
the  Makah  spoke  to,  we  need  to  have  ocean  capable  skimming. 
That’s one. 

But  for  the  entrance  to  the  Strait  of  Juan  de  Fuca,  one  of  the 
problems that I believe is that the Coast Guard’s demarcation line 
for  where  the  ocean  starts  in  our  state,  they  consider  up  to  Port 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

74 

Angeles  open  ocean.  The  Coast  Guard  has  a  line  of  demarcation, 
the  Captain  of  the  Port  line  says  basically  that  the  open  ocean  be-
gins in Port Angeles. So the first 70 miles of the Strait of Juan de 
Fuca is treated as open ocean environment. 

And  so  all  the  protective  measures  that  Senator  Magnuson  and 
others have put into place, the tanker size limits, the speed limits, 
the  pilotage,  the  tug  escort  requirement,  none  of  that  begins  until 
vessels clear Port Angeles. 

So I really believe that our maximum risk is going to be through 
the entrance to the Strait to Port Angeles because that’s where all 
the wonderful things that we do in this state are not present. And 
so,  tugs  of  opportunity  were  introduced  to  address  this  problem  in 
part, but the fact of the matter is the majority of the tug trade, the 
tugs  with  availability  are  in  the  Sound  where  they’re  moving  back 
and  forth.  Tugs  that  are  going  out  the  Strait  of  Juan  de  Fuca  are 
typically encumbered with a laden oil barge, they’re doing business. 
So we don’t have a lot of loose tugs hanging around in the Strait 
of  Juan  de  Fuca.  And  so  keeping  a  year-round  rescue  tug  in  Neah 
Bay  is  part  of  the  solution,  but  it  doesn’t  address  the  questions  of 
pilotage  or  speed  limits  or  size  limits  and  many  other  things  that 
are  still  a  gap  in  our  safety  net.  So  I  really  see  that  that’s  where 
some additional specific attention needs to be drawn. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Well,  I  want  to  thank  you  all  for  testifying 
today  and  for  your  input,  and  again,  the  record  stays  open  for  2 
weeks for you to give additional comments and testimony or submit 
information  that  was  brought  up  in  some  of  the  Q  and  A.  I  think 
we  have  a  tour  that  we’re  going  to  go  on  that  we  were  scheduled 
to  start  about  5  minutes  ago,  so  unless  there  are  any  other  com-
ments from panelists, again I want to thank everyone here for not 
just  your  testimony  today  but  for  your  hard  work  as  a  community 
in addressing the security and safety of Washington waters. 

On  the  one  hand  we  can  say  that  we  may  well  be  the  model, 
given our unique geography and pristine area and incredible trade 
and  traffic.  At  the  same  time  I  think  the  challenges  continue.  So 
thank you for stepping up to them and thank you for today’s testi-
mony,  and  we’ll  look  forward  to  keeping  you  abreast  of  the  Sub-
committee’s  work  and  potential  legislation.  So  this  Committee 
hearing is adjourned. Thank you. 

[Whereupon, at 12:20 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

STATE OF WASHINGTON, DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY 

Olympia, WA, August 15, 2005 

Hon. MARIA CANTWELL, 
Ranking Member, 
Senate Subcommittee on Fisheries and the Coast Guard, 
Commerce, Science, and Transportation Committee, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Senator Cantwell: 

Thank you for the opportunity to provide additional comments relating to your re-
cent  field  hearing  of  the  Subcommittee  on  Fisheries  and  the  Coast  Guard.  At  that 
hearing, you asked if I had any recommendations for changes to the Federal Oil Pol-
lution  Act  of  1990  (OPA  90).  I’ve  discussed  this  question  with  my  staff  at  the  Ecol-
ogy Oil Spill Preparedness, Prevention and Response Program and our recommenda-
tions can be found in the attached document. 

Thank  you  again  for  co-sponsoring  the  portion  of  the  recently  passed  energy  bill 
that reauthorized the Oil Spill Liability Trust Fund (OSLTF). The OSLTF is critical 
for the rapid response and clean up of oil spills. This fund will now continue to en-
hance our ability to protect Washington’s natural resources and economy. 

Washington  State  has  an  excellent  working  relationship  with  the  Coast  Guard. 
We  work  closely  with  them  on  all  aspects  of  oil  spill  prevention,  preparedness  and 
response.  However,  as  I  mentioned  in  my  testimony,  we  are  concerned  that  Coast 
Guard  homeland  security  activities  are  competing  for  resources  with  other  impor-
tant missions, including marine environmental protection. 

The Thirteenth District U.S. Coast Guard Sectors Seattle and Portland are doing 
an  excellent  job  meeting  this  challenge  within  limited  resources,  but  we  believe 
there  is  an  opportunity  to  enhance  our  partnership  with  the  Coast  Guard  in  some 
of  these  activities.  A  stronger  partnership  may  require  changes  to  the  traditional 
and  statutory  responsibilities  between  the  Coast  Guard  and  the  state.  I  hope  that 
as  you  consider  changes  to  OPA  90,  that  one  possible  outcome  might  be  to  make 
the  OSLTF  eligible  for  use  on  prevention  and  preparedness  work  at  both  the  Fed-
eral and state level. 

Thank  you  again  for  your  leadership.  If  you  have  further  questions  or  if  I  can  be 

of assistance on these issues, please contact me. 

Sincerely, 

Spill Prevention, Preparedness, and Response. 

DALE JENSEN, 
Program Manager, 

RECOMMENDED CHANGES TO OPA 90 AND FEDERAL OIL SPILL PREVENTION, 

PREPAREDNESS, AND RESPONSE ACTIVITIES 

State/Coast  Guard  Cooperation  on  Oil  Spill  Prevention,  Preparedness,  and 

Response 

Congress recently reauthorized the Oil Spill Liability Trust Fund (OSLTF) to pro-
vide for continued funding of the account up to $3 billion. The Coast Guard utilizes 
the OSLTF to reimburse for spill response costs, and these funds are of critical im-
portance to the states. 

Since  2001,  the  Coast  Guard  has  been  faced  with  increased  responsibility  in  crit-
ical  homeland  security  activities.  In  our  region,  the  Coast  Guard  has  stepped  up  to 
these  new  challenges  with  exceptional  professionalism  even  as  it  faces  significant 
budget constraints. 

We  are  concerned  that  these  new  responsibilities  and  pressures  on  the  Coast 
Guard  will  impact  their  activities  in  the  area  of  oil  spill  prevention  and  response. 
Fortunately,  the  Thirteenth  District  U.S.  Coast  Guard’s  Sectors  have  done  an  out-

(75) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

76 

standing job balancing these demands. However, we urge Congress to provide more 
resources  to  the  Coast  Guard  commensurate  with  the  increased  demands  that  are 
placed on the agency through their many important missions. 

Washington  and  other  states  that  have  robust  oil  spill  prevention,  preparedness 
and  response  programs  can  relieve  some  of  the  pressure  from  the  Coast  Guard  by 
picking-up  more  responsibility  in  the  area  of  oil  spill  prevention,  preparedness  and 
response. 

Recommendation:  The  Coast  Guard  should  continue  work  with  states  to  develop 
cooperative  oil  spill  prevention,  preparedness  and  response  programs.  In  Wash-
ington  State,  Ecology  and  the  Coast  Guard  have  developed  protocols  pursuant  to  a 
Memorandum  of  Understanding  regarding  oil  spills  which  is  an  excellent  example 
and  foundation  for  such  cooperative  programs.  Such  programs  can  assist  the  Coast 
Guard by engaging states in oil spill prevention, preparedness, and response, while 
allowing the Coast Guard to continue to focus many of their resources on the home-
land security mission. 

Under such cooperative programs, the OSLTF could be used to provide additional 
resources  for  oil  spill  prevention  and  preparedness  activities,  as  well  as  continuing 
with the traditional spill response funding. 
Olympic Coast National Marine Sanctuary, Area To Be Avoided (ATBA) 

The  Olympic  Coast  National  Marine  Sanctuary  is  a  federally  protected  area  of 
Washington’s  northwest  coast.  A  catastrophic  discharge  of  oil  or  hazardous  mate-
rials remains one of the greatest threats facing the Olympic Coast National Marine 
Sanctuary 

The  10-year-old  Area  to  Be  Avoided  (ATBA)  covers  a  large  portion  of  the  Sanc-
tuary.  The  ATBA  helps  to  protect  the  coast  from  the  risk  of  vessel  collisions,  drift 
groundings,  and  powered  groundings  by  providing  additional  time  for  assistance  to 
arrive prior to a drifting vessel grounding along this rocky and environmentally sen-
sitive  coast.  All  ships  and  barges  carrying  cargos  of  petroleum  or  hazardous  mate-
rials, and all ships 1,600 gross tons and above solely in transit are advised to avoid 
sailing through this area. The provisions of the ATBA are voluntary. 

Recommendation: Cargo vessels measuring less than 1,600 GT, tugs, and commer-
cial fishing vessels (of 400 GT or more that are transiting the area and not engaged 
in  fishing  operations  in  the  area)  are  not  covered  by  the  ATBA.  These  vessels  can 
carry significant volumes of fuel. Should there be a major or catastrophic event, this 
fuel  could  be  disastrous  to  the  sensitive  ecosystem  of  the  Sanctuary.  By  extending 
the application of the ATBA to these vessels it would give rescue vessels more time 
to  reach  a  stricken  vessel.  Also,  the  ATBA  is  voluntary.  When  a  vessel  violates  the 
ATBA,  the  owner/operator  is  sent  a  letter  explaining  the  purpose  of  the  ATBA  and 
asking  that  the  vessel  operator  avoid  the  area  in  the  future.  We  recommend  that 
Congress  give  the  Coast  Guard  and  the  Olympic  Coast  National  Marine  Sanctuary 
the authority to penalize repeat violators of the ATBA. The Coast Guard and Sanc-
tuary should also be given sufficient resources to accomplish this task. 
Pre-Booming During Fuel Transfers From Vessels 

On  December  30,  2003,  approximately  4,500  gallons  of  fuel  oil  was  spilled  into 
Puget  Sound  during  a  fuel  transfer.  Recent  data  provided  to  the  Department  of 
Ecology  indicates  that  in  a  6-month  period,  4,700  transfers  were  reported,  which 
covers  approximately  80  million  barrels  total  (excluding  refineries  and  Navy  trans-
fers). Of this total, 7.9 million barrels are transfers between entities that aren’t fully 
regulated.  One  practice  to  protect  water  resources  in  the  event  of  a  spill  is  to  ‘‘pre- 
boom’’  oil  transfers.  This  involves  placing  oil  spill  boom  around  a  vessel  prior  to 
transferring fuel. In the event of a spill, the boom would prevent the spilled product 
from spreading. 

Recommendation: Currently the Coast Guard Captain of the Port has the author-
ity  to  require  pre-booming  of  transfer  operations.  The  Coast  Guard,  in  cooperation 
with  the  Department  of  Ecology,  should  identify  certain  high-risk  transfers  and  re-
quire pre-booming of these operations. 
Coast Guard Salvage Rule and Rescue Tug 

On  May  10,  2002,  the  Coast  Guard  announced  that  it  was  seeking  comments  on 
the Notice of Proposed Rulemaking published in the Federal Register. The proposed 
rule would revise the salvage and firefighting requirements for tank ships and tank 
barges  transporting  oil  in  bulk  as  cargo.  The  revisions  clarify  the  salvage  and  ma-
rine firefighting services that must be identified in a vessel response plan to ensure 
an effective response to an incident. The proposed rule would also establish specific 
response time requirements for those salvage and marine firefighting services. Gen-
eral  requirements  for  salvage  and  firefighting  services  were  first  published  in  1993 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

77 

as  part  of  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard’s  tank  vessel  response  plan  regulations  under  the 
Oil  Pollution  Act  of  1990.  To  date,  the  Coast  Guard  has  not  finalized  these  rules. 
Since 1998, Washington State has paid for the stationing of a rescue tug at Neah 
Bay.  This  pre-positioned  tug  is  ideally  situated  to  assist  vessels  transiting  through 
the  Straits  of  Juan  de  Fuca.  The  tug  has  also  assisted  vessels  off  the  Washington 
coast.  The  tug  is  based  in  Neah  Bay  for  a  period  of  six  to  9  months  depending  on 
the  available  funding.  Winter  storms  present  a  higher  risk  of  oil  spills  from  the 
nearly  10,000  cargo  ships  and  tanker  transits  traveling  through  the  Strait  each 
year. Fifteen billion gallons of oil are carried through the Strait each year via cargo 
and  passenger  vessels,  oil  barges,  tankers  and  fishing  vessels.  Bad  weather  that  is 
often experienced along the outer coast and in the western Strait presents an added 
risk to vessel traffic. 

Recommendation:  The  Coast  Guard  should  complete  the  Federal  salvage  regula-
tions.  Once  the  regulation  has  been  completed,  we  can  evaluate  the  current  capa-
bility  of  the  Neah  Bay  rescue  tug  and  other  salvage  requirements  under  the  rule. 
Also,  the  state  has  consistently  provided  the  bulk  of  the  funding  for  the  tug.  This 
should also be a Federal responsibility, and the Federal Government should provide 
funding  for  a  year-round  rescue  tug  presence  at  Neah  Bay.  The  U.S.  Government 
should  ask  Canada  and  British  Columbia  to  provide  matching  funds  for  tug  oper-
ations since the tug provides assistance to all vessels transiting the Strait, including 
those bound for British Columbia ports. 
Regulation of Tow Vessels 

Currently  all  tank  vessels  must  meet  various  Coast  Guard  regulatory  require-
ments  for  their  operations.  However,  each  year  millions  of  gallons  of  petroleum 
products  are  carried  on  barges,  Articulated  Tank  Barges  (ATBs),  and  Integrated 
Tank  Barges  (ITBs).  These  vessels  are  all  classified  as  towed  barges  and  are  less 
stringently  regulated,  even  though  some  of  the  largest  barges  can  carry  as  much 
product as a small tankship. 

Recommendation:  OPA  90  should  be  amended  to  require  the  regulation  of  tugs 
towing  oil  barges,  Articulated  Tugs  and  Barges  (ATBs),  and  Integrated  Tugs  and 
Barges (ITBs). Such regulations should be similar to the requirements for tank ves-
sels. 
State Damage Claim Models for Natural Resources Damages 

To  meet  the  burden  of  proof  for  small  damage  claims  the  present  OPA  rules  do 
not  consider  the  use  of  state  damage  claim  models  for  estimating  natural  resource 
damages.  Although  the  D.C.  OPA  office  has  begun  to  consider  Florida  model  cases 
and has offered to look at the Washington model, it would be useful to memorialize 
this in OPA to assure that all claims for damages receive compensation. 

Recommendation: OPA 90 should be amended to allow the use of the Washington 
State  Compensation  model  as  a  method  of  establishing  damages.  The  amendment 
could also allow the use of models developed by any other state that have a proven 
alternative  way  to  establish  damages.  The  amendment  could  consider  standards  of 
approval and conditions for use when the fund would accept alternative assessment 
procedures to compensate for damages that a state could not recover from a respon-
sible party that didn’t pay or could not be located. 

PEOPLE FOR PUGET SOUND 

Seattle, WA, August 1, 2005 

Hon. MARIA CANTWELL, 
Ranking Member, 
Senate Subcommittee on Fisheries and the Coast Guard, 
Commerce, Science, and Transportation Committee, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Senator Cantwell and Members of the Committee: 

Thank you for your interest in the pressing need to enhance the Federal Govern-
ment’s  vigilance  in  preventing  oil  spills  and  for  providing  us  with  the  opportunity 
to  make  recommendations  for  the  Committee’s  consideration.  People  For  Puget 
Sound,  a  citizens’  organization  striving  to  protect  and  restore  the  Sound,  has  long 
recognized  the  Sound’s  vulnerability  to  oil  spills  and  has  been  actively  involved  in 
many policy deliberations on oil spill prevention and response. 

First, we would like to heartily thank Senator Cantwell for her hard work on the 
energy  bill  to  reinstate  the  Oil  Spill  Liability  Trust  Fund,  the  tax  that  supports  it, 
the cap increase to $3 billion, and fund’s extension to 2014. This is hugely important 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

78 

to Puget Sound, and we greatly appreciate Senator Cantwell’s efforts to be sure this 
issue was addressed in the bill. 

Despite  years  of  effort,  Puget  Sound  remains  at  an  unacceptably  high  risk  from 
oil  spills.  One  major  spill  would  destroy  the  Sound,  and  with  it  the  enormous  eco-
nomic  and  cultural  values  Puget  Sound  provides  to  Washington  State  and  the  na-
tion.  The  Sound  is  a  fjord,  with  many  narrow  channels  in  which  oil  can  slosh  back 
and forth from beach to beach with the tides. Clean up of spills has historically been 
nearly  impossible  in  Puget  Sound  primarily  due  to  this  convoluted  geography.  We 
desperately  need  help  from  the  Federal  Government  to  increase  vigilance  and  pre-
vent spills, as we simply cannot clean them up. 

Thank you for considering the following enhancements to the Federal role in pre-

venting spills: 

1. Instruct the U.S. Coast Guard and other appropriate Federal agencies to im-
plement those sections and subsections of OPA 90 that have not yet been imple-
mented. 
2. Fully fund a permanent, year-round, fully-equipped and staffed rescue tug at 
Neah Bay and other high-risk areas in Puget Sound, such as Haro Strait. 
3.  Include  tank  vessels,  raise  the  cap  to  $4  billion,  remove  the  sunset,  and  au-
thorize  the  Oil  Spill  Liability  Trust  Fund  to  be  used  for  prevention  programs. 
4. Require all fishing, cargo, passenger, and tank-ships and barges to report cas-
ualties (as defined in the CFR), malfunctioning propulsion, navigation, steering 
systems, and other incapacities that threaten marine waters. 

Thank you again for the opportunity to provide these comments. We look forward 
to working with you and the Committee to provide better protection for Puget Sound 
and all of Washington’s marine waters from the threat of oil spills. 

Sincerely, 

NAKI STEVENS, 

Director of Programs. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF THE PRINCE WILLIAM REGIONAL CITIZENS’ ADVISORY 

COUNCIL (PWSRCAC) 

Introduction 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  provide  written  testimony  for  the  field  hearing 

held in Seattle on August 1, 2005. 

The Prince William Sound Regional Citizens’ Advisory Council (PWSRCAC) is an 
independent  non-profit  corporation  whose  mission  is  to  promote  environmentally 
safe  operation  of  the  Valdez  Marine  Terminal  and  associated  tankers.  Our  work  is 
guided  by  the  Oil  Pollution  Act  of  1990  (OPA  90)  and  our  contract  with  Alyeska 
Pipeline  Service  Company.  In  language  introduced  by  then-Senator  Frank  Mur-
kowski,  OPA  90  designates  citizens’  advisory  councils  in  Prince  William  Sound  and 
Cook  Inlet,  Alaska,  as  ‘‘Demonstration  Programs.’’  We  believe  that  designation  im-
plies that, if successful, the Alaska councils could be replicated in other areas; how-
ever,  that  has  never  been  done  with  the  exception  of  the  recent  creation  of  a  citi-
zens’  council  by  the  Washington  State  Legislature.  While  Washington’s  council  is 
similar  to  the  Alaska  councils  in  some  respects,  there  are  some  significant  dif-
ferences such as the level of funding and the perceived independence of the councils. 
Therefore,  we  recommend  that  Congress  replicate  the  OPA  90  councils  in  other 
areas of the country. 

Our core principle is that citizens must have a direct voice in ensuring the safety 
of oil transportation. Citizens have the most to lose when the system fails as it did 
in 1989 in Prince William Sound, and as it did last year and again earlier this year 
in  Puget  Sound.  As  memories  of  the  Exxon  spill  fade,  we  provide  the  constant  vigi-
lance necessary to prevent a resurgence of the complacency that Congress identified 
in OPA 90 as one of the spill’s causes. 

PWSRCAC’s  18  member  organizations  are  communities  in  the  region  affected  by 
the 1989 Exxon Valdez oil spill, as well as commercial fishing, aquaculture, Native, 
recreation, tourism, and environmental groups. 

As we describe our group, we’d like to address a common misconception about us: 
That we are an environmental organization. That’s not accurate. We are not an en-
vironmental  organization,  at  least  not  in  the  sense  of  Greenpeace  and  the  Sierra 
Club. 

Our board has 19 seats, only one of which is held by a traditional environmental 

organization. The others seats include: 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

79 

• two representatives for Alaska’s tourism industry; 
• various cities, boroughs and unincorporated villages; 
• Alaska Native tribes; 
• Native-owned for-profit business corporations; and 
• commercial fishing organizations. 
In  fact,  one  of  our  member  organizations  is  the  Alaska  State  Chamber  of  Com-
merce, which participates in PWSRCAC because of the damage suffered by the tour-
ism industry in the Exxon Valdez spill. Indeed, the motives of most of these organi-
zations  for  participating  in  PWSRCAC  are  not  primarily  environmental  in  char-
acter.  Rather,  those  motives  are  economic  and  social,  a  reflection  of  the  enormous 
damage  that  a  catastrophic  oil  spill  inflicts  on  the  economy,  people,  and  commu-
nities of the affected area. 
Principles of Citizen Oversight 

Over our sixteen-plus years of existence, we’ve learned a lot about how to be effec-
tive in promoting safer oil transportation. The oversight we provide, like that adopt-
ed  in  the  Washington  legislation,  is  not  regulatory  in  nature.  It  is  purely  advisory, 
buttressed  by  the  scientific  and  technical  research  we  commission.  Following  are 
some key points for effective citizen oversight: 
Point One: Avoid Confrontation. Instead, Work Toward Partnership 

We’ve teamed up with many companies and agencies on many projects to improve 
safety  in  Prince  William  Sound.  Our  world-class  tanker  escort  system  is  one  exam-
ple of industry, citizens, and regulators working together to achieve success. The ice-
berg-detection  radar  system  now  operating  near  the  site  of  the  Exxon  Valdez 
grounding is another. 

But  a  meeting  that  took  place  recently  in  our  Anchorage  office  is  perhaps  the 
most  telling  example  of  how  we’ve  learned  to  work  closely  with  companies  that 
many people would assume to be our natural adversaries. 

At  that  meeting,  our  staff  sat  down  with  Houston-based  officials  of  a  major  oil 
company  to  plan  a  large-scale  spill  drill  that  will  take  place  this  fall  in  Prince  Wil-
liam Sound. That oil company is giving our council a major role in the drill, perhaps 
a  bigger  and  more  tightly  integrated  role  than  we’ve  had  in  any  other  company’s 
drills. 

And  the  name  of  that  oil  company?  Exxon  Mobil.  That’s  correct.  The  Prince  Wil-
liam  Sound  Regional  Citizens’  Advisory  Council  is  now  working  hand-in-hand  with 
the  company  responsible  for  North  America’s  largest  oil  spill  to  make  sure  nothing 
like it happens again. 

We believe that if citizens’ councils are created in other areas of the country, they 
would  be  able  to  provide  regulators,  industry,  and  the  public  the  same  kind  of  ad-
vice,  information,  and  support  to  promote  the  best  prevention  measures  for  their 
waters  and  that  they  could  operate  in  a  collaborative,  non-adversarial,  non-regu-
latory fashion that would be of great value to all stakeholders. 
Point Two: Information Is the Most Valuable Thing We Can Provide 

We  spend  hundreds  of  thousands  of  dollars  each  year  on  scientific  research  and 
technical  analysis  to  formulate  and  support  the  positions  we  take  in  our  advice  to 
industry  and  regulators.  It’s  all  very  well  to  appear  at  a  public  hearing  and  say, 
‘‘We  think  the  Sound  should  be  protected.’’  But  we’ve  learned  that,  to  make  a  real 
difference, we must produce credible technical information on why a given protective 
measure is needed, and why the option we favor is better than the alternatives. This 
kind  of  scientific  analysis  is  very  expensive,  so  much  so  that  we  sometimes  provide 
regulators  with  research  they  could  not  have  commissioned  on  their  own.  That  is 
why adequate funding is essential if a citizen oversight group is to make a meaning-
ful  contribution  to  preventing  oil  spills,  and  to  ensuring  a  fast,  effective  response 
if prevention fails. 
Point Three: Independence Is Vital 

We  operate  in  a  highly-charged  atmosphere  where  investments  of  hundreds  of 
millions  of  dollars  ride  on  regulatory  decisions.  The  industries  involved  have  ready 
access  to  agency  personnel  and  elected  officials.  We  are  under  constant  pressure  to 
bend  our  views  and  advice  to  the  prevailing  political  and  regulatory  winds.  We  are 
able to set our own course only because of our independence. 

That  independence  rests  on  two  main  pillars.  One  is  the  fact  that  our  member 

entities choose their own representatives to our board. 

The other pillar is guaranteed funding. In our case, it comes from a contract with 
Alyeska Pipeline Service Company that will stay in effect as long as the trans-Alas-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

80 

ka  pipeline  has  oil  in  it.  In  this,  we  are  different  from  regulatory  agencies.  Their 
budgets  may  be  at  risk  because  of  cost-cutting  by  the  government  as  a  whole,  or 
because  the  political  winds,  temporarily  at  least,  blow  against  vigorous  oversight. 
Point Four: Judge Us By Our Effectiveness 

Since 1989, nothing remotely resembling the catastrophe of the Exxon Valdez has 
happened in Prince William Sound. Industry and regulators deserve much credit for 
this  safety  record,  of  course,  but  so  does  the  PWSRCAC,  as  attested  by  the  numer-
ous  kudos  we’ve  received  from  the  industry  and  regulatory  agencies  we  work  with. 
The  clearest  example:  We’ve  twice  received  the  Legacy  Award  from  the  British  Co-
lumbia/Pacific States Oil Spill Task Force. 

sponse in the Valdez trade. 

to the Geographic Response Plans used in Washington State. 

in creating the world-class fleet of escort tugs serving Prince William Sound. 

What have we done to deserve the recognition we’ve received? Here’s a partial list: 
• We  helped  perfect  the  contingency  plans  that  govern  spill  prevention  and  re-
• We’ve  introduced  and  helped  develop  Geographic  Response  Strategies,  similar 
• We were instrumental in securing double-hull requirements in Federal law, and 
• We  spearheaded  and  largely  financed  the  project  to  obtain  ice-detection  radar 
• We  conducted  extensive  research  and  published  a  comprehensive  community 
• We developed and promoted near-shore response plans. 
• We have conducted extensive research into the causes of and cures for the prob-
• We  have  established  procedures  and  relationships  to  provide  us  with  clear  ac-
• We  have  assisted  in  developing  and  training  a  fleet  of  fishing  vessels  for  oil- 
• We  have  a  permanent  drill  monitor  on  staff  to  oversee  drills  and  recommend 
• We  are  a  source  of  peer  reviews  for  technical  reports  utilized  by  regulatory 

guidebook on dealing with the socioeconomic impacts of oil spills. 

lem of invasive species reaching Alaska in tanker ballast water. 

for Prince William Sound. 

cess to industry and regulators. 

spill response. 

ways to improve response readiness. 

agencies. 

Our final point in this list of lessons we’ve learned and things we’ve accomplished 
in  Alaska  has  to  do  with  the  importance  of  longevity  and  continuity.  Citizens  stay 
in  place  and  maintain  vigilance  as  regulators  and  industry  personnel  come  and  go. 
The  companies  and  agencies  that  we  work  with  now  include  very  few  people  who 
were  around  at  the  time  of  the  Exxon  Valdez  spill.  By  contrast,  virtually  everyone 
on our board and our staff was in Alaska in 1989, and many were actually involved 
in  some  way  with  the  spill  or  its  aftermath.  Consequently,  it  now  often  falls  to 
PWSRCAC  to  provide  the  institutional  memory  needed  to  make  sure  the  lessons  of 
the Exxon Valdez figure into today’s decisions. 
Conclusion 

In closing, we would like to revisit history one final time. We had calls for a citi-
zens’ council in Prince William Sound long before 1989, but it took the Exxon Valdez 
to make it happen. Other areas of the country are now in somewhat the same posi-
tion we were back then. We just hope that they are luckier and wiser than we were, 
and  that  it  won’t  take  a  disaster  to  bring  about  citizen  oversight  in  preventing  oil 
spills. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

DOUGLAS HELTON 

Question  1.  In  your  testimony  you  mention  that  NOAA  has  identified  the  navi-
gable approaches to Puget Sound as one of the critical areas in the national hydro-
graphic  survey  backlog.  When  is  the  new  survey  for  the  Puget  Sound  region  slated 
for  completion?  What  is  the  schedule  for  completely  updating  these  surveys  nation-
ally? 

Answer.  The  majority  of  work  on  the  NOAA  hydrographic  survey  project  at  the 
‘‘Northern  Approaches  to  Puget  Sound’’  (internally  known  as  OPR–N372–RA)  was 
completed in 2004 and 2005. The remaining portion of the Puget Sound project (ex-
cluding  the  traffic  separation  zone)  is  scheduled  for  completion  this  fall  (FY  2006) 
by the NOAA Survey Ship Rainier. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

81 

The  projected  completion  date  for  the  ‘‘original’’  43,000  nm 2 of  critical  backlog  is 
2018.  NOAA  continues  to  track  the  Critical  Area  remaining  on  the  original  43,000 
nm 2 identified  as  the  critical  backlog  in  1994.  However,  because  this  category  of 
critical  survey  miles  is  not  static,  NOAA  no  longer  reports  its  performance  against 
the  43,000  nm 2.  As  areas  become  more  or  less  critical  to  survey  for  reasons  such 
as changing navigation patterns, shifting vessel type and use, weather/natural inci-
dents  reconfiguring  depths,  resurvey  needed,  etc.,  NOAA  has  sought  a  better  way 
to  capture  its  performance  and  reflect  the  larger  pool  of  national  survey  needs. 
NOAA now reports its hydrographic survey performance relative to all 537,000 navi-
gationally  significant  square  nautical  miles.  The  newly  updated  NOAA  Hydro-
graphic  Survey  Priorities,  which  can  be  found  at  http://nauticalcharts.noaa.gov/ 
staff/NHSP.html, describes NOAA’s priority categories and criteria. 

Question 2. The conversion of NOAA’s nautical charts into digital format is an ex-
cellent  example  of  the  potential  for  new  technology  to  enhance  navigational  safety. 
However,  I  understand  that  the  completion  of  this  conversion  in  not  slated  until 
2010.  Is  this  correct?  What  percentage  of  NOAA  charts  have  currently  been  con-
verted? How much is this effort expected to cost? 

Answer.  Yes,  completion  of  conversion  of  all  U.S.  and  territorial  waters  charted 
by  NOAA  will  occur  by  2010.  Approximately  50  percent  of  NOAA’s  nautical  charts 
have  been  converted  into  digital  format;  506  Electronic  Navigational  Charts  (ENC) 
are  currently  available  for  use.  However,  NOAA  has  completed  100  percent  of  its 
priority  one  charts,  which  include  all  major  ports.  NOAA  is  currently  working  to 
provide  seamless  coverage  between  ports.  By  2007,  when  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard  is 
slated  to  promulgate  electronic  chart  carriage  regulations,  NOAA  will  have  90  per-
cent  of  its  chart  suite  of  U.S.  commercial  waters  covered  by  ENCs.  For  the  Puget 
Sound  area,  only  two  additional  charts  are  needed  in  order  to  provide  100  percent 
coverage of that area. 

The  Fiscal  Year  2006  President’s  Budget  Request  includes  an  increase  of  $1.89M 
for  Electronic  Navigational  Charts.  At  the  total  requested  funding  level  of  $6.19M 
for  Fiscal  Year  2006,  NOAA  will  achieve  complete  Electronic  Navigational  Chart 
coverage by the end of Fiscal Year 2008. 

Question  3.  Is  there  any  promise  of  developing  improved  detection,  response,  and 
other technologies aimed at reducing the risk from oil spills, or is what we have now 
about the state-of-the-art? What is the status of NOAA’s research program for such 
technologies?  How  much  funding  was  requested  for  these  activities  in  Fiscal  Year 
2006? 

Answer.  NOAA,  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard,  the  Environmental  Protection  Agency 
(EPA),  and  the  Minerals  Management  Service  continue  to  conduct  and  support  re-
search to reduce the risk from oil spills. Improvements continue to be made in spill 
modeling  and  trajectory,  as  well  as  in  alternative  technologies  such  as  dispersants 
and in situ burning. Also recent U.S. Coast Guard research and development efforts 
have been aimed at developing the capability to identify, detect, track, contain, and 
recover  heavy  oils  on  or  below  the  surface,  oil  in  extremely  cold  conditions  and  oils 
from submerge wrecks at extreme depths. 

One  such  mechanism  is  through  the  Coastal  Response  Research  Center  (CRRC), 
which  is  a  partnership  between  NOAA  and  the  University  of  New  Hampshire.  The 
goal  of  the  CRRC  is  to  reduce  the  consequences  of  spills  and  other  hazards  that 
threaten coastal environments and communities. The Center conducts research, de-
velops  new  response  and  restoration  methods,  and  transfers  technology  to  practi-
tioners.  Some  of  the  projects  the  CRRC  has  worked  on  include:  (1)  creating  a  mod-
eling  program  that  will  provide  the  capability  to  simulate  deepwater  oil  and  gas 
spills;  (2)  developing  an  oil  spill  response  cost-effectiveness  analytical  tool;  and  (3) 
updating  fate  and  transport  forecasting  models  of  oil  released  through  deep  well 
blow-outs and pipeline failures. 

Efforts  aimed  at  developing  improved  detection,  response  and  other  technologies 
aimed  at  reducing  the  risk  from  oil  spills  is  spearheaded  by  the  Office  of  Response 
and  Restoration  within  the  National  Ocean  Service.  The  Fiscal  Year  2006  request 
for this office is $22.1 million, not including funds for the continuing clean-up of the 
Pribilof Islands. 

Question 4. Is the Interagency Coordinating Committee on Oil Pollution Research 

still an active, effective vehicle for guiding research efforts at the Federal level? 

Answer. While the Interagency Coordinating Committee on Oil Pollution Research 
(the  Committee)  continues  to  provide  a  forum  for  sharing  the  work  of  individual 
agencies,  its  level  of  activity  has  decreased  in  recent  years.  The  Committee  is 
charged  with  coordinating  a  comprehensive  program  of  research,  technology  devel-
opment,  and  demonstration  among  Federal  agencies  in  cooperation  with  industry, 
universities,  research  institutions,  state  governments,  and  other  countries.  This  re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

82 

sponsibility includes preparation of an Oil Pollution Research and Technology Plan. 
The  last  plan  was  published  in  1997  with  revisions  based  recommendations  made 
by the Marine Board of the National Research Council. 

The Committee had been active in coordinating international research and devel-
opment  (R&D)  efforts.  The  Committee  helped  organize  the  first  and  second  Inter-
national  R&D  Fora  on  oil  spill  response  issues,  which  were  held  in  McLean,  VA 
(1992)  and  London,  UK  (1995).  In  2002,  a  third  international  forum  was  held  in 
Brest,  France,  and  focused  on  High  Density  Oil  Spill  Response.  The  International 
Maritime  Organization  and  the  European  Commission  were  the  primary  sponsors 
of these international meetings; NOAA was a meeting cosponsor. 

Question  5.  You  testified  that  if  a  vessel  transits  through  the  boundaries  of  the 
Olympic  Coast  National  Marine  Sanctuary  and  the  IMO-recognized  Area  To  Be 
Avoided  (ATBA),  you  have  a  system  in  place  to  contact  such  vessels  to  ensure  that 
they are familiar with the guidelines in place. Why doesn’t NOAA also know wheth-
er  tank  vessels  engaged  in  such  transits  are  carrying  oil?  Are  oil-laden  vessels  in 
fact  ‘‘cutting-the-corner’’  of  the  ATBA  and  entering  into  its  boundaries,  and  if  so, 
what can be done to end this practice? 

Answer.  The  Olympic  Coast  National  Marine  Sanctuary  (OCNMS)  ATBA  Edu-
cation  and  Monitoring  Program  has  been  greatly  aided  by  the  availability  of  radar 
data,  and  the  cooperation  of  industry  and  the  U.S.  and  Canadian  Coast  Guard. 
Since  2002,  when  the  provisions  of  the  ATBA  were  expanded  to  include  all  vessels 
over 1,600 gross tons, the highest priority of the program has been outreach to this 
new  population  of  vessels.  Many  of  these  vessel  classes,  including  containerships 
and oil tankers, have better than 99 percent compliance rates. 

The  reported  compliance  rates  for  tank  barges  are  lower  and  this  segment  of  the 
industry  has  not,  to  date,  been  a  target  for  our  outreach  efforts.  Improving  compli-
ance rates for tank barges will be a priority for the program in 2006, and this effort 
will  require  a  different  approach  than  has  been  used  with  larger  vessels.  OCNMS 
and  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard  (USCG)  evaluate  two  factors  before  deciding  whether  or 
not  to  contact  a  vessel  owner:  (1)  if  the  vessel  entered  the  ATBA;  and  (2)  size  or 
cargo of the vessel (i.e. ships and barges carrying cargoes of oil or hazardous mate-
rials, and all ships 1,600 gross tons). 

Tank barges regularly transit just outside of the ATBA boundary. Positional accu-
racy and frequency of fixes of the radar data makes it difficult to determine if they 
are  violating  the  ATBA,  or  transiting  just  outside  the  boundary.  Another  challenge 
is  the  status  of  the  barge’s  cargo.  The  data  used  does  occasionally  indicate  if  the 
oil  barge  is  ‘‘loaded’’  or  ‘‘empty;’’  however,  in  most  cases  it  does  not.  Since  this  is 
a  voluntary  program,  OCNMS  and  the  USCG  have  taken  a  conservative  approach 
of  only  sending  letters  to  those  vessels  for  which  a  violation  is  obvious.  OCNMS 
plans  to  consult  with  the  USCG  and  marine  industry  to  identify  an  alternative  ap-
proach to improving ATBA compliance within this segment of the industry. In addi-
tion, OCNMS hopes that improved access to vessel track data and Automatic Identi-
fication System (AIS) reports will help improve the accuracy of our monitoring pro-
gram. 

Question  6.  You  also  mention  in  your  testimony  that  NOAA  has  been  ‘‘partici-
pating  in  other  initiatives  reviewing  additional  measures  to  improve  maritime  and 
environmental safety in the region.’’ What are some of the additional measures and 
initiatives? 

Answer. NOAA provides products and services that aide mariners in safe naviga-

tion through the waters, including: 

or other hazards to navigation. 

by mariners to safely navigate their vessels. 

• Charting  products  that  indicate  shipping  lanes,  aids  to  navigation,  and  shoals 
• Tidal  current  information  and  weather  forecasts,  all  essential  information  used 
• A Navigation Response Team is on hand 365 days a year to perform emergency 
response  surveys  to  locate  potential  obstructions,  at  the  request  of  the  U.S. 
Coast Guard. 
• The  Port  of  Tacoma  is  the  location  of  one  of  twelve  NOAA  Physical  Oceano-
graphic  Real  Time  Systems  (PORTS)  established  around  the  country.  PORTS 
provide quality-controlled real time oceanographic and meteorological data. 
• NOAA  computer  modeling  offers  insight  into  the  risks  and  consequences  of  a 
• NOAA  is  an  active  member  of  the  Harbor  Safety  Committee  in  Puget  Sound 
and  the  Ports  and  Waterway  Committee  in  Portland.  These  committees  work 
to prioritize charting requirements. 

spill in a particular location. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

83 

• Critical  backlog  survey—NOAA  works  with  the  United  States  Power  Squadron 

on the Committee to work on charting for the West Coast. 

• NOAA is working with the U.S. Coast Guard, Washington State, the Pilots As-

sociation, and others on access to vessel track data. 

• Tsunamis—NOAA  has  a  system  of  Deep-Ocean  Assessment  and  Reporting  of 
Tsunamis  (DART)  buoys  in  place  on  the  West  Coast,  in  addition  to  a  mapping 
system  for  the  coast  and  inland,  which  facilitate  the  planning  effort  and  emer-
gency warning system. 

• NOAA’s  All-Hazards  Weather  Radios  will  begin  to  include  all  types  of  hazards 

warnings, not just those that are weather-related. 

• NOAA is also active with the Region 10 Regional Response Team, which works 
to coordinate efforts for responses to significant oil and hazardous substance in-
cidents and works toward preparedness for such events. 

Question  7.  You  testified,  and  we’ve  heard  previous  testimony  in  the  Committee 
from  others,  that  double-hull  tankers  are  not  a  ‘‘panacea,’’  in  that  even  a  double- 
hull  tanker  could  be  involved  in  a  major  spill  were  it  to  be  involved  in  a  collision. 
That  being  the  case,  won’t  navigational  measures  continue  to  be  necessary?  What 
are some additional steps that could be taken in this regard? 

Answer.  Double  hulls  are  a  feature  designed  to  reduce  the  potential  for  spillage 
from  a  low  velocity  grounding  or  collision.  Because  double  hulls  would  not  prevent 
a grounding or collision from occurring, navigational measures that aid in reduction 
and prevention of groundings and collisions will continue to be necessary. 

In addition to up-to-date surveys, accurate chart products, and real-time environ-
mental  information  such  as  water  level,  currents,  winds,  etc.,  the  best  way  to  en-
hance navigation safety is to provide a reliable system of aids-to-navigation to assist 
mariners in determining their position and a safe course to steer, and to alert them 
to  dangers.  Additional  precautionary  steps  that  could  be  taken  include:  (1)  imple-
menting  routing  measures  supported  by  Port  Access  Route  Studies,  (2)  completing 
the  modernization  of  the  Federal  Vessel  Traffic  Service  (VTS)  in  the  Puget  Sound 
area,  (3)  establishing  hydrological/meteorological  monitoring  stations,  and  (4)  plac-
ing  additional  current  and  weather  environmental  data  buoys  that  will  help  with 
navigation and response to spills. 

Question  8.  Are  there  other  areas  of  the  country  that  could  benefit  from  some  of 
the navigational and other prevention measures that are in place in the Washington 
area? 

Answer.  All  navigable  waters  of  the  country  benefit  from  reliable  aids  to  naviga-
tion.  Additional  routing  measures  and  new  or  improved  VTSs  could  provide  addi-
tional  benefits  in  some  areas.  However,  they  should  only  be  implemented  after  a 
careful risk analysis and consultation with expert waterways users. All areas of the 
country  would  benefit  from  expanded  implementation  of  the  Automatic  Identifica-
tion System (AIS). Weather and environmental monitoring stations likewise provide 
added benefits wherever they are applied. 

NOAA’s  Physical  Oceanographic  Real  Time  System  (PORTS)  is  a  cost  shared 
partnership program that places water level stations, current meters, meteorological 
packs,  salinity  meters,  air  gap  (bridge  clearance)  and  other  environmental  sensors 
in  locations  identified  in  concert  with  the  local  user  community  that  most  benefit 
safe and efficient navigation. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

CAPTAIN MYLES BOOTHE 

Question  1.  Captain  Boothe,  can  you  tell  me  how  many  tank  vessels  coming  into 
Washington  waters  from  the  U.S.  and  overseas  are  still  single-hull  vessels  or  have 
only double-sides or double-bottoms? When will these ships be phased-out? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  does  not  maintain  statistics  on  the  double/single  hull 
status of tankers entering Washington State’s waters. All tankers operating in U.S. 
waters must be double-hulled by 2015. As a matter of domestic law (per the Oil Pol-
lution  Act  of  1990  (OPA  90))  most  single  hull  tank  vessels  will  be  phased  out  by 
2010.  The  International  Convention  for  the  Prevention  of  Pollution  from  Ships 
(MARPOL) shares a similar scheme which assures that single-hull tankers that are 
subject  to  the  Convention  are  phased-out  not  later  than  2010.  In  some  cases, 
MARPOL permits the extension of single-hull tanker phase-out dates if a Condition 
Assessment  Scheme  indicates  the  vessel  is  in  a  satisfactory  condition  for  continued 
operation. Domestically, vessels equipped with a double-bottom or double-sides may 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

operate beyond 2010 up until 2015 based upon a tiered phase-out schedule outlined 
in OPA 90. 

84 

Question  2.  How  has  Washington  State  law  on  the  use  of  single-hull  vessels  af-

fected the phaseout schedule? 

Answer.  There  is  no  data  that  indicates  Washington  State  law  has  affected  the 
phase-out  schedule  of  single-hull  tankers.  However,  the  Revised  Code  of  Wash-
ington, Section 88.16.190, may be influencing vessel owners to build propulsion and 
steering system redundancy into many of their new double-hull tankers constructed 
for the Puget Sound trade. 

Question 3. Can you tell me how many ships carrying oil—either as cargo or large 
ships  carrying  oil  as  fuel—simply  transit  through  U.S.  waters,  including  waters  in 
the  State  of  Washington,  on  their  way  to  foreign  ports?  Does  the  U.S.  impose  any 
safety regulations on such ships? How many of these ships are single-hull tank ves-
sels  or  have  only  double  sides  or  double  bottoms?  To  the  extent  that  such  ships  in-
clude such tank vessels, when will they be phased out? 

Answer. The U.S. Coast Guard does not maintain statistics on the number of ves-
sels  that  engage  in  innocent  passage  through  U.S.  waters  bound  for  foreign  ports 
without calling upon a U.S. port. Vessels engaging in innocent passage through U.S. 
waters are not required to comply with U.S. laws or regulations, however these ves-
sels  are  expected  to  comply  with  international  standards  (applicable  to  the  vessel), 
such  as  the  International  Convention  for  Safety  of  Life  at  Sea  (SOLAS),  MARPOL, 
etc. 

Vessels  calling  on  U.S.  ports  are  required  to  meet  certain  U.S.  laws  and  regula-
tions  including  the  OPA  90  for  tank  vessels.  OPA  90  phases  out  single-hulled  tank 
vessels  based  on  a  codified  schedule.  MARPOL  shares  a  similar  scheme  which 
assures that most single-hull tankers that are subject to the Convention are phased 
out  not  later  than  2010.  In  some  cases,  MARPOL  permits  the  extension  of  single- 
hull tanker phaseout dates to 2015 if a Condition Assessment Scheme indicates the 
vessel is in a satisfactory condition for continued operation. 

Question 4. I understand that member countries of the International Maritime Or-
ganization  (IMO)  recently  agreed  to  amendments  that  would  apply  more  rigorous 
inspections  to  single-hull  vessels,  yet  the  U.S.  is  not  intending  to  implement  this 
requirement. Is that true, and if so, why is this the U.S. position? 

Answer.  OPA  90  governs  double-hull  requirements  for  vessels  operating  in  U.S. 
waters. In December 2003, the International Maritime Organization (IMO) amended 
Annex  I  to  the  International  Convention  for  the  Prevention  of  Pollution  from  Ships 
(MARPOL  73/78),  modifying  MARPOL  Regulation  13G  which  includes  a  Condition 
Assessment Scheme (CAS). A CAS is an enhanced survey system which verifies the 
structural integrity of single hull tankers. If satisfactory, a CAS may be used to ex-
tend single hull tanker phaseout dates. Since CAS was included in [amended] Regu-
lation  13G,  it  couldn’t  be  adopted  domestically,  as  the  regulation  would  have  re-
quired the United States to implement a single hull tanker phaseout schedule which 
is  inconsistent  with  the  existing  schedule  required  by  Congress  through  the  OPA 
90.  Further,  the  Coast  Guard  already  adopted  and  codified  IMO’s  enhanced  survey 
requirements in 1996 for single hull tankers. This regulation aligns with the SOLAS 
requirement to employ an Enhanced Survey Program (ESP) to assure structural in-
tegrity.  Some  of  the  more  significant  features  of  CAS  will  be  incorporated  into  the 
ESP  under  SOLAS  (which  does  not  conflict  with  domestically  mandated  single  hull 
tanker phaseout dates). These updates to the ESP will become effective on January 
1, 2007. 

In  addition  to  the  above  regimes,  the  Coast  Guard  has  developed  and  imple-
mented a voluntary CAS program. Currently, six vessels are seeking voluntary CAS 
compliance  documentation  through  this  program.  Moreover,  U.S.  vessels  trans-
porting  Alaskan  North  Slope  Crude  oil  from  Alaska  also  participate  in  the  Coast 
Guard-led  Critical  Area  Inspection  Program  to  monitor  structural  integrity  for  ves-
sels engaged in that trade. 

Question 5. When will the Coast Guard complete the upgrade of the Vessel Traffic 
System  in  Puget  Sound,  and  what  kind  of  changes  do  you  expect  will  be  made  as 
part of this upgrade, particularly as they may relate to improving the safe transport 
of oil? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  has  completed  upgrades  of  the  Vessel  Traffic  Service 
(VTS)  in  Puget  Sound.  Under  the  Ports  and  Waterways  Safety  System  acquisition 
project,  the  core  VTS  operating  system  and  13  Automatic  Identification  System 
(AIS)  base  stations  were  installed.  In  addition,  two  radars  were  replaced  with  up-
graded components. 

The  notable  improvement  resulting  from  the  upgrade  is  the  introduction  of  AIS 
coverage.  AIS  allows  for  highly  accurate  tracking  and  identification  of  all  commer-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

85 

cial  vessels  greater  than  65  feet  in  length.  It  also  provides  the  VTS  operator  with 
information  on  a  vessel’s  cargo  so  that  additional  attention  may  be  paid  to  oil  or 
hazardous material transports. 

Question 6. Is the Coast Guard actively considering the use of a traffic separation 
scheme or other navigational measures to lessen the risks of oil spills in other parts 
of the country? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  is  not  currently  considering  the  use  of  any  new  traffic 
separation  schemes  or  other  routing  measures  to  specifically  lessen  the  risk  of  oil 
spills in any other port or waterway. The Coast Guard has, in the past, established 
recommended routes to isolate tanker and hazardous material traffic from other ves-
sels and thus reduce the risk of collision. As an example, these recommended routes 
are being used off the coast of California for vessels carrying certain types of cargo. 
Question  7.  In  a  report  to  Congress  dated  May  12,  2005,  the  Coast  Guard  indi-
cated  that  it  is  more  likely  to  recover  claims  for  an  oil  spill  against  a  responsible 
party  that  has  a  Certificate  of  Financial  Responsibility  (COFR).  However,  only  ves-
sels greater than 300 gross tons have to have these certificates. Should this require-
ment  be  extended  to  smaller  vessels,  particularly  smaller  vessels  that  transport  oil 
as cargo? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  has  not  taken  a  position  that  the  COFR  requirement 
should  be  extended  to  small  vessels  (i.e.,  300  gross  tons  or  less).  The  vast  majority 
of small vessel spills requiring a Federal response with OSLTF funding involve non- 
tank  vessels,  including  some  cargo  and  towing  vessels,  but  primarily  consisting  of 
commercial  fishing  vessels  and  pleasure  craft.  The  following  are  limited  cost  recov-
ery statistics for non-COFR’d vessel spills in which the OSLTF was accessed. 

Vessel Type 

Fishing Vessel 
Pleasure Craft 
Cargo Vessel 
Tug and Towboat 

Number of Incidents 

Incident Costs 

($Million) 

Percent Collected 

593 
210 
180 
44 

8.2 
2.1 
4.0 
1.0 

29 
18 
32 
45 

In  enacting  OPA,  legislators  intended  that  the  Oil  Spill  Liability  Trust  Fund 
would  in  many  cases  be  the  ultimate  insurer  when  liable  polluters  do  not  pay. 
Whether  to  expand  the  COFR  requirements  to  all  small  vessels,  or  a  class  of  small 
vessels, as a means of improving cost recovery for the Fund is in essence a reconsid-
eration of how the cost risk should be shared between the public’s fund and individ-
uals. Any analysis in this regard would likely require data on the number of vessels 
affected,  the  availability  and  cost  of  insurance  to  meet  new  financial  responsibility 
requirements, and the cost to administer the expanded program. 

Question  8.  With  respect  to  its  ongoing  rulemaking  on  improving  response  equip-
ment,  what  has  the  Coast  Guard  done  to  evaluate  the  potential  environmental  im-
pacts from use of dispersants or in situ burning of oil? Do uncertainties remain? 

Answer.  Dispersants  and  in  situ  burning  as  oil  spill  response  methods  have  been 
used for many years throughout the world and in the United States. Dispersant pre- 
approved zones and in situ burn policies have been established for all coastal areas 
of  the  United  States  except  Oregon,  Washington,  and  some  areas  of  Alaska.  A  pre- 
approved  zone  is  one  in  which  the  Federal  On-Scene  Coordinator  can  deploy 
dispersants  (after  employing  a  dispersant-use  decision  matrix)  without  seeking  im-
mediate  approval  from  the  environmental  and  natural  resource  trustees  (Federal 
and state). These pre-approved zones have been developed by the Regional Response 
Teams  (the  Environmental  Protection  Agency  (EPA),  the  Coast  Guard,  the  Depart-
ment of the Interior, and state and other Federal agencies). Many factors are consid-
ered  in  developing  these  zones,  including  the  potential  negative  impacts  of  dispers-
ant use. Between 1985 and 2005, the National Academy of Sciences published 5 dif-
ferent  studies  on  oil  spills  and  the  various  methods  to  respond  to  them,  including 
a  separate  report  on  dispersants  (1989).  The  conclusion  reached  is  that  dispersed 
oil’s  short  term  negative  impacts  to  near  surface  plankton  is  far  less  then  the  con-
tamination  of  coastal  habitats  and  natural  resources.  It  should  be  noted  that  all 
dispersants used in the United States are tested (toxicity and performance) and ap-
proved for use by the EPA (National Product List), in accordance with National Con-
tingency  Plan  regulations.  EPA  maintains  a  schedule  of  dispersants,  known  as  the 
National Contingency Plan Product Schedule, that may be authorized for use on oil 
discharges  by  the  Coast  Guard  On-Scene  Coordinator  with  the  concurrence  of  both 
the EPA representative to the Regional Response Team and the state with jurisdic-
tion over the waters impacted. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

86 

The Coast Guard views dispersants as a critical component to a successful oil spill 
response  when  mechanical  recovery  is  limited  in  its  ability  to  recover  oil.  Mechan-
ical  recovery  has  significant  limitations  when  deployed  in  open  water  areas  and  is 
often  times  overwhelmed  in  large  scale  off  shore  oil  spills.  These  limitations  can 
have far reaching negative impacts on the environment. Dispersants, when used as 
per the regional pre-authorizations, can significantly reduce oil impacts on the near 
shore and shoreline environments. 

Question 9. Given the recent Washington Department of Ecology report which in-
dicates  a  shortage  of  vessels  for  providing  mechanical  response  equipment  to  the 
site of an oil spill, is the Coast Guard addressing this gap? 

Answer.  The  Washington  Department  of  Ecology  report  indicates  that  the  re-
sponse  system  in  Washington  State  could  benefit  from  additional  vessels  of  oppor-
tunity to augment existing response resources within the region. 

The Puget Sound area has more dedicated response vessels than any other region 
in the nation, and the oil spill response organizations’ equipment caches exceed the 
Federal  requirements  for  the  region.  The  Federal  requirements  for  response  equip-
ment  do  not  include  a  specific  requirement  for  vessels  used  to  assist  in  deploying 
spill  response  equipment  such  as  skimmers  and  boom.  The  source  data  used  in  the 
Washington  State  Department  of  Ecology  report  indicated  that  there  were  approxi-
mately 200 dedicated vessels of various types in the State of Washington. There are 
74 dedicated oil skimming vessels in one oil spill response company alone. This past 
year the Coast Guard added 3 oil skimmers to its Puget Sound inventory and com-
pleted  modifications  on  two  of  these  skimmers  so  that  they  may  be  used  on  Army 
Corps  of  Engineers  or  Coast  Guard  vessels  as  vessels  of  opportunity  skimming  sys-
tems  (VOSS).  Additionally,  the  Coast  Guard  has  recently  added  one  of  its  newest 
vessels, USCGC FIR, complete with a Spilled Oil Recover System, to the Port Ange-
les area. 

Mandating an increasing in the number and type of vessels capable and available 
for  oil  pollution  response  would  require  a  change  to  the  Federal  requirements  for 
oil  spill  response  equipment.  This  effort  would  need  to  include  a  cost  benefit  anal-
ysis on a nationwide scale for justification. 

Question  10.  The  recent  Washington  Department  of  Ecology  report  suggested 
using  commercial  fishing  vessels  to  augment  the  insufficient  response  vessel  cov-
erage.  What  would  be  involved  in  ensuring  proper  training  and  safety  for  fishing 
vessel responders? Would the Coast Guard be responsible for this new training? 

Answer. Proper safety and response training of any vessels, including fishing ves-
sels,  used  as  vessels  of  opportunity  would  be  the  responsibility  of  the  oil  spill  re-
sponse organization hiring the vessels. 

Under existing programs, such as those in Alaska (e.g., Ship Escort Response Ves-
sel  System  (SERVS)  for  Prince  William  Sound  and  the  Cook  Inlet  Spill  Response 
Inc.  (CISPRI)  for  Cook  Inlet),  each  response  organization  funds  their  own  training 
and develops their own curriculum. These training programs are not subject to U.S. 
Coast Guard requirements or standards. Review of the training and safety programs 
for both SERVS and CISPRI indicate that 24-hour and 8-hour Hazardous Waste Op-
erations  and  Emergency  Response  training  and  fishing  vessel  safety  training,  as 
well as training in Incident Command System; Response Strategies and Tactics; and 
Wildlife Hazing, Capture and Stabilization are all part of the general curriculum for 
these  ‘‘vessels  of  opportunity.’’  This  recurring  training  usually  takes  one  week  a 
year. 

Question  11.  Please  describe  the  status  of  all  rulemakings  required  by  OPA  90, 
including rules on drug and alcohol testing of crew and salvage, the issues that have 
caused  delays  in  these  rules,  and  when  the  Coast  Guard  plans  to  complete  these 
rules. 

Answer. All but three of the forty regulations OPA 90 required have been issued. 
The  remaining  projects  are  not  complete  because  of  technical  or  jurisdictional  com-
plexity,  as  well  as  limited  rulemaking  resources.  The  three  remaining  OPA  90 
rulemakings are: 

• Tank Vessel Response Plans for Hazardous Substances 
• Facility Response Plans for Hazardous Substances 
• Reporting Marine Casualties [that pose significant harm to the environment] 
Regarding the drug and alcohol testing of crew, the current rulemaking is not con-
sidered an OPA 90 action The rulemaking stems from Public Law (Pub. L. 105–383) 
(46 U.S.C. 2303a) requiring alcohol tests to be done within 2 hours of a serious ma-
rine  incident.  The  Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking  (NPRM)  for  this  Public  Law  was 
published  February  28,  2003.  The  Final  Rule  has  been  prepared  and  is  currently 
going through clearance. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

87 

Regarding  salvage  and  marine  firefighting,  the  current  rulemaking  is  not  consid-
ered  an  OPA  90  action.  In  1993,  the  Coast  Guard  complied  with  OPA  90  by  pub-
lishing  vessel  response  plan  requirements  that  included  salvage  and  marine  fire-
fighting elements. The current rulemaking builds on the existing requirements. The 
Coast  Guard  published  an  NPRM  in  2002.  Analysis  of  public  comments  is  ongoing, 
with the goal of publishing a Final Rule in the future. 

Additionally, the Coast Guard recently initiated a rulemaking in the area of Ves-
sel  and  Deepwater  Port  Limits  of  Liability—Adjustments  to  Reflect  the  Consumer 
Price  Index.  This  action  is  needed  to  adjust  the  limits  of  liability  for  vessels  and 
deepwater  ports  to  reflect  significant  increases  in  the  Consumer  Price  Index.  A 
NPRM is under development, with a goal of publishing it in 2006. 

Question  12.  How  can  we  best  confirm  whether  vessels  transiting  through  the 
Area to Be Avoided off the coast of Washington are laden with oil? Is this a respon-
sibility of the Coast Guard? Does the Coast Guard regularly access this area? 

Answer.  Tank  vessels  and  tank  barges  transiting  near  the  Olympic  Coast  Sanc-
tuary  and  its  associated  Area  to  be  Avoided  (ATBA)  are  required  to  carry  an  Auto-
matic  Identification  System  (AIS)  transponder,  and  to  report  whether  or  not  they 
are carrying hazardous cargo. In addition, all vessels are required to submit an ad-
vance  notice  of  arrival  to  the  Coast  Guard  that  lists  the  cargo  they  are  carrying. 
The  Coast  Guard  VTS  in  Seattle,  and  the  Canadian  Coast  Guard  VTS  in  Tofino, 
British Columbia, continually monitor the ATBA to detect incursions. As such, it is 
extremely  rare  for  a  vessel  laden  with  oil  to  enter  the  area.  Compliance  with  the 
voluntary ATBA is better than 99 percent. In the rare event that a commercial ves-
sel does enter the area, its intentions are immediately questioned by one of the two 
vessel  traffic  services,  regardless  of  its  cargo.  Because  this  remote,  electronic  vigi-
lance  has  been  successful,  the  Coast  Guard  does  not  conduct  regular  patrols  in  the 
area. 

Question  13.  NOAA  testified,  and  we’ve  heard  previous  testimony  in  the  Com-
mittee from others, that double-hull tankers are not a panacea, in that even a dou-
ble-hull tanker could be involved in a major spill were it to be involved in a collision. 
That  being  the  case,  won’t  navigational  measures  continue  to  be  necessary?  What 
about  measures  to  reduce  human  error?  What  are  some  additional  steps  that  could 
be taken in both regards? 

Answer.  Carefully  selected  navigation  and  human  factors  measures  are  effective 
in  reducing  the  likelihood  of  accidents  and  will  continue  to  be  applicable.  The  key 
is  to  focus  on  the  most  effective  measures  which  reduce  overall  risk.  A  number  of 
such  existing  measures  which  improve  vessel  operator  decision-making  through  in-
creased situational awareness are described below. Likewise, technological advance-
ments  in  shipboard  navigation  and  safety  equipment  greatly  improve  the  mariners’ 
situational awareness and enhance their ability to prevent incidents from occurring. 
In addition to double-hull requirements, OPA 90 and its implementing regulations 
imposed  some  additional  measures  to  further  reduce  the  likelihood  of  tanker  acci-
dents,  including  the  requirement  for  a  second  officer  on  the  bridge  while  operating 
within  U.S.  waters,  tug  escorts  for  laden  tankers  in  certain  waters,  and  mandatory 
participation in VTS. 

Many other navigation and vessel traffic management measures have successfully 
been  applied  as  well,  including  AIS,  floating  and  fixed  aids  to  navigation,  Port  Ac-
cess  Route  Study,  ship  routing  and  Traffic  Separation  Scheme  (TSS)  modifications, 
safety  zones,  electronic  charts,  weather  monitoring,  pilotage  requirements,  and 
channel dredging and widening. 

The existing Port State Control program, coupled with the recent implementation 
of the Maritime Transportation Security Act regulations, increases Coast Guard sit-
uational  awareness  and  provides  opportunities  for  accident  prevention.  This  in-
cludes verification of a vessel’s compliance with the International Management Code 
for  the  Safe  Operation  of  Ships  and  for  Pollution  Prevention  and  the  International 
Convention on Standards of Training, Certification and Watchkeeping for Seafarers 
(STCW),  the  primary  international  tools  for  addressing  human  and  organizational 
factors.  The  1995  amendments  to  STCW  required  significant  enhancements  to  the 
qualification and fitness of seafarers worldwide. 

Finally,  the  Puget  Sound  Harbor  Safety  Committee  instituted  a  number  of  vol-
untary standards of care for vessels operating in Puget Sound, improving the overall 
safety of vessel operations within the Puget Sound region. 

The  many  measures  described  above  serve  to  augment  the  reduction  in  risk  pro-

vided by a double-hull design. 

Question  14.  You  testified  that  the  Pacific  Northwest  has  some  of  the  strongest 
safety  prevention  elements  in  place,  due  to  efforts  unique  to  the  region.  What  are 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

88 

some of these unique elements, and could they be applied in other parts of the coun-
try? 

Answer.  Although  not  unique  to  Puget  Sound,  before  any  vessel  greater  than 
1,600  gross  tons  enters  U.S.  waters,  its  crew  is  obligated  to  perform  safety  checks 
of  propulsion  and  steering  equipment,  and  report  any  deficiencies  prior  to  entering 
port  to  help  guard  against  a  mechanical  malfunction  occurring  close  to  U.S.  shore-
lines or within maneuvering waters. In addition, tank vessels en route or departing 
the  region  are  required  to  follow  offshore  routing  schemes  that  hold  them  further 
off  the  coastlines  of  Washington  and  Vancouver  Island,  British  Columbia.  On  the 
U.S. side, the IMO has recognized an ‘‘Area To Be Avoided’’ (ATBA) buffer zone ex-
tending  25  miles  out  from  the  Washington  coast  along  the  Olympic  Coast  National 
Marine  Sanctuary,  for  all  laden  tank  vessels  and  other  vessels  of  1,600  gross  tons 
and  above.  Similarly,  a  50-mile  wide  Tanker  Exclusion  Zone  has  been  established 
off of the Canadian coast to route the Trans-Alaskan Pipeline tanker traffic further 
offshore  to  protect  against  groundings  as  a  result  of  any  potential  disabling  vessel 
conditions.  Most  deep  draft  freight  vessels  operating  off  the  Washington  coast  com-
ply with the Olympic Coast National Marine Sanctuary ATBA. 

The United States and Canadian jointly operated Cooperative Vessel Traffic Serv-
ice  (CVTS),  and  the  International  Maritime  Organization-adopted  TSS,  have  been 
in effect within Puget Sound Waters for decades and serve to ensure an ordered and 
predictable  traffic  pattern  for  shipping  in  the  region.  All  deep,  draft  vessels  (all 
above  300  gross  tons)  are  obligated  to  participate  in  the  CVTS  and  follow  the  TSS 
according  to  the  International  Navigation  Rules  of  the  Road.  The  TSS  establishes 
one-way  traffic  lanes,  similar  to  an  interstate  highway,  with  a  separation  zone  be-
tween  the  opposing  lanes  of  marine  traffic.  The  Cooperative  Vessel  Traffic  Service 
tracks and directs all participating vessels transiting the region as necessary to en-
sure collisions and powered groundings will not occur. 

Extensive  analysis  and  collaboration  with  Canada  and  tribal  interests  (com-
plemented by the discussions and recommendations from a Long-term Risk Manage-
ment  Panel  convened  by  the  Governor  of  Washington  State  and  the  Secretary  of 
Transportation)  led  to  significant  improvements  to  the  TSS,  which  were  imple-
mented  with  international  approval  in  2004  (based  on  extensive  analysis  and  col-
laboration  with  Canada  and  tribal  interests).  The  most  significant  adjustments  en-
sure greater separation for tankers while in transit throughout the system, particu-
larly in more confined waters. 

The  CVTS  system  is  a  model  of  bilateral  cooperation  and  waterways  safety  man-
agement,  ensuring  the  environmental  protection  and  safety  of  our  shared  waters. 
Twice a year delegates from both the Coast Guard and Canadian Coast Guard meet 
to  facilitate  consultations  between  the  United  States  and  Canada  on  the  effective 
implementation of the CVTS Agreement. 

Almost all oil laden tank vessels must also be under the escort of two tugs which 
are  capable  of  stopping  the  vessel’s  movement  within  strict  parameters.  No  vessel 
above  100  gross  tons  is  permitted  to  meet  a  laden  tanker  transiting  Rosario  Strait, 
the typical route for tankers destined for Washington refineries. Typically, as tank-
ers enter Rosario Strait, escort tugs actually tether themselves to the tanker for en-
hanced ability to positively control the tanker’s movement if needed. 

clude: 

Other  programs,  which  are  readily  applicable  to  other  parts  of  the  country,  in-

Weather  Sensors  and  Decision  Aids:  As  a  result  of  a  special  appropriation  for 
Puget  Sound  pollution  prevention  enhancement,  two  sophisticated  weather  buoys 
and  numerous  other  weather  sensors  and  cameras  have  been  installed  throughout 
Puget  Sound  waters  to  enhance  the  mariners’  and  the  Coast  Guard’s  situational 
awareness  in  the  region.  In  addition,  a  Rescue  Tug  Deployment  Decision  Making 
tool  has  been  created  to  assist  the  Captain  of  the  Port  in  objectively  determining 
the  need  for  the  dispatch  and  pre-staging  of  stand-by  tug  capabilities  to  protect 
against adverse weather and potential disabled vessels combining to create an unac-
ceptable  risk  for  particular  areas  within  the  region.  These  measures  all  combine  to 
facilitate both normal voyage planning and emergency response decisionmaking. 

Harbor Safety Committees: In addition to government safety and pollution preven-
tion efforts, the Puget Sound and Columbia River region’s maritime industries have 
established strong Harbor Safety Committees, with members from a broad spectrum 
of industry. These Committees have established Standards of Care, voluntary meas-
ures for operating practices and equipment testing that supplement the Federal and 
State  standards.  These  additional  measures  have  proven  a  valuable  tool  in  quickly 
improving the maritime industry’s performance, without the need to embark in reg-
ulatory changes. 

Question  15.  You  testified  that  in  District  13,  there  are  many  more  inspections 

of foreign flag vessels than in the rest of the country. Why is that? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

89 

Answer.  From  the  data  provided  in  the  Coast  Guard’s  Port  State  Control  Annual 
Reports,  the  National  Average  for  examination  percentage  of  foreign  vessels,  based 
on  total  ship  arrivals,  is  19  percent  in  2002,  19  percent  in  2003,  and  15.5  percent 
in  2004.  Meanwhile,  D13  ports  examined  foreign  vessels  at  higher  rates;  approxi-
mately 46 percent in 2002, 32 percent in 2003 of the foreign vessels, and 38 percent 
in 2004. 

The  Coast  Guard  selects  foreign  vessels  for  PSC  exams  through  the  use  of  a  tar-
geting matrix that weighs risk factors involving the ship owner/operator, flag state, 
vessel classification societies, vessel type, and vessel compliance history. We use this 
targeting matrix to identify vessels that have the greatest risk of being substandard 
and to focus our port state control efforts on high-risk vessels. 

Collectively,  Puget  Sound  and  Portland  zones  receive  a  higher  percentage  of  for-
eign bulk cargo carrier arrivals than other ports. Past data indicates that older bulk 
cargo vessels are more likely to be substandard than most other ports in the nation, 
and  older  bulk  carriers  receive  more  points  during  the  targeting  process  than  new 
bulk  carriers  or  other  freight  ships.  Approximately  35  percent  of  the  foreign  ships 
arriving at D13 ports are bulk carriers, compared with 18 percent nationwide. 

Much of the cargo handled by ships visiting D13 ports are low-value commodities. 
Past  data  indicates  that  vessels  that  carry  low-value  commodities  are  more  likely 
to  be  substandard  and  the  targeting  matrix  typically  focuses  upon  vessels  carrying 
low-value  commodities.  For  example,  Portland  is  considered  the  second  or  third  (by 
year)  biggest  grain  exporter  in  the  nation.  D13  also  sees  a  large  number  of  first- 
time  vessels  to  the  U.S.  or  vessels  on  their  maiden  voyages.  The  Coast  Guard  tar-
gets every vessel at its first arrival in the United States for examination. Vessel Se-
curity  Boarding  Teams  in  Sector  Seattle  AOR  have  received  extensive  training  to 
conduct portions of Port State Control Exams—they know what to look for with re-
spect  to  safety  and  environmental  protection  requirements;  and  if  they  note  defi-
ciencies, they will initiate a Port State Control Examination. 

Question  16.  Please  describe  any  ongoing  joint  efforts  with  the  Canadian  govern-

ment on oil spill prevention and response efforts. 

Answer.  The  United  States  Coast  Guard  and  the  Canadian  Coast  Guard  jointly 
operate  the  Cooperative  Vessel  Traffic  Service  (CVTS)  and  the  International  Mari-
time  Organization  adopted  TSS.  These  cooperative  services  have  been  in  place  for 
decades,  and  have  ensured  an  orderly  and  predictable  traffic  pattern  for  all  vessels 
in  the  region.  Within  this  framework,  the  two  Coast  Guards  have  continued  to  re-
fine and improve the TSS by extending the initial entry point several miles further 
offshore,  providing  greater  separation  of  opposing  ship  traffic,  adding  separation 
zones  where  none  previously  existed  in  some  of  the  narrower  waterways,  including 
a special operating area to preclude meeting of large commercial vessels at a critical 
turn in the waterway. The CVTS and TSS operation, along with internationally rec-
ognized  rules-of-the-road  and  standardized  merchant  mariner  training,  are  respon-
sible for the extremely low frequency of collisions and groundings in this very busy 
and confined waterway. 

Additionally  on  the  prevention  side,  the  Coast  Guard  works  closely  with  our 
Transport Canada Marine Safety counterparts in executing our respective port state 
control  programs.  In  the  Thirteenth  District,  Captain  of  the  Port/Officer  in  Charge, 
Marine  Inspection  Puget  Sound  had  established  a  program  of  reciprocity  for  Port 
State Control examinations conducted by Transport Canada marine surveyors, thus 
maximizing the number of foreign vessel exams within the Puget Sound region. 

On  the  response  side,  the  Coast  Guard  has  ongoing  and  routine  contact  with  our 
Canadian  Coast  Guard  counterparts  in  implementing  the  Canada-United  States 
Joint  Marine  Pollution  Contingency  Plan  (JCP).  This  plan  plays  a  critical  role  in 
preparing  for,  and  responding  to  oil  spills  in  the  Puget  Sound  area.  Using  the 
CANUSPAC  annex  to  the  JCP,  both  the  Canadian  and  U.S.  Coast  Guard  work  to-
gether as part of a Joint Response Team (JRT). The two Coast Guards exercise the 
plan at least annually, and typically have a concurrent response equipment deploy-
ment  exercise  to  ensure  we  have  the  ability  to  move  necessary  equipment  to  either 
side of the international border in concert, and engage spilled oil at the earliest op-
portunity.  On  August  19,  2005,  the  Coast  Guard  conducted  a  meeting  with  the  Ca-
nadian  Government  and  the  Makah  tribe  to  finalize  details  on  our  upcoming  joint- 
oil spill exercise scheduled to take place on October 27, 2005. The exercise will sim-
ulate a vessel sinking off the Washington coast with an oil discharge that threatens 
both Canadian shores and the Makah reservation. Exercise play will involve a com-
mand  post  being  set  up  in  Canada  and  on  the  Makah  reservation,  as  well  as  an 
equipment deployment at Swiftsure Bank, off the British Columbia coast. There will 
also be a JRT meeting later in November or December. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

90 

Question 17. Please describe any ongoing joint efforts with the tribal governments 

on oil spill prevention and response efforts. 

Answer.  The  tribes  of  the  Pacific  Northwest,  as  sovereign  nations,  are  invited  to 
be a part of the Regional Response Team/Northwest Area Committee (RRT/NWAC). 
They  are  routinely  invited  to  participate  in  efforts  to  develop  and  maintain  the 
Northwest Area Contingency Plan, the geographical annexes to the plan, and to all 
workgroup  meetings  of  the  RRT/NWAC.  There  has  been  limited  success  in  having 
the region’s tribes attend the RRT/NWAC meetings. There are approximately 27 dif-
ferent tribal entities in the RRT/NWAC area. Accordingly, it is difficult to get them 
to participate collectively since there is no single tribal group or committee that rep-
resents them all. As a result, the CG works to include the appropriate tribes within 
the  geographical  area  in  which  we  are  involved.  For  example,  some  of  the  tribes 
have participated in the Coast Guard sponsored Environmental Risk Assessment in 
the  Cape  Flattery  area.  This  risk  assessment  is  designed  to  help  decisionmakers 
weigh  various  environmental  trade-offs  when  applying  different  cleanup  tech-
nologies to oil spills. 

Several of the coastal area tribes participated in a large Washington coastal area 
logistics  exercise.  This  exercise  brought  together  state,  Federal,  and  tribal  trustees 
and  industry  to  look  at  the  unique  and  difficult  logistical  challenges  of  responding 
to  a  spill  on  the  Washington  coast.  This  exercise  identified  issues  requiring  further 
attention  through  planning  and  equipment  placement  necessary  to  be  able  to  con-
duct  a  successful  cleanup  operation  in  this  rugged,  sensitive  coastal  area.  Most  re-
cently,  the  tribes  have  participated  in  the  planning  for  the  upcoming  Joint  Cana-
dian-U.S. Oil Spill exercise and at a Public Affairs Workgroup meeting of the RRT/ 
NWAC.  The  October  2005  CAN/US  exercise,  will  be  an  open  water  field  training 
evolution  and  partial  Command  Post  Exercise  beyond  the  mouth  of  the  Strait  of 
Juan De Fuca. On the U.S. side, it will be based in Neah Bay on the Makah tribal 
land area. Tribal representatives will be working with the exercise committee to de-
velop  and  participate  in  the  exercise.  Furthermore,  individual  tribes  within  the  re-
gion have been part of the Unified Command stood up for response to pollution inci-
dents within Puget Sound. A most recent example is the Wells Point spill of Decem-
ber 2003. 

The  Coast  Guard  is  working  concurrently  with  regional  tribes  and  is  in  the  proc-
ess  of  establishing  a  Regulated  Navigation  Area  (RNA)  within  the  Strait  of  Juan 
de Fuca to permanently establish VTS Measures to modify traffic lanes to accommo-
date  the  usual  and  customary  fishing  grounds  of  regional  tribes.  Recent  changes  to 
the Traffic Separation Scheme conflicted with traditional fishing areas and impeded 
the  ability  of  the  tribes  to  fish  safely.  The  RNA  will  reroute  vessel  traffic  safely 
around  traditional  fishing  areas,  greatly  reducing  risk  of  collision  and  associated 
pollution. 

Question  18.  Has  the  Coast  Guard  ever  done  a  cost-benefit  analysis  on  the  use 

of standby tugs to prevent oil spills in Puget Sound? 

Answer.  Yes.  A  regulatory  assessment  entitled,  ‘‘Use  of  Tugs  to  Protect  Against 
Oil Spills in the Puget Sound Area’’ (Report No. 9522–002) was published November 
15, 1999, and is available on the Internet at http://www.uscg.mil/hq/g-m/pscb.pdf. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

RICHARD WRIGHT 

Question 1. I understand that a recent Washington State Department of Ecology- 
funded  study  on  the  role  of  fishing  vessels  in  clean-ups  found  that  there  might  be 
insufficient  vessel  capabilities  for  responding  to  an  oil  spill  in  Washington.  Do  you 
agree  with  the  report’s  conclusions?  If  not,  please  let  me  know  your  specific  con-
cerns. 

Answer.  As  I  stated  at  the  field  hearing,  in  a  very  large  spill,  it  is  hard  to  argue 
that  additional  well-trained  people  and  vessels  would  not  be  a  help.  However,  the 
study  did  not  look  at  the  program  MSRC  has  in  place  to  train  and  access  vessels 
and  people  of  opportunity.  I  have  been  in  the  process  of  improving  that  program 
since  well  before  the  study  and  will  continue  to  do  so.  The  Department  of  Ecology 
(DOE)  is  also  working  on  this  program  as  the  study  recommended  that  a  govern-
ment  agency  take  on  this  task  to  avoid  potential  competition  for  the  same  limited 
resources  by  the  various  response  entities.  MSRC  will  lend  every  assistance  to  the 
State in this project. Also, the study failed to account for the considerable resources 
available to MSRC through our Memorandum of Agreement with Burrard Clean Op-
erations  of  British  Columbia,  our  partners  to  the  north.  One  additional  comment, 
it  would  be  a  mistake  to  focus  strictly  on  fishing  vessels.  Fishing  vessels  and  their 
crews are quite nomadic. This is especially true of the Puget Sound-based fleet. This 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

91 

makes  crews  difficult  to  keep  trained  and  vessels  difficult  to  depend  upon.  MSRC’s 
program  includes  vessels  of  opportunity  of  all  types,  such  as  tugs  and  workboats, 
as well as fishing vessels. 

Question  2.  If  you  believe  there  are  gaps  in  the  current  oil  spill  prevention  and 
response regime, what should be done to address them? Are there steps that should 
be taken at the Federal level, both through resource commitments or Federal legis-
lation? 

Answer.  Once  again,  as  I  stated  at  the  field  hearing,  I  believe  that  our  biggest 
gap  is  in  the  area  of  remote  sensing.  I  would  support  any  innovative  research  in 
any  phase  of  response  activities;  however,  remote  sensing  remains  the  most  impor-
tant area, in my opinion. This is most critical in the early hours of small to medium- 
sized releases, especially at night. It may seem easy to find oil on water, but it usu-
ally  is  not.  Certainly,  huge  spills  are  obvious  early  in  the  response,  but  as  they 
quickly  spread  and  age,  finding  the  best  place  for  recovery  activities  becomes  more 
difficult.  Currently,  most  of  the  effort  in  the  U.S.  seems  to  be  focused  on  infrared 
technology.  However,  the  Canadian  government  has  made  great  strides  in  laser- 
based  sensing,  which  shows  much  more  promise  than  infrared.  As  this  represents 
possible  international  collaboration,  it  would  seem  that  the  Federal  Government 
should  take  the  lead.  In  a  time  of  limited  resources,  remote  sensing  represents  the 
biggest bang for the buck. 

Question 3. You testified that in Washington State, the amount of response equip-
ment  and  location  of  such  equipment  far  exceeds  Federal  requirements.  Why  is 
that? Is it a function of state law or is this a voluntary prevention initiative on the 
part of industry? Does this mean that the level of response equipment in other parts 
of the country may be lacking? 

Answer.  Oil  spill  response  in  Washington  is  very  much  a  partnership  effort  be-
tween  the  state,  the  Coast  Guard,  and  industry.  Where  we  are  today  is  reflective 
of that partnership. In cooperation with the regulatory community, the industry has 
spent  hundreds  of  millions  of  dollars  and  invested  hundreds  of  thousand  of  person- 
hours  in  making  the  response  stature  in  Washington  the  finest  in  the  country,  if 
not  the  world.  Laws  and  regulations  have  not  been  the  drivers;  protecting  our 
unique environment has been. I am not able to speak for other sections of our coun-
try  directly;  however,  OPA  90  and  subsequent  regulations  have  provided  a  set  of 
minimum standards for the entire nation. Here in Washington, as previously stated, 
we greatly exceed these minimum requirements. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:04 Dec 10, 2010 Jkt 062793 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62793.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

